VOL. I. 1
JULIAN.
Praise
to the God of Abraham. The locusts
are flown. The land which they found
flourishing
and verdant as a garden, they have
changed to the barrenness of a desert. The
cities and the villages, but now so full of
people
,
are become the region of desolation and
death. Even the very city and house of God
are level with the dust, and the ploughshare
has gone over them. And here, upon the hill
of Olives, I sit, a living witness of the ruin.
By reason of the wonderful compassions of God,
which never fail, I am escaped as a bird from
the net of the fowler. Yet I take little joy in
this. For why should the days of one like me
be lengthened out, when the mighty and
excellent
of the land are cut off? I rather rejoice
in this, that the spoiler is gone; the armies of
the alien have ceased to devour; and they
who are fled, and hidden in caves and dens
of the rocks, may come forth again to
inhabit
the land and build up the waste places.
A multitude, which no man could number, have
fallen before the edge of the sword, or by
famine
,
and the air is full of the pestilential vapors
that steam up from their rotting carcases. But
a greater multitude remains; and it may well
be that ere many years have passed, they shall
fill the land as before, and gathered into one by
him who, though long delaying, will come, pay
back, and more, the measure they have
received
.
That time will surely come. Even as the
Assyrian could not finally destroy, but the hand
of the Almighty was put forth, and the city
and the temple grew again from their ruins
to a greater glory than before, so shall it be now.
The Roman triumph shall be short. Messiah
shall yet appear; and Jerusalem clothed in her
beautiful garments shall sit upon her hills, the
joy and crown of the whole earth.
But for me, my eyes shall not behold it.
Before
that day these aged limbs shall rest in the
sepulchres of Beth-Harem, and these walls will
have fallen and mingled with the common
earth. It is not to-morrow, nor the day after,
that the kingdom shall come. Impatient Israel
will not wait the appointed hour; she will not
remember that with the Lord a thousand years
are as a day, and a day as a thousand years. She
will reign to-day or never. It is her mad haste
has drawn upon her this wide destruction.
Deceivers
,
and they who have deceived
themselves
,
fools and wicked men, have led her
to the precipice, down which she hath fallen,
and now lies, as a potter's vessel, broken in
fragments. And I, alas, am not clear in the
great transgression. The rage which filled the
people was in my heart also. I too gave heed
to lying words, and bent my knee before him
who, in my darkness, seemed to me as in very
truth the King of Israel, and bound myself to
his chariot wheels. May he whose compassions
are infinite pity and forgive his servant. It is
with my soul low in the dust before him, that
I turn to the long past, and remember the early
errors of my life.
And why will ye of Rome press upon me the
unwelcome task? My kinsmen might well
forego any pleasure they may reap, for the pain
that will be my only harvest. Yet not my
only harvest. The memory of the days spent
where Judith and Onias dwelt will bring
with it pleasant thoughts,  if many
bitter
and self-reproachful also. Happily, of this
portion of my life, of which you are chiefly
desirous
to hear, the record already exists; from
which I need but draw in such fragments as
shall impart all that I may care to reveal. That
record lies before me just as it went forth from
my full heart, and was poured into the bosom
of that more than woman,  my protecting
angel, rather,  Naomi the blessed. As the
scenes of my earlier life rise before me out of
these leaves, distinct as the outlines of these
barren hills, so too does the image of my
mother
come up out of the obscurity of the past,
and stand before me, clear and beautiful to the
eye as when clothed in flesh. It was to thee,
thou true mother in Israel, that I made myself
visible and plain to read as a parchment scroll,
and from thee in return received those holy
counsels, charged with a divine wisdom, which
were a pillar of light to my path; and, had I
heeded them, had saved me from every error,
as they did from more than I can now
remember
or recount.
Concerning my birth and childhood in Rome,
and the years which preceded my departure for
the East, it needs not that I speak; for of that
part of my life enough is known, and I can
take no pleasure in re-perusing it. From the
letters and other writings transmitted to me long
since by my mother from Rome, I now draw
what shall give you a somewhat living picture
of those days in Judea, about which you are
chiefly desirous to hear.
1*
I.
I thus
addressed my mother, soon after
reaching Csarea:
You who know your son so well will not
doubt that I took my departure from Antioch
with pain. Nowhere since I passed the gates
of Rome have I been entertained with such
magnificence. Nowhere have the hours proved
themselves so short-lived. After the dulness of
Athens, and the worse than dulness of Smyrna,
Ephesus, and Rhodes, it was refreshing to
witness
the noise and stir of the mistress of the
East. So frequent were the theatres, baths,
and porticos, the shows, the games, the combats
of wild beasts, that I felt myself almost in the
Elysium of my own Rome. What added, too,
as you will believe, to my happiness, was this,
that I passed everywhere for a Roman of
undoubted
Roman blood; or, at least, if my
descent
were seen, with a civility which seems
native
to these orientals, the knowledge of it was
not betrayed by a word or look. I perceive
you to smile at this, as also to utter a few
words expressive of a gentle contempt for an
unworthy scion of an ancient house. The
contempt
from you I can bear; but the smile
by which you seem to enjoy what you are
pleased to term my credulity, I must say and
believe is wasted. For, more than once have I
been assured by some of my own tribe that,
but for a something in my eye, they should not
suspect me to be other than a Roman. Neither,
my mother, was this flattery; it was from some
incapable of that meanest vice; from my real
friends. But whoever were so blind as to take
me for a Roman, you may be assured I was not
careful to undeceive them. I enjoyed the
perfect
felicity while I might. And the dream
was undisturbed during the whole of my
sojourn
there, except in a single instance, when
once as I was walking in front of the baths of
Tiberius, I saw approaching from an opposite
point the lordly Drusus, who, as I gave signs of
saluting him, turned his face in another
direction
,
and swept along without recognising me.
What think you of that? at this distance I can
see your color change. But if you even feel
the insult, who live so shut out from the great
world, how much more must I who am in it.
I think your censure is too sharp upon me, when
at such moments I, somewhat hastily perhaps,
wish the twelve tribes had found the fate of
Pharaoh, seeing that to little else than scorn
and curses, hatred and oppression, are they born
who come of their lineage. Willingly would I
renounce all the wisdom I have ever found in
Moses and the prophets, for a little of that equal
honor in the eyes of men, which more methinks
than questions of philosophy or religion
concerns
a man's well-being. My eye is not far
reaching enough to discern a single advantage
in the position the Jew fills in this great theatre
of life. He cherishes in his soul his faith,
which he holds to be nobler and purer than that
of Pythagoras or Cicero. But however much
nobler and purer in his own eye, when did
other than a Jew so esteem it? Who ever has
heard of Romans, Greeks, or Egyptians
becoming
Jews, and receiving  save in numbers most
inconsiderable  the Jewish faith? Yet is it
likely that through so many ages a religion
given of God should have remained in the
world, and not have convinced men of its
divinity? I, alas, have not even a conviction
of its truth to sustain me under this burden of
contempt and reproach. I am a Jew outwardly,
carrying the signs of my descent and origin in
my face and form, branded in by the Hand
that made me, and by the hand that reared
me, and this I cannot help. But with
readiness
would I lose one half my limbs, if
from what remained these scars and seams of
ignominy were fairly erased. You say that in
Rome I mix freely with the Roman youth, that
I sit at their tables and they at mine, that I
join them at the games, and in every
amusement
of our city life. It is true; yet still I am
a Jew. I am beloved of many because I am
Julian; yet by the very same am I abhorred
because I am a Jew. The Roman beggar who
takes my gold,  for gold is gold,  begs
pardon
of the gods, and as he turns the corner
scours the coin upon the sand. Yet, my mother, I
see not why one people should thus proscribe
another; nor do I look upon the wrong but
with indignation. You justly accuse me with
indifference to the religion of my fathers. But
I have never beheld with patience the slights,
insults, and oppressions which, by the stronger,
have been heaped upon the weaker; nor, truly,
when I reflect, can I see why the worship of a
people should be charged upon them as a crime.
It is these injuries which have roused within
me, at times, the Jew  however for the most
part in my search after pleasure, I have been
too ready to forget all but what ministered
directly
to that end. If thou art filled with
wonder
at so serious a vein in me, I will soon give
thee the reasons thereof; but let me first speak
of my passage hither, and of that which
happened
immediately on my arrival.
I left Antioch, as I have said, with regret.
At the mouth of the Orontes I embarked in a
trader, bound to Csarea, and then to Joppa
and Alexandria. We at first were driven out
to sea by an east wind, and ran quite along the
shores of Cyprus; but this soon subsiding, we
crossed over again to the Syrian coast, and were
afterwards enabled to keep our vessel so near,
the breezes being gentle and from a safe quarter,
that I enjoyed a continued prospect of the
country, with as much distinctness and
satisfaction
,
methinks, as if I had been travelling by
land; at least with distinctness enough, for every
pleasure of this sort is increased by a certain
degree
of obscurity and dimness. Painters
understand
this, and over their works throw a sort of
haze by some mysterious process of their divine
art, which imparts to them their principal charm.
No prospect and no picture is beautiful which is
clear and sharp as if cut in metal. Truth itself
is to me improved by a veil of this same
mistiness
thrown around it. But if any fault is to
be found with this Syrian atmosphere, it is that
of this all-involving dimness there is something
too much, to that degree, indeed, that the
eye is often cheated of the distant features of
the landscape,  the mountains which, drawn
upon the chart defore us, we know to be not
far distant, not too far for the eye to reach with
ease, being cut off entirely by this purple wall
of partition. Happily, as we drew near the
port of Berytus, beyond which lay the
mountains
of the Libanus and Anti-Libanus, there
was not so much of the quality of which I
speak in the air, as to deprive us of a view
of their summits, crowned with their snowy
caps, filling the whole eastern horizon. It
was a magnificent mountain scene, a fitting
vestibule, you will say, my mother, through
which to enter the holy land of Moses and
Abraham. It was, I am obliged to confess,
with emotions such as I had never experienced
before, that I found myself now for the first
time gazing upon the shores of this wonderful
people, the home of my fathers. It was
beautiful
to the eye, as we skirted the coast, as one
long continued garden. The rich agriculture
of the husbandman was pushed out to the very
sands of the sea-beach, and every cape, and
promontory, and lofty peak, showed, sparkling
in the sun, the white walls of a village or some
insulated dwelling, proving how thickly
peopled
must be the country, which could spare its
inhabitants for the cultivation of spots naturally
barren and inhospitable, but now by the hand
of industry changed to a soil not less fertile
than that of Italy. I could not but wish that,
if it were decreed I must be a Jew, I had
been born and had lived in these sunny regions;
and in truth, that it had pleased heaven to
have retained my parents on their native soil,
seeing that there, among our own hills and
plains, we could not but have been a people
more respected than we now are, or ever can be,
wandering over the earth, forcing ourselves
upon
every nation and every city, unwelcome
guests,  among them but never of them.
We had not long lost sight of the ridges of
Lebanon, when we passed successively those
ancient seats of opulence and renown, Sidon
and Tyre; then doubling a lofty cape, formed
by a part of Mount Carmel shooting into the
sea, a few hours' sail revealed a distant prospect
of Csarea. As we drew near, I was
astonished
at the magnificence of the port. It is a
harbor
of an immense capacity as to vessels of all
kinds and sizes, yet has it been formed wholly
by the hand of art. The shore presents at this
part of the coast an almost even line of sandy
banks running from south to north, with none
of those alternate projections and inlets which
are proper for the security of ships against both
the current of the sea and storms of wind.
Wherefore, at the cost of an immense sum, did
Herod the Great construct this artificial basin,
larger than the famous one at Athens,
wherein vessels can ride in perfect safety,
protected
especially against the violence of the
southern gales, which in this region are chiefly
to be feared. The water is enclosed by a mole in
the shape of a half moon, which, bending round
from the south, presents its open mouth to the
north, whose gentle winds allow vessels at all
times to obtain an entrance. This mole, wholly
of marble, and of enormous proportions, offers to
the eye on the outer side a continuous range of
edifices, also of marble, which seemed to me
palaces as I approached at a distance, but are
designed for the reception of merchandise;
while on the inner side, for its entire length, it
affords a broad and spacious pavement, where
the ships are lightened of their burdens, and,
lashed to iron rings or pillars, ride securely till
their cargoes for another voyage have been
received
.
At the entrance of the harbor, and at
the very extremity of the mole, there rises a
lofty tower, upon the summit of which you
behold a Colossus of Asia, while on the
opposite
side of the entrance, upon a similar tower
which terminates the shorter arm of the mole,
stands a Colossus of Rome, of the like huge
proportions. Towers of the same height and
size shoot up along the whole length of this
vast wall, intended partly as an additional
feature
of magnificence, and partly as a defence
against the assaults of an enemy. From the
VOL. I. 2
inner shore of this wide basin,  which for
vastness seems a lake,  rises by a gradual
ascent the city, the streets which lead from the
water being crossed at regular intervals by
others
of the same width, which run in an opposite
direction.
As our vessel,  its decks thronged with
passengers
,
floated, driven by a gentle northern
breeze, within the embrace of this spacious
haven, and the crowd of shipping, the long
range of lofty towers, the city with its
palaces
,
temples, and theatres, all opened at onec
to my view, I thought I had never seen
anything of a more impressive grandeur. I
could with difficulty persuade myself that this
was a city of Judea; that, where I had
expected
to behold a barbarous and uncultivated
people, I should thus meet instead, all the
signs of elegance and taste which had marked
the cities of Greece and Syria, or are to
be observed in the chief towns of Italy. I
remembered, indeed, the magnificence and
boundless wealth of Herod, but I do not think,
my mother, that even you yourself are aware
of the greatness of his achievements, not only
here in Csarea, but, as I have heard, in many
other of the cities of Judea. From some of my
own nation, who have been fellow-passengers,
and with whom I have enjoyed much pleasant
intercourse, I have learned this; and in
addition
,
more of the present condition and recent
history of the country, than I could have
obtained
from any sources whatsoever in Rome.
Of these things I shall impart what knowledge
I have gathered at myfuture leisure. Let me,
at present, return to our arrival.
We thus floated into this beautiful harbor,
making our way slowly along amongst vessels
of all nations, which like ourselves were
coming
in, or departing, or riding securely at their
anchors. The noise and confusion were
scarcely
less than in the Tiber. I enjoyed the scene
greatly, as I do everywhere whatever leads to
uproar and contention. Particularly was I
delighted with the quarrels which arose among
the sailors, when the vessels either could not
easily pass each other, or became entangled,
when it frequently came to blows, and more or
fewer were overset into the water. If they
who were thus thrust overboard did not readily
recover themselves by clinging to the sides of
the vessel, or laying hold upon some rope, the
combatants then ceased till the drowning men
were drawn up again. Yet are many daily lost
in these rude encounters, and I myself saw blows
given and taken, which seemed to me more than
enough to demolish the head on which they
fell. But when the governor of a people is full
of quarrel, and violence, and injustice, how
can anything better be expected from the very
lowest of the populace! As I stood watching
what was thus going on about me, I was
surprised
to find ourselves suddenly brought up
against a vessel, which, from the bellowings
that proceeded from it, I perceived to be
crowded
with wild beasts, and indeed the deck was
covered with their cages. As I expressed to
one who stood by me, and with whom I had had
frequent intercourse during the voyage, my
wonder to see such a cargo making its way
into a port of Judea, where the customs and
religion of the people differ so widely from
those of Rome and other heathen cities, he
replied, that they, who knew anything of the
manner in which Judea had been governed by
Herod, and after him by the Ethnarch, would
see, in what had occasioned surprise to me,
nothing but what agreed exactly with the now
altered character of the population. I answered,
that I was obliged to confess great ignorance of
all that related to the Jews, as I was Roman
born, and my reading and studies had lain in a
quite different direction.
At this flourish, which I had hoped should
pass with him, he quickly rejoined, You may
be Roman born, but, if so, your Hebrew blood
wears well, for the Jew looks out at your eyes
as plainly as the Roman out of your cloak and
your speech. Never hope to play Roman with
those eyes in your head.
I was somewhat taken down, as you may
suppose, by this; but I put the best face
upon the matter, and said that I could not
but acknowledge that, although I had been
born in Rome, my parents had removed
thither from the upper part of Judea. My
education had, however, been so completely
Roman, owing to my father's early
abandonment
of all outward observance of his faith,
that it was strictly true, as I had stated, that
my ignorance was great of all that related to
the present condition and late history of the
country of my ancestors.
The more the pity, replied my companion,
that a son of Abraham should be found to
deny his country and his ancestry, and make a
boast of what should be his shame, that he
knows nothing of the people from whom he
sprung. It is to such traitors  and his dark
eye sparkled like a living coal,  that Judea
owes her slavery and her apostacy,  her
slavery to a foreign yoke, and her apostacy from
the faith and the customs of the early days of
our history. The people are no longer Jews, but
Herodians, Greeks, Romans, anything,
anything
but Jews. Is this a city of Jews we are
2 *
entering? It stands on the soil of Judea, but
it belongs not to the rightful occupants of the
soil. Csarea is first Greek, then Roman, last
and least Jewish. But  a word in your ear
the Jews that are there are of the true stuff.
They are zealous for the law and for liberty.
A little thing would rouse them to the defence
of either or both.
As he said this, our further conversation was
suddenly interrupted by our vessel coming into
violent contact with that containing the cargo
of wild animals, which caused them to utter
their savage cries with terrific uproar; and to
this was added the oaths and shouts of the
sailors and the pilots, each laying upon the
other the fault of the encounter, and all
preparing
to go from words to blows. This issue
was, however, happily avoided, and the vessels
being soon free of each other, we proceeded on
our way.
These animals, then resumed the Jew,
about which you wondered that they should
be here, are destined to the games instituted by
Herod in commemoration of the building of
Csarea, and which return every fifth year.
On the third day from this they commence;
and if you are a stranger in this part of the
world, and would observe the customs of a new
people, you will be well repaid for the delay by
remaining and witnessing them.
I said that I should certainly do so; that
was abroad for the single purpose of seeing the
people of various regions, and obtaining such
knowledge as might in this way be gathered
without much expense of labor or thought
that although, as he had seen, I was no Jew
except in the misfortune of having descended
from that tribe, I was yet especially desirous of
dwelling awhile among them, as, if not a polite
or powerful nation, they certainly were a
remarkable
one, and well merited the observations
of a curious traveller.
A mingled look of scorn and rage was the
only response I received at first for this speech
He paced the deck of the vessel a few moments
and I supposed would not deign to hold further
communication with me. He, however, soon
returned to my side, having swallowed his
indignation
.
Young man, said he, I forgive the levity
of your speech, for the reason that I well
deserved
it for persuading you to be present at
heathen sports, on a Jewish soil. But in truth
they have been now so long celebrated, that
they have become a part of the life of the
people
,
and it is only a few of the stricter sort who
condemn them or keep back from them. It had
agreed better with my real opinions, however,
had I denounced them as I should have done,
and warned thee against them. But you will
use in this your liberty. I now wish to say
that, in spite of your enmity toward your own
people, I have conceived a regard for you, and
while you shall sojourn in Csarea offer you
my house and home; and once beneath the
roof of a true son of Abraham, I will not doubt
that your long perished affection for the land of
your fathers may be revived, and that we may
send you home a Jew in nature as  forgive me
you are in outward semblance.
Were it only for an apprehension of such
lamentable issue, I rejoined, I should feel
compelled to decline your hospitable request.
May I never be more of that of which I am
already too much. But beside this, I am bound
in obedience to the wishes of my mother, to
seek out the dwelling of the widow of Sameas,
the wine merchant, with whom it is my purpose
to abide, if indeed she yet lives and can receive
me, for it is very many years since we have
heard of her welfare, and know not now
whether
she be even an inhabitant of Csarea.
To this the stranger replied with vivacity,
The widow of Sameas! Ah, the Lord be
thanked for directing your course to that haven.
She is a true mother in Israel. She still lives and
dwells in Csarea, and is of good estate.
Sameas was no idler; and when he died, his
widow and children inherited the fruits of his
industry; and but for the unjust exactions of
Pilate, their wealth had been second to that of
few within the walls. As it is, they enjoy
competence
and more. But the dearest wealth of
the house is the zeal for the law and the rights of
Judea which fires the souls of Philip and Anna,
the son and daughter of the Merchant. The
best I can wish thee, therefore, my young
Roman
,
is that thou mayest dwell a space in the
house of Sameas, for if there be but a drop of
Jewish blood in thy body, I fear not but their
ardor will so warm and swell it, that it shall fill
all thy veins.
We were now separated, the vessel having
reached the spot where she was to be secured,
and the passengers making ready to depart.
The Jew, my companion, took leave of me,
after first directing me in such a manner that I
could not fail to find the dwelling of the
widow of the wine merchant. It was with
little satisfaction that I looked forward to a
residence with a family of Jewish zealots. It
was enough, I thought, that I had borne so
long, and with such patience, the reproaches of
my own mother, quite enough that, in addition,
I had just been exposed to the vituperations of
a fanatic, from whom I had happily escaped
alive, without being now for many days, how
many I could not know, but for many days
shut up, without the possibility of escape, in
the very hot-bed of Judaism. What a fate for
me! I had almost resolved to take ship,
without
so much as landing, for Alexandria, when
the image of your sorrowful and rebuking
countenance, my mother, presented itself before
me, and I turned dutifully toward the
quarter
of the city where dwelt the merchant.
To reach it I must pass through the central parts
of the city, to where it first joins the country.
The place I sought I easily found; for Csarea,
dear mother, although the capital of Judea, is
not so large as Rome. And moreover as I
passed
along, I could not but judge that it would
scarce be so enduring, seeing that, though
presenting
everywhere the marks of newness, it
presents also everywhere the signs of premature
decay. A city built in a day is very likely to
last but a day. And all around, are Herod's
piles of building, whether in the form of theatre,
temple, market-place, or quay, already perceived
to yield to the effects of time. Even the
palace
of the Governor, which erewhile was the
residence of Herod himself, is in parts of it,
ruinous through the falling asunder of the ill
cemented masonry. Pilate could hardly trust
to his walls to defend him against any rising of
the citizens. But he is in little danger at any
time, as I think, considering what the
population
of the city is, notwithstanding the enmity
of the Jewish portion of the inhabitants.
The dwelling of Sameas, after traversing the
entire breadth of the city, I at length reached.
A beggar issuing from a gate-way, laden with
the proofs of the benevolence to which he had
successfully appealed, was the only person of
whom I could inquire which of the dwellings
near me was that of the widow of the wine
merchant. He answered, pointing to his sack
of commodities which he was bearing away,
From whom but the widow of Sameas do
the poor of Csarea depart laden in this fashion?
Pass yonder threshold and thou shalt find
thyself
in paradise.
So saying, and waving his arm with dignity,
he turned away to count over his stolen
treasures
.
The kindhearted we always approach
with confidence, so that with a quicker pace I
passed the gateway and entered a spacious
garden
,
in the centre of which, almost buried
beneath
overhanging foliage and flowers of every
variety of form and hue, stood the dwelling of
the wine merchant. A slave now immediately
approached, saying he would conduct me to
that part of the house where I should see
those for whom I sought. As he led me on,
and I observed the great beauty of the spot,
and the many tokens of wealth and refinement
in the garden and in the dwelling, the forms
and proportions of which were now distinctly
to be seen through the opening trees, I found
myself growing to a more complacent humor,
and better disposed, than when I left the vessel,
to greet with some appearance of warmth the
widow of the virtuous Sameas. It is true, I
saw statue neither of god or goddess, nor vase
of marble curiously wrought with nymphs and
fawns, and young, dancing, half-drunk
Bacchuses
;
nor did the imperial forms of Augustus
and Tiberius greet my eye, as they do
everywhere
in street and garden, market-place and
shop in Rome. So that from art much was
wanting to give the truest grace to the picture
before me; but nature seemed to have made
good all defect of this sort by her superior
charms; and I was made soon to forget what at
first struck me as a want, by the novelty and
surpassing richness and variety of plants, trees,
and shrubs, both native and foreign, which met
my eye. I lingered to admire, and would, at
that moment, rather have remained among the
beauties of nature, than have gone farther to
encounter the living beauties of these
half-barbarian
regions; but I was civilly urged on by
the attending slave, and so in a few moments
ushered into the presence of the widow and her
daughter.
They were seated in a large and lofty portico,
whose arches, overhung with flowers, opened
immediately into the garden, while here and
there, as the trees permitted, were seen gleaming
through, the light blue waters of the
Mediterranean
.
The mother was occupied in some
labor of the needle, adjusting or repairing what
seemed to me some military garment  the
daughter in arranging in groups, apparently to
please her own eye, some flowers which lay
spread in rich profusion upon a marble table. I
may suppose that I was taken to be some new
applicant for the alms of the rich and
benevolent
widow, as the daughter, to my vexation,
did not raise her head at my approach, and the
mother did but rise and move toward me with
a stately step  yet, I must add, with an
expression
of gentleness in the countenance.
When I had finished my introductory
narrative
,
and had declaimed of yourself and myself,
and of the whole tribe of Alexanders, from
those of Beth-Harem to those of Rome, I was
one by one greeted with many smiles of
welcome
,
and before I had ended was seated
between
the mother and daughter, both apparently
pleased to entertain a stranger from Rome, but
VOL. I. 3
still more, perhaps, one of our ancient and
honorable
house. The daughter, as I had spoken,
turned and looked upon me, and at first I
thought I had never seen anything quite so dark
and forbidding as her countenance; but when,
as I proceeded, it came to be lighted up with
emotion and with smiles, it at length put on a
more agreeable aspect, though still so dark an
olive I thought I had never seen upon the skin,
nor eyes so large and black set in the human
head. Among all who have thronged your
house from Judea, my mother, one so
extremely
Jewish as this young Israelite was
never seen there.
When I had further satisfied the widow
concerning yourself, giving her so minute
an account of your life and character, that
I fear some part at least must have been
invention rather than fact, and then had replied
to all the questions which were put to me
with a real interest in public affairs
concerning
Tiberius and the present power of Sejanus,
the mother said, that she had hoped the
provinces
would be more fortunate than the
capital
;
and indeed had hardly thought it possible
that, while there was one like Tiberius in
Rome, another like Pilate could have been
found for Judea; but  lately especially  it
was only too plain that we were to be the
victims of a tyrannic power hardly less than
they of Rome.
I replied, that where the head of a great
empire
was such a one as Tiberius, it was a
natural consequence that all in society like him
should float upon the surface. They would
crawl forth from the hiding places of their
vices, and grow great in the sunshine of their
mighty example and patron. Men like your
governor are common enough now in Rome,
though not always are they fortunate enough
to rise into place. For though the Emperor
himself chooses to play the tyrant, he is not so
ready as one might suppose to multiply himself
in his subordinates.
Is it not singular, then, said Anna, that
he persists in retaining Pilate in his office,
notwithstanding
his cruelties, and the enmity of
the people?
He may do that, I answered, in
agreement
with a sentiment he has been heard to
utter, that to change a cruel or rapacious
governor
of a province, is but to send a new and
hungry robber to take the place of one who has
already gorged himself, and is likely to rest and
sleep, as it is the nature of an animal to do
when he has filled himself; just as the poor
wretch covered with sores begged that the flies
already feeding might not be driven away,
since it would only make room for a hungrier
swarm.
That, said the young Jewess, is indeed
the sentiment of a heartless tyrant  of one
who is not only indifferent to the misery he
occasions
,
but can make a jest of it. If Rome
bears patiently with the greater monster, I trust
that Judea will not with the lesser.
Take heed, my daughter, said the widow,
how your righteous indignation finds too loud
and warm an expression. There is some truth
in the saying of Tiberius. We may drive
away Pilate only to be cursed with a worse
man.
That were impossible, cried the daughter.
Were you ever in Rome? said I.
No, replied the young girl.
I thought as much. Believe me, there are
worse men in Rome than Pilate. I know those
in the city  men, too, of note  who, were
they here, would put to open shame the deeds
of your present governor. Tiberius has proved
already a rare schoolmaster. His pupils abound
in the capital and throughout Italy.
And Capre is just at present the
schoolroom
,
said Anna.
Yes, and too small for the scholars who
crowd it. But, if you can pardon my
ignorance
,
of what have you to complain here in
Csarea? I have noticed on my arrival, and as
I passed through your city, only signs of
prosperity
and peace; nor since I left Rome, nor
indeed before for a long time, have I heard
anything
of evils which you are suffering under.
Ah, said Anna, with animation, I know
how it is with you Roman Jews. You grow to
be so in love with the greatness of your adopted
country, that you are soon strangely forgetful of
that from which you sprang. The wrongs and
sufferings of Judea, which cry to Heaven, are
not heard in the din of great events and the
whirl of pleasure. Many of you, so am I told,
deny your name and country, and put on the
dress and take the name of Roman. Pray
Heaven it is not so with you, for your face is
honest, and  In her earnestness she
suddenly
paused, and her dark skin was covered
with blushes that made her for the moment
beautiful. Her eye fell upon my Roman dress,
and she perceived that she had involved me in
the condemnation she had pronounced.
Almost enjoying her confusion, I said, I
confess my recreancy. But you will judge me
with more lenity, I am sure, when I tell you
how odious a thing it is to bear the name of
Jew in Rome. Were one born a full grown
man, he might, perhaps, find philosophy
enough to steel him against the taunts and
3 *
gibes of those about him. But with only the
tender sensibilities of a child  it is quite too
hard a yoke to bear. Roman boys taught me
early to both hate and despise the religion of
my fathers, which, as all the treatment I
received
on every side, and all the language I
heard assured me, would procure for me nothing
better than contempt and insult. My father, too,
had renounced all of Judaism that he could. He
never entered a synagogue; he observed none
of the Jewish rites or festivals; his phrases were
set to Roman measures; and his outward
homage
was paid with scrupulousness to pagan
institutions
,
though that he despised them in his
heart as much as he hated his own belief, I do
not doubt. Gold, gold was his only God; and
he cared not for man, but as he might help
or hinder him in that only worship of his heart.
Do not, my friends, accuse me of filial impiety
for these sentiments. For a parent who
provided
for me only gold, and whose only legacy was
gold, I can feel no very lively emotions of
gratitude
.
I received from him none of the signs
of a parent's love. He hardly knew me. As
he moved in the morning to the narrow vault
in Rome's vast centre, where he amassed his
riches, with his eyes looking inwards upon some
new scheme of wealth, blind and deaf to all
beside and without him, he would pass me in
the street as a stranger, though his eyes fell
directly on me; and if I made some childish
advances, which I soon learned not to do; a
frown and a rebuke for a troublesome vagrant
that I was, was all I ever received. As I grew
into years I drew no nearer to him, nor he to me.
Whatever was needful to my education in all
the wisdom of the Romans or the Greeks, was
bountifully supplied; nor was I denied that,
whatever it might be, which wealth could
procure
,
which was thought necessary to place me
on a level with the young men of the capital in
any pursuit or pleasure. But to my father's
counsels or business I was never admitted. Of
a single thought of his mind, or anxiety of his
heart, I was never permitted to be a sharer.
Here I was an annoyance and a hindrance. How
can you wonder, then, I added, that I grew up
not a Jew but a Roman? or how can you
greatly
blame me? You, my mother, will not, I am
sure, condemn me for this freedom. You, more
than I, know how to justify it. But when I
had said these things, I then drew another
picture
of my other parent, and showed how all
your endeavors in an opposite direction could
not but fail, with all Rome and my father against
you.
As I paused, the widow of Sameas said, It
is not strange, such being your nurture, that
Rome rather than Judea should possess your
heart; nor that you should be ignorant of the
condition of what to you must ever have been
a place so obscure or unknown as Csarea.
Let us hope that being now here, a witness as
you will be of our frequent oppressions and
insults, the love of Judea, which, sure I am,
you drew in with your mother's milk, will
revive, and unite you to her interests. Not
that I am an advocate for open resistance.
That as I deem were madness itself. We can
never oppose Rome but we must be crushed.
I mean only that by a wise and manly
perseverance
in an assertion of our just rights, both
before the governor and the Emperor at Rome,
we may at length perhaps obtain some redress,
and the removal of some burdens, which weigh
upon us with a weight too heavy to be borne.
But your numbers, I said, must be so
great, I should judge as a stranger, as to be a
sufficient protection against lawless violence or
rapacity on the part of the Roman governor.
With a military force not more numerous than
his, he must be weaker than the united
populace
.
Ah, replied Anna, there is the evil we
suffer under. We are not united. Even among
ourselves there are those who judge very
differently
of the measures we ought to pursue;
some are for giving blow for blow, while others
counsel moderation and forbearance. And then,
do you not know it? the greater part of our
population is Greek, and the Greek is an
enemy more bitter than even the Roman.
Quarrels continually arise, and blood is often
shed. The streets of Csarea have I seen
more than once, young as I am, to run with
the blood of those who have perished in these
wild combats, the Greeks always in league
with the Romans. Even now  but see, here
comes Philip, and with ill news too, if his face
may be read.
The young man, her brother, entered with
haste as Anna spoke, his countenance
expressive
of anything but agreeable intelligence.
He was above the common height, of a proud
and lofty air, and a very athlete in his firm and
well knit joints and massy limbs; while his
countenance, dark and lowering, made you
think him one designed by nature for scenes of
strife and war, or even for deeds of private
violence and revenge. He saluted me as his
mother made me known to him, with a look
and manner which declared that he at once
comprehended me. He immediately addressed
himself with vehemence to his mother and sister.
Our suit has been rejected, and the Greeks
have triumphed. 'T is as I said it would be.
A new insult is heaped upon us, and our ears
are again to ring with the hisses and laughter
of the city. Our warnings, our appeals, our
entreaties, for we even entreated, availed
nothing
to change his stubborn will. He sat on
his tribunal white as marble, hard as marble,
cold as marble. May God do so to me, and
more also,
Nay, nay, Philip, my son, curse not, said
his mother. To bear is a virtue and a duty,
as well as to act. Be not enslaved to your
passions. Another day and Pilate may be in a
better mood. He is not always thus.
Mother, mother, cried the young man,
if we bear more or longer, we shall deserve to
bear forever; if we yield now, were I a Roman,
I would no longer deign to use a Jew for my
footstool,  I would not spit upon him. Nor
will we yield. So says Eleazer, and so says
Simon.
Were they with you at your audience?
They were; and from a prophet's lips there
never came forth more moving words than
from those of the holy Simon. Yet upon
the pillars of the Hall they fell as persuasively
as on the ears of Pilate. His icy front never
once warmed or relaxed, or not till he uttered
his decree, and the base rabble, set on by
Lycias and Philus, laughed and shouted as we
turned away. How, my mother, would you
have liked to be there?
The mother made no reply; but tears fell
from her eyes. The face of the daughter
burned with the sense of indignity and wounded
pride. Philip, chafed by his own hot and hasty
temper, rose, and withdrew into the garden.
I followed him. Had I been easy of defeat, I
should instantly have been repelled by the
manner which he assumed, as he perceived
that I was near him. But, as I had my own
purposes to answer, I heeded him little. I
joined him in his walk, and soon succeeded in
convincing him that, in seeking his
conversation
,
I had some end before me of more dignity
than the mere gratification of an idle curiosity,
or the passing away of a few idle moments.
I gave him an account of myself, and of our
family, and in return solicited such information
as he was willing to impart concerning the
present condition of the city, and especially of
its Jewish inhabitants, in whom I could not but
feel a deep interest.
I know not, he said, with bitterness,
what interest a Roman can take in the
Jews of Csarea. I answered that,
perhaps
,
I was not so much a Roman as at first
appearance he might think me; that it was
true I had been almost taught from my infancy
to despise my own origin, and I had indeed
consorted chiefly with Romans, but that,
notwithstanding
the devotion I had manifested
for everything Roman, there was still a feeling
within that clung with a secret fondness to the
land and the stock, from which I had come,
and which had shown itself with a new force
since I found myself on the shores of Judea,
but especially since I had been beneath his
roof, and had heard what I had. He took this
very coolly, and seeming to regard what I had
said as words of civility, rather than anything
more serious, he replied, that I was too lately
in the country to be able to join myself with
intelligence to one party or another of the
inhabitants; that, if it had been my habit for
so many years to look upon the Jew with the
eye of a Roman, to wear the Roman garb,
and use the Roman tongue, and receive a
Roman's
homage, it was little likely my
feeling
of regard for the Jew in these remote
outposts
would be a very lasting one, seeing to
how much greater danger he is exposed here
than in Rome; nor was it to be much
wondered
at that it should be so with me. I
answered
,
that I was sure my interest was
as far as it went a sincere one; and if it
had become a stronger one just in proportion to
my better knowledge of my countrymen, and of
their state, it was probable, that as I knew
more, this sentiment would go on to increase in
strength; and I was obliged to acknowledge,
that I was, even to the present moment,
extremely
ignorant of the true circumstances of
the Jewish people. What, I asked, is the
present
difficulty here in Csarea? A particular
instance of injury on one side, and of oppression
on the other, if you will give me its history,
will pour more light and truth into my mind
than can come from any other source. He
then, with something more of regard in his
manner, invited me to follow him to a more
remote part of the garden, where the ground
rising to a gentle eminence, and crowned with a
small building, which served as a protection
from the rays of the sun, gave to those who sat
within a prospect of the whole extent of C
sarea
,
together with the harbor, and the
Mediterranean
beyond. Here we seated ourselves, and
Philip gave me the information for which I had
asked.
The present hostility of one part of our
city toward the other, he said, is
nothing
new to those who dwell here, nor does it
spring from anything new in the circumstances
in which you find us. We owe not all, but the
worst evils of our condition, to Herod the Great.
For, when he had, determined, among other
VOL. I. 4
magnificent projects, to found on this spot a
city in honor of Csar, instead,  as would
better have become him,  of filling it with
the people over whom he was set as king,
called hither a colony of Greeks, making out of
them, and those who came from Rome and
other parts of Italy, what was in truth a Pagan
city. Everywhere throughout our land, even
in Jerusalem itself, had he used every endeavor,
and every subtle art to change the institutions
of our nation, or secretly undermine them by
the grafting upon them of heathen usages.
Theatres, amphitheatres, and games, the
combats
of gladiators and of wild beasts, were to
be witnessed in all our considerable cities, and
even within the precints of Jerusalem itself.
The people were not without an affection for
the customs he thus brought in, and, even as
in the days of Moses and the prophets they
were prone to idolatry, so now were they
prompt to worship the new idols set up before
them by the great king. They were weary of
the distinctions of both belief and custom,
which separated them from the rest of the
world, which especially built up a wall of
partition
between them and the refined and polite
nations, the Romans and the Greeks. A large
proportion of the people, therefore, entered with
zeal into all the projects of Herod, which went
to make our nation agree, as far as possible,
with the other nations of the world. Here, in
Csarea, he designed even that the people
should be wholly Greek, if not in descent, at
least in language and manners. Hebrews were
not, indeed, by the laws of the place, excluded,
but none were encouraged to dwell here, but
such as were willing to call themselves
Herodians
.
And what more or better was to be
looked for from a base peasant of Ascalon? But,
as you may believe, when the walls of the city
were once up, and the port had been enclosed
from the sea, and inhabitants began to pour
in from every part of the world, the Jew
also,  not the Herodian, but the Jew as
well  was not blind to the advantages which
presented themselves here to his industry,
nor slow to seize upon them. Large
numbers
of such as were zealous for the law
accordingly
flocked hither from all parts of Judea,
and especially from Jerusalem, and here
pursued
their craft, and here built their
synagogues
.
But they were looked upon with an
evil eye,  even as they are in Rome or
Alexandria,  and quarrels, in no long time,
broke out, and served to increase the general
hatred, in which Greeks held the Jews, and the
Jews the Greeks. This spirit of hate we have
inherited from our parents; and fresh instances
of indignity, on the part of the Greeks, have
served to inflame it, and impart a tenfold
bitterness. It has never died away; and
when there has been an apparent peace, the
same amount of angry passion has been
running
beneath, ready at any moment to break
forth. What has within a few days
happened
,
to enrage so our people, you may deem
a slight and insufficient cause; but so thinks
not the true and loyal Jew. He would
die rather than renounce his ancient rights.
Listen a moment longer. No sooner was
Csarea filled in part by Jews zealous of the
law, than, in agreement with their customs,
they erected synagogues for their worship, and
in process of years have multiplied
themselves
in every part of the city. Now it has
happened, some of our tribe having been
among the earliest inhabitants of Csarea, that
they came to be possessors of lands and houses,
which then, indeed, were at the very outer
limits of the city, but now, by reason of
its growth, make its very centre. And our
chief synagogue, so Providence has willed,
stands, as you may have seen, not far from the
palace of Herod, upon a rising ground, where
it is seen of all who come in or go out, and has
long been, for that reason, an occasion of envy
to the Greeks. After many fruitless endeavors
to deprive us of it, they have devised a new
plan, which, because it is made to be a sign
of their devotion to Csar, Pilate will not
oppose, although persuaded that not devotion to
Csar, but malignity and envy toward the
Jews have moved them. They have declared
their purpose to erect a colossus to Tiberius,
and beg of Pilate the very spot where stands
the temple of our worship, which, they require,
shall be levelled with the ground, that the
image of a man and a monster, yet whom they
will by and by call a god, may stand upon its
ruins. Sooner may the great sea rise and
sweep, not Csarea only, but Judea, from the
face of the earth, than such a deed be
done, while a Jew lives to ward it off; that
were a judgment of God, and we would meet
with open arms the rushing flood; this, but the
wrath of wicked men, and, as before against
the hosts of Moab, so must we now rise up as
one man against the hosts of Rome. This, said
Philip, is the condition of Csarea, and such
the posture of our affairs. It offers little to
interest a stranger, least of all a Roman.
I told him, in reply, that it was not a thing
to choose with me, whether I should take part
with the oppressed; my nature impelled me
that way; that, notwithstanding my Roman
nurture, and Roman prejudices, I had still
observed
4*
with indignation the place, which in
Rome had been assigned the Jew, and the
manner in which, both by those in power and
the common citizen, he had been treated;
that nothing there could be done by so few
against so many, and I had waited, hoping that
time might, in its changes, bring some redress.
But I had waited in vain, and I could only cry
out against the fortune, which had made me a
Roman by birth, but a Jew by blood, and so
the heir of a hated and degraded name.
Finding
myself now upon the soil of my proper
country, and hearing what I now had from
himself, and what had been communicated by
others, I could not but confess that my heart
had grown warmer toward my native land,
and I should watch with interest the affairs
which were now in agitation.
Philip replied, that I should do well to
examine
for myself into the state of the city, and
by inquiry upon both sides, learn the exact
truth in respect to the particular dispute of
which he had spoken. He hoped I should
dwell with them a while, and from that point,
as a centre, make, my observations. But if,
upon a short survey, I found myself a Roman
still, I should do well, within a few days, to
take my departure, since with the same
certainty
that Pilate adhered to his present
resolution
,
would there be uproar, violence, and
bloodshed in Csarea.
I said, that no prospect of such an event,
even though I should remain neutral, would
drive me from Csarea, if for any other reasons
whatever it should be my wish to prolong my
residence, for I was a lover of anything else
better than a state of repose, and should choose
to stay and see the conflict carried on to its end.
But, if I might judge from my present feelings
and convictions, and if nothing adverse
occurred
,
I should be ready to take part with him
and his friends in any measures they might
think it proper to adopt.
I can see an approving smile light up your
countenance, my mother, as you read these
words, just such a smile as came over the
features
,
stern and dark as they were, of Philip.
He took my hand with passion as I ended,
saying
,
he hoped God would confirm me in my
present purpose, and turn my heart wholly
toward
the deliverance of Judea. What was
about to happen in Csarea was truly a small
matter, but it might prove the beginning of
mighty revolutions. A spark had set whole
cities on fire. What shall be done here, may
stir up those of Jerusalem to deeds of the same
sort. They especially bear Pilate no love for
insults put upon them many years ago. Now
will be the time for vengeance. If I judge not
our people amiss, they need but such an
example
as we shall set them to show themselves
worthy of their fathers.
I assured him, as he said this, that I should
now remain in Csarea till the present affair
was ended, putting off my journey to
Beth-Harem
;
and though I should not consciously
interpret
falsely the signs that might appear, I
should not be sorry if I felt myself bound to
remain here rather than go farther. I was a
stranger to those in Beth-Harem, as well as to
all else in Judea, and my only tie was that
which now bound me so agreeably to C
sarea
.
Are you, then, asked Philip, with
eagerness
,
on the way to Beth-Harem, and do you
know the great Onias, who truly may be called
the prince of that region?
He was both amazed and overjoyed when he
learned that Onias was the brother of my own
mother; amazed, as he said, that I should to so
late a period have remained a stranger to one so
great as he, and my own uncle, and overjoyed
that through me possibly he might be able to draw
Onias over to take part in their affairs. Yet,
he added, a shade passing over his countenance,
it will not be much that a Roman, or at best,
but a half-Jew, can do for us with Onias.
There is only one thing Onias scorns more than
a Roman, and that is a Roman Jew. I told
him, that, perhaps, before I should see Onias, if I
saw him at all, I might, by the events here in
Csarea, be converted to a veritable Hebrew,
one whom he would not disdain to take by the
hand and admit to his counsels, in which case my
services should not be wanting. Philip hoped
it might be so; and then, after more
conversation
of the same sort, he rose, and taking me
first to different parts of the extensive garden,
brought me at length to the house, where we
found the mother and daughter awaiting us, at
a table spread with the best hospitality of the
East.
I enjoyed the repast, my mother, I must
confess
,
not less than some of those in Rome, at
which Drusus has presided, and where I have
reclined upon patrician couches. Never, indeed,
did I enjoy myself or my companions more.
Yet am I the same person who say this? Am
I he, who but so little while ago shunned a Jew
as a Jew shuns a leper? Am I he, whose
highest
ambition hitherto hath been to ape the
Roman, talk like him, walk like him, dress like
him, smile like him, frown like him, and who
now am the inmate of Jews,  Jews, not of
Rome, who are somewhat, but of Judea,
who are the refuse and offscouring of the earth,
the loathing of the Roman, the scorn of the
Greek, the hatred of all men; a people fit but
to be the drudges and slaves of politer nations?
Truly, I doubt if I be Julian, the son of
Alexander
,
who but so late left Rome on his Eastern
travels, the bosom friend of Quintius Hirpinus
and Appius Lucretius, his fellow-travellers, both
sons and companions of princes, and have not
been, by some strange power, changed to another
nature, and another person. Of another nature
I certainly am,  at least of another mind; or
rather, perhaps, I have come or am coming to a
knowledge of my true mind, which in men
oftentimes
lies buried, as I think, out of sight,
till events, or the will of God, reveal it. Well,
most beloved mother, of one thing I am sure,
that whatever change of this sort has come upon
me, thou art the happier for it. Now thou hast
hopes that I shall not forever bring shame upon
my descent and my kindred; that I shall now,
at length, perhaps, set before me the great and
excellent of my native land for my examples, in
place of those of Rome; some holy David, or
Ahab, or Haman, if my memory be right, and try
upon such steps to mount up to honor and fame in
the eyes of my proper countrymen. May that
come to pass, whatever it may be, which shall
impart to thee the greatest pleasure.
I have now passed in this ocean capital, this
Jewish Rome, two days; and they have not
been wholly barren of events or pleasures. But
what chiefly they have impressed upon my
mind is the speedy certainty of riot and violence
within the city. The mutual hostility of the
different
portions of the inhabitants I find to be
bitter
to an extreme degree. The signs are many,
and distinct enough, of approaching tumult. No
Jew passes a Greek, but he must take an insult;
and if it be returned, it then comes to blows,
and others join, and the fight rages till they are
separated by the Roman horse. The
synagogues
,
often beautiful with marble, or
sculptured
wood, have been defaced by filth, which
the licentious rabble have hurled upon them,
when protected by the night. So, too, have
the houses of the principal men among them
been dealt with in the like manner. Yet, of
all this the Roman power takes no note, but
looks on, apparently pleased with the violences
and indignities which are put upon the
barbarians
,
or their only care is that there shall be no
general combats; and to this end, the guard of
the governor has been doubled, and ere the
decree
to raze the devoted synagogue shall go into
effect, a legion, it is so reported, will be drawn
from Jerusalem. Philip, in the mean time, with
others of the principal citizens, is working in
secret to make ready, in the last resort, such a
defence as shall, perhaps, strike Pilate as too
formidable to be trifled with. Yet, it is their
purpose, that no general resistance by arms shall
be made, till all other means have been tried
to soften the obstinacy of the governor.
The Jews, after a consultation among those
who are chief among them, have resolved upon
another and more numerous deputation to Pilate.
Five hundred of their number, headed by the
priests and elders of the synagogues, are
appointed
again to present themselves before the
governor, and intercede for the people and their
religion. All have agreed in this measure, but
it has been chiefly urged by the Herodians, who
are unwilling that the present peaceful order of
things should be disturbed. They are for quiet
and peace, on whatever terms of submission,
and for adopting, to the farthest extent possible,
without the absolute surrender of their national
religion, the customs and usages of both Roman
and Greek; it being with them, as it hath been
with others whom I could name elsewhere, a
point of vanity to strip themselves of
everything
,
that by its strangeness should proclaim
them Jews, retaining little but the name, and a
very slight observance of their sabbaths,
fast-days
,
and other laws and institutions of the like
kind. They advocate forbearance and delay
now, for the reason especially that the games of
Herod are just about to be celebrated, and
ought not to be disturbed. The more zealous
Jews have united with them, because, for the
most part, they would sincerely deprecate a
general
quarrel, in which the affair now seems
likely enough to terminate, and hope, by a fair
show of temperance and patience, to carry their
end against the Greeks. But, among these last,
there is a small number,  small compared with
the whole,  but composed of men who set
their religion before all other things, who will
suffer nothing to be done, which shall so much
as seem to cast contempt upon it, if even by
the sacrifice of their lives the evil can be
averted
.
These are men the most singular I have
ever yet met with. Religion is to them, as
they say, and as one sees, more than life; yet
they are filled at the same time with the darkest,
fiercest passions. The very temper and soul of
the assassin seem lodged within them, so that to
defend some ceremony or law of their worship,
from slight or insult, they would not pause to
involve a whole city in war and bloodshed.
Philip, I need hardly say, is one of these; while
his mother and sister, though belonging to the
number of the zealous, yet are truly desirous to
avoid open violence. He rather desires it, that
he may revenge himself and his religion upon
such as have oppressed and injured them. If,
VOL. I. 5
my mother, thou wouldst know upon what side,
and leagued with whom stands thy unworthy
son, who as yet may be termed little more than
a proselyte of the gate,  he can hardly to-day
inform thee. He is at present rather a
lookeron
than an actor; and on which side he will
by-and-by find himself, he pretends not to say.
Of one thing, however, is he certain, that he
will stand guardian in any time of danger over
the widow of Sameas and her dark-skinned
daughter. Anna thinks thus;  and she makes
pretensions to a great gift of discernment;
Julian
,
she said to her mother, seems little
enough of our side, if one judges by the
costume
,
the air, and by words that lie on the surface
of discourse. But by the motions of his
countenance
last night, when he sat listening to the
words of Simon, am I sure that his heart must
ever be on the side of the injured; and by
what he did not say, am I sure that, either
because
of the early instructions of his mother, or
because of his very nature, it is only the God
and the faith of Moses that will ever give him
rest. He wants more than he has. And where
shall he find it but here among us? So said
the wise and penetrating Anna. Her mother
smiled, and nodded, as if assenting. I only said in
reply something that implied my thought, that
among the Jews, as among the Romans, there
was too much in their religion of what was only
ceremonial and barren, that too many seemed to
think it enough to meet the letter of some dead
ritual, while the practice of virtue was
overlooked
.
She only looked sad and sorrowful, as
I said this, which was to me as if she had
confessed
that it was true enough of great
proportions
of her people. In her own heart, I knew
it was sufficiently otherwise, though I could not
say so. There is, I am sure, truth and faith
enough in her to save a city.
Csarea is now filling with the numbers of
those from the country round about, who are
pouring in to witness the games of Herod;
numbers greater than usual, drawn now not only
by a desire to see the sports, but by curiosity
and interest concerning the present difference.
Philip assures me that the zealous are arriving
from great distances.
When some new events have happened, I
will write again; till then, farewell.
In this slight vein, in those days of my more
than Egyptian darkness, did I open myself to
my mother; who did not, thereupon, deny and
disown me, as she might justly enough have done,
but had patience with me, and by her timely
counsels
strove, and not wholly in vain, to carry up to
a full and perfect growth those feelings of love
toward
my native country, which then just began
to show themselves. In this manner, also, like a
child, did I suffer myself to be afflicted, by the
general hatred entertained toward our people by
the other nations of the world; a hatred of which
I had more reason to boast, seeing that it had
its birth in those religious distinctions which
exalted
us above every other people. Had I
possessed
any power of reflection, also, or any
knowledge of their writings who anciently had
discoursed of the Jews, I should have perceived
that all of this hatred and contempt, that had not
its natural origin in envy of our superior
advantages
,
was to be charged upon the lies, which,
first engendered in the brain of the execrable
Manetho,  fruitful of lies as the Nile of
reptiles
,
had then descended an inheritance of
falsehood and error through succeeding
generations
,
but which had ever been greedily seized
upon, and with unabating malignity constantly
transmitted to those who were to come after.
Even the Romans, notwithstanding their
greatness
of character, and notwithstanding so many
families of our nation had lived among them
with distinction, and had even been entertained
as favorites in the very household of the Csars,
were not ashamed to treat us with the like
injustice
,
and continually reproach us with our
origin
and our laws. But the wickedness and
injustice
were not greater on their part, than were both
the vanity and the baseness on mine, so manifest
in my courting the favor and regard of those who,
at the very same time, so openly despised the
people from whom I sprung. As you shall soon
learn, however, I was presently cured of a folly,
which, I doubt not now, made me to be scorned
by the very persons who seemed most to flatter
me; for he can never be held as worthy of a
real esteem, who appears to be ashamed of his
own kindred.
Again I draw from my letters to my mother;
for although my recollection is exact and vivid of
those days and events, so that, as I think, I
could set them down in order, applying to that
source alone, yet in this the beginning of my
history, I shall, I doubt not, more perfectly
comply with your wishes, my kinsmen of
Rome, if I appear before you in the very form
in which I painted myself in these remote days.
It was thus then, the second time, that I
addresed myself to the blessed Naomi.
5*
II.
I said
, my mother, that I would write
again so soon as new events had happened.
That necessity presented itself immediately
upon my sending to you the letter which I last
wrote,  if those may by called new events
which are to be witnessed, not so much in
saparate acts or occurrences, as in the ripening
of the time toward some general and final
issue. Such seems to me to be the condition
of Csarea. Large numbers of the people
indeed, both Jews and Greeks, are little
concerned by this quarrel with the Governor,
being wholly engrossed by the expected games,
either preparing to attend them with every
circumstance of display, or to receive into their
dwellings as visitors during their continuance,
the friends and kinsfolk who make it their five
years' custom to assemble at Csarea at this
great festival. But greater numbers, however,
although together with the rest they look
forward
to the games with pleasure, and to the
entertainment of both friends and strangers, are
much more deeply engaged by the difficulties
of which I have already given you some
account. The games may occupy their hands,
but other interests, hopes, and fears are busy at
their hearts. Especially is this the case with
the Jewish portion of the population. No one
would dream that less than an empire were at
hazard, to judge by the demeanor of this
people. In truth they seem to me at all times a
solemn tribe; and this feature of their general
character is darkened to a gloom like that of
night, by the present aspect of their affairs.
Their motion through the street is slow and
cautious, with eyes cast down, or talking with
one another in low and secret tones  turning
continually with sudden movement the head to
this side and that, as if expecting instantly the
blow of an assassin, or the insult of a Greek.
I confess myself amused not a little as I watch
them. But if this is so with the Jews
generally
or rather with the more zealous
portion
of them  how much more is it true of so
fierce a spirit as Philip. Not the dark Casca
nor the lean Cassius ever carried in their eyes
what so threatened States with ruin and revolt.
Although I cannot but judge his cause in the
main a right one, yet can I not work up
myself
to his pitch of fury; but, on the contrary,
do what in me lies, partly by reason, and partly
by a lighter rhetoric, to soothe his almost
disordered
mind. My success has been much
such as it would have been, had I essayed to
stem the northern tide as it rushes in at the
open mouth of the Port, making colossal Rome
and Asia to tremble on their bases.
On the morning of the day which preceded
the opening of the games, and which was to
witness the hearing of the Jewish deputation
before Pilate, the air being close and oppressive,
I sought the cooler walks of the Garden, and
reaching the little arbor of which I have spoken,
took out my tablets and wrote. I had been
not long thus engrossed, when I was
interrupted
by the sudden entrance of Anna, with
a countenance more than usually expressive of
anxiety. She seated herself near me, saying,
as she did so, I have come seeking you, and
am glad to have found you here, and yet I
hardly know why I have come, and I fear lest
I deprive you of time that you need for more
important objects. I assured her that I was
performing no duty of more importance than
writing to my mother, and that her own name
was the last from my pen; of what I had said
concerning
her I could not inform her; it was,
however
,
no evil report, she might well believe. But
what, I asked, was it which disturbed her, for her
countenance spoke of some new alarm. It is
nothing new, she answered, nor anything,
I fear, in which you will think you can serve
us, and I hardly can say why I apply to you
yet you have inspired us with a strange
confidence
,
and we think that because you are from
Rome, while still you are of our own race, you
will judge of our affairs more justly than we
can do, who are so near, that everything
appears of perhaps an unnatural size and
interest
.
In a word, my mother begs you, and I
join her in the entreaty, to use whatever power
you may possess, to moderate the zeal of Philip,
and hold him back from aspiring to be a leader
in these affairs. I, alas, can do nothing; for
no sooner does he appear with that face of his,
and his burning words, than I am straightway
kindled with his ardor, and grow as hot as
he. I told her, that what she had now
asked of me, I had already of my own mind
attempted, but with no good effect whatever.
Philip will take no counsellor to his bosom,
beside his own impatient spirit, and Simon,
who, good as he is, is mad as Philip himself.
Mad!  Julian? Oh, not quite mad
My dear Anna, you cannot yourself bear
the whole truth.
I will try  now say on  you must
forgive
me.
Take, however, Anna, all that I would
say, and not a part only. Philip is mad only
in his impetuosity and haste; not wholly in
the great purposes which he cherishes. I blame
him not that he is restive, as a Jew, beneath
Roman oppression, such as I now see it with
my own eyes to be. I can with him scorn
the base spirits who, with new submissions,
are waiting to purchase the forbearance of the
Governor. Were I a born Jew of Csarea,
I would with Philip be a Jew in the full
possession
and enjoyment of my rights, or I would
renounce together my faith and my country.
A Jew, with the name only, is one who, with
wonderful folly invites insult from the whole
world, while from that which brings this
universal
contempt upon his head, he derives
neither profit nor pleasure. In this, Anna, I
speak the words of experience. I would not
that Philip should be the fool that I have
been. You will be glad to know, in respect to
myself, that in the few days I have been here, I
have lived years, and that the Demon who has so
long possessed me is departing. I am become a
Jew in feeling, at least, as well as in name.
Henceforward, if I am still to bear reproach, it
shall not be for nought. Such at least is the
resolve
of to-day. You now cannot doubt that I am
on Philip's side, that with him I would fight
for the fair rights and the honored name.
Ah! how I bless you, cried Anna with
glowing cheeks, for these words. You then
think with Philip, that he is right
But you came to me, Anna, did you not,
that I might oppose him? She answered
nothing, but only covered her face with her
hands.
I think Philip to be both right and wrong,
I then continued, as, you would see yourself,
if you would reflect one moment. In his
principles
and general purpose, he is right, so I
judge; in his present action, he is wrong. He
is over hasty. He will but inflame both the
Governor and the Greeks to visit upon your part
of the population some new violence, while he
is in no condition to resist them, or take the
least advantage of the contest that may ensue.
He can display all the courage and spirit of one
who is ready to perish for his rights; but I fear
to suffer  will be all that he can achieve.
Do you not feel that it is so?
I do believe it, she answered. It is my
constant thought when alone; but the presence
of my brother drives it away. Where he is I
can only feel. I am never myself but by halves.
Wisdom, I fear, I shall never reach.
Wisdom, Anna, is not for so young as you.
I am older by many years than you, yet I have
not so much as come in sight of it. What I
have now been saying, may sound very wise,
but I know not if it be so. I can only say that
I think as I do now. I pretend not to know.
It is a new thing for me to be appealed to for
counsel, who have hitherto been myself a
dependant
upon others.
As I said these words, steps rapidly
approached
,
and Philip entered the little building
where we sat. His countenance expressed a
mind disturbed and angry.
How now, Philip, said Anna, what new
evil have you to report with that ill-boding
brow? Surely Pilate refuses not to hear us?
No, my sister, it is not that,  but worse.
Pilate refuses not to hear. But we refuse to be
heard. Digest that.
How, Philip, can that be? Was it not in
full assembly of our people, that the five
hundred
were deputed once more to wait upon the
Governor? Who can have revoked that decree
but the people themselves? And they have not
done it.
The decree hath not been revoked, and the
five hundred proceed this day to the judgment
seat of Pilate, but with their tongues cut out
and their hands bound.
Speak not in riddles, Philip  what is it?
It is true, Anna, as I have said, we go with
our tongues out, and our hands bound.
Neither Simon, nor Eleazer is our mouth-piece,
but  whom think you? Sylleus!
Our tongues are out indeed, exclaimed his
sister; whose bad work has it been?
Of all  save a sacred few. And now,
may
Nay, Philip, swear not, said Anna, and
laid her hand across his mouth. He thrust it
rudely from him, and again began his usual
oath; but his affection for his sister obtained the
mastery, and he suddenly paused, kissed her
cheek, and asked her forgiveness. The kiss put
to flight all her remaining resolutions of
moderation
,
and changed her for the moment to but
the counterpart of himself.
It might indeed, then, she cried, as well
be that we were heard not at all. A Roman is
as good a Jew as that unbelieving Sadducee
our Julian here were a better.
Who, I pray you, I then asked, is this
Sylleus that it so inflames you he should fill
this office?
Have you not heard of him? said Philip.
But I forget you are but newly come to C
sarea
.
Sylleus leads the Herodians; and what
with their own numbers, and the faint-hearted
among us of the stricter sort, it has been an
easy victory to place him at the head of this
embassy. I ought not in reason mayhap to
VOL. I. 6
have looked for other issue than this. Yet I
cannot but feel it, for it brings us bound hand
and foot, to bide the will of Pilate. Peace, not
truth and right, is the watch-word with these
slaves with souls less in bigness than a grain of
mustard-seed, or the point of a needle, who
would, like their true ancestor, sell their
birthright
for a mess of pottage. Surely,
now-a-days
there can be no shame like that of being
a Jew  apostates all  hypocrites and slaves.
So did he run on, full of violence till he had
spent himself, and exhausted his stores of a
proud and indignant passion. I could not but
honor the feelings from which it all came,
growing up, as they did, from that deep root of
religious reverence, which, planted in his youth,
had been duly nurtured, till it had spread
throughout his whole nature, and drew
everything
to itself. Still I was sufficiently conscious
that his was a virtue in its excess  in such
excess that it was changed almost to a vice.
His religion seemed to me little more, or better,
than a blind and dangerous superstition. I
dared to say to him a part of what I thought.
I said, that, according to my belief, he would
gain more, by a more moderate course of action
that the laws of his own faith would be
better
observed, not to speak of a true policy, by
conduct which should exhibit signs of patience
and forbearance, and a willingness sometimes to
yield a little, for the sake of peace; especially
when so to yield was not to surrender anything
that could be called a principle, or a point of
faith; but was only bending for a time before
the force of circumstances. I too would have
him to be a Jew, and that not in name only,
but in every act of his life, and purpose of his
soul; but I would have him consider whether
by a too violent and passionate demeanor, he
did not, in truth, do a more treasonable act
toward
his religion and nation, than by one of
more calmness. Pilate, surrounded by his
soldiers
,
was not easily to be turned from his
course, nor were the Greeks so few, or so weak,
as to be deterred from what they had
undertaken
by any show of opposition, which, so far
as I could judge, it was in the power of the
Jews to make. It truly seemed to me, that for
the present, at least, the affairs of his people
would prosper more in the hands of Sylleus,
than in those of Simon.
Philip listened as I spoke, and without those
vehement exclamations of wonder or contempt,
with which he is accustomed to interrupt those
who utter opinions contrary to his own. But I
could see by the fixed and grave expression of
his countenance, no muscle moving, that he
heeded, no more than the marble seat on which
he sat, the words he had heard.
The Law, said he, given of God to our
Fathers, is no human instrument, it is no fabric
wrought by the hands of men to be altered at
our pleasure, or winked out of sight at our will
or convenience. It is the law of the God of
Moses, and therefore wholly right, and to be
obeyed and honored by those who receive
it, in the spirit and in the letter, by the
observance
of its rites, by the keeping of its
festivals
,
by the reverence of its Sabbaths, by the
payment of its tythes  by the worship of him
who founded it, and the hatred of those who
would subvert it. The proper Jew is one who
not only loves, but hates. The measure of
contempt
,
that is by other nations served out to
him, he returns heaped up and running over.
The Jew's bond of allegiance to the Jew is not
a more binding one, than that which leagues
him in everlasting hatred against the gentile.
Our ancestors, who with the besom of
extermination
and death swept the land of their
inheritance
of its accursed tribes, and spared
neither the sucking child, nor the tender maid,
nor the hoary head, are an example unto us of
our day, how we should deal with any, who
shall dare to set up their rest on the consecrated
soil of this kingdom, not of man, but of God.
And even as he of old was but a traitor, an
apostate, and a rebel, who held back his hand
from the slaughter of the people whom God had
devoted,  the Amorite and the Hittite and the
Perizite, even so is he who doth the same now.
The idolatrous Canaanite of our day is the
Roman
and the Greek. The hand of God will
ever be against us, till by the hand of those
who love his law they be driven from the land,
where their presence is as blasting and mildew.
I have waited, Roman, for such a day as this,
and now it is come I hail it, and give God
thanks. I dare not disobey the voice that
sounds in my ear. As for Pilate and his legions,
I care for them no more than for the chaff driven
of the wind. I and the few who are with me
may fall a sacrifice before that altar, on which
the servants of the Most Hight have ever freely
offered up themselves. But, if for the present
it will not always be in vain. Others, and
other times shall reap the harvest.
Such consequences may ensue, I replied,
it cannot be gainsaid. The least events, so
esteemed once, have proved nothing less than
the corner stone of changes which have amazed
the world. But no eye can discern the
possibility
of aught but suffering and death, in a
revolt like this, without concert and without
preparation. You will only furnish fresh
victims
to the cruelty of Pilate.
For myself, answered Philip, I am ready
6 *
to be a victim  I should not fall unhonored
nor unavenged.
But suppose, Philip, your fall should drag
down also to the same ruin  mother and sister.
There is little mercy, they say, in Pilate's heart.
Philip's stern countenance relaxed, and he gazed
fondly upon Anna, who taking his hand and
forgetful of everything but him, said, let no
fear, my brother, lest a little flower should
perchance
be trodden into the dust, lay restraint
upon thy spirit. When God and Judea call, go
on thy way, let perish what will that shall be
under thy feet.
To say anything more I perceived to be
worse than useless. We rose from our seats and
in silence wound our way together to the house.
At the ninth hour the deputation was to wait
upon the governor. Philip soon left us to join
his friends in their consultations; I did not
accompany
him, as he desired and urged me to do,
but answered him I should be present at the
hearing before the governor; in the mean time
I should walk forth and observe the temper and
behavior of the people.
I accordingly took my way toward the
principal part of the city which as yet I had
scarcely seen. I was surprised, as I proceeded,
by its extent, and the signs of wealth and taste
even, in the forms of edifices, in the width of
the streets, and the solidity of the pavements.
The buildings of the city most remarkable for
the costliness of their materials, for the
observance
of the best rules of Roman and Grecian
art in their structure, for the grandeur of their
parts, and the spaciousness of the grounds about
them, are those which were erected by Herod
the Great. As I have before said, I believe,
they were built in too great haste to be built
well, and there are everywhere to be discerned
signs of weakness and decay; but they
everywhere
also give abundant evidence in their
forms, proportions, and general elegance of
design
,
that the mind that projected them had
been well instructed in the best science of the
capital of the world. Everything in a word is
here Roman or Greek; nothing Jewish. Even
the synagogues, although they are here as
everywhere
of peculiar form, indicating thereby to
whom and what they belong, are yet both in
the structure of the outer walls, of the inner
porches, and the central edifice itself with its
columns and roof, altogether conformable to the
principles of Roman models. And truly, except
the taste in such things had been borrowed from
Rome, it is easy to believe there would have
been but little to be witnessed among this
people
;
for it must be confessed, my mother, that
whatever portions of undoubted truth they may
be in possession of, they are in other respects
somewhat rude and barbarous. They possess,
it cannot be denied, that which is most
valuable
;
yet were it desirable also that they had
added some of the graces and refinements of
life, which give so real a beauty to the Italian
and Grecian cities and provinces. A little while
since and I should not have lamented this,
though I might have noted it. Now I sincerely
deplore it, as it tends to deprive them of the
estimation among the rest of mankind which is
justly their due. A virtuous man loses his
power, if his countenance and manner wear not
an accordant expression. And so truth methinks,
religious as well as every other that is of worth,
should be clothed with beauty. That can
hardly be pure truth which shocks and offends
by its ugliness. It is adulterate.
But of all the edifices, which adorn the
city, the Palace of Herod, and now the abode
of our Governor, is the most conspicuous for its
vastness and richness. It would not be mean
in Rome. As I stood contemplating it, little
heeding those in the street who were passing
and repassing me, a voice at my side addressed
me;
I perceive, Sir, that you are a stranger by
the manner in which you examine an object,
which to us who dwell here is old and familiar.
This magnificent structure we owe to the
generosity and public spirit of the Great Herod;
truly called the Great. He was too great to be
hemmed in by the boundaries of Judaism; and
though born a Hebrew aimed to be as much a
Greek, and by Hercules, a Roman too, as well
as a Greek. Pardon my freedom. But having
little else to do, I am at your service to give
you any information you may desire. I am
thankful to him who can procure me
occupation
.
Though dressed in the Roman fashion,
yet, Sir, I perceive you are a Jew. But that
need make no difference; I am a Greek, it is
true, as you on your part may see; and you
may suppose not unreasonably that I hold a
Jew in small esteem, seeing how things go in
Csarea; but, Sir, I consider man first
afterwards
only whether he be Jew, Greek, or
Roman. What think you?
I was so rejoiced that the noise he had made
at length ceased, that, though inwardly I fear
I used him hardly, I complimented him on the
last sentiment he had uttered, and told him I
thought it worthy of a philosopher, which he
seemed to be.
Truly I flatter myself, he replied, I am
somewhat of a lover of wisdom, but to say sooth,
it is not always so easy to distinguish wisdom
from folly, even as it is not so easy sometimes
to know a philosopher from a fool. I aim at
wisdom, but I often doubt whether I do not
hit folly, and be not a fool.
I could not help thinking that he had arrived
at one wise conclusion, and turned to depart;
but he was not to be so easily shaken off;
he followed, and continued to pour forth a
stream of talk, by turns wise and absurd, but
always rapid and noisy. He commented upon
every building we passed remarkable for its
beauty or its purpose, and named to me every
citizen we met, Jew, or Greek, informing me
as to his condition, affairs, office, or wealth.
As we came before the devoted Synagogue
in our walk, it furnished him with an
inexhaustible
theme. He said that not Pilate
himself knew better what would happen than
he. Nay, not so well; for Pilate knows not at
once his own mind; but the Greeks know
theirs, and that it will be no impossible thing
to force it upon the Governor. And before a
few days are passed, Sir, these walls will lie
level with the pavement. This cannot be
agreeable to you Jews. It is always an evil
to belong to the weaker party; but then you
know the philosophic virtue of submission to
what is inevitable. I trust your people will
manifest their wisdom in a timely and politic
acquiescence.
I asked my unavoidable companion, how he
could feel so sure of Pilate's determination,
especially as he was to hear the Jews again to
day, by some of their people who were more
inclined to accommodation.
Human nature, Sir, human nature,  was
his reply; who knows not the Greeks? and
who knows not Pilate? Prophecy is often
nothing more than a shrewd judgment. The
wise know what shall come to pass, from what
already is, and has been. I confess, I see
everything
that shall be these few coming days with
the same plainness as if it had already
happened
.
There will be sad uproar, believe me.
I said, I hoped not.
Ah yes, he rejoined, it is a good thing
to hope; but one hopes less as he grows older
and wiser. I know a few things, but I hope
in nothing.  A fair day to you, most worthy
Cataphilus, cried my companion suddenly to
one who passed, gaily and richly dressed,
How is it with your great master to day?
I trust he is in health.
He is well, replied the other, but he is
closely shut up with despatches from the
Emperor
Excuse my haste  my companion
was about to lay hold upon a fold of his robe
I will say that Zeno inquired for his
welfare
;
and forced himself away.
That man, said my new friend, is ever
in a hurry; he is, you must be informed,
Pilate's chief steward, and knows many things,
if one could but get them out. But it is just
so with all in this noisy place. I can scarce
find a man who will allow me more than a few
words, ere he must perforce be off to keep some
appointment. It was not so in Athens. There,
one could find a few who would give you an
hour or so in the markets, or at the corner of a
street, or at the bath. But here, great Jupiter,
I surely deem that a pot of Tyrian dye, or a
bale of Egyptian cotton is held to be of more
value than would be a discourse from Plato,
and a merchant more honored than a
philosopher
.
But that Cataphilus, whom we just met,
as I was saying, he has a master, and that
master is Pilate, and Pilate has a master, who
is Tiberius. Those despatches from Rome,
I trow, give him some trouble. He stands,
I doubt, on slippery ground. But this in your
ear. We Greeks make use of him, but we
esteem him not any more than you Jews.
Now, my young Hebrew, we approach the
market
,
and a sight it is, I assure you; there
behold
!
That too was the work of Herod.
Few things in Athens are finer.
It was a noble structure indeed; and the
whole scene was imposing and grand, owing
both to the buildings and the crowds of people
who thronged the streets and squares. We
stood where we had paused, observing and
admiring, till being too much jostled and
incommoded by the swift moving currents of
passengers, we withdrew a few paces to the
steps of a portico, where we could see and
converse
without interruption. As we thus stood
here, and Zeno enlarged with volubility upon
the various objects before us, our attention was
suddenly arrested by the loud tone of a voice
commencing its prayers in the Hebrew tongue.
I turned to the quarter whence the sound
proceeded
,
and just within an arch of the Portico
hardly separated from the street, there stood a
Jew with face uplifted, and hands spread out,
uttering at the top of his voice his noon-day
prayers; his eyes were so turned up as to give
him the appearance of one in an agony, and his
voice seemed to come forth from the passages
of his nose rather than from those of the
mouth. So distorted was his whole
countenance
by the sanctimonious expression he had
assumed, that I did not at first recognise my
companion on board the vessel. But as soon
as I had made the discovery, I asked the Greek,
who the person might be who was so diligent
and noisy at his devotions. Zeno was amazed
at my ignorance.
VOL. I. 7
What, said he, hast thou been but a day
in Csarea, and hast thou not heard of
Ben-Ezra
,
the holiest Jew in all the city, the very
head of the Pharisees, and with the common
people of more sway than either Simon or
Eleazer? Daily as the shadow of yonder dial
falls upon the sixth hour, may this trumpet
tongue be heard in the market of Csarea; a
proclamation of holy zeal to the fools who
cannot see, though they have eyes  of false
and vain pretence to those who know how to
use the eyes God has given them. See, his
worshippers are gathering to listen. Such
prayers never reach the gods. Perhaps it is
not meant they should. They are answered in
the effect they have upon these asses who are
crowding round with their long ears erect.
Let us away. This voice puts to flight my
philosophy.
So we passed on and mingled in the thickest
of the throng of buyers and sellers  now in
greater multitudes than usual, owing to the
games. With almost all the affair of the
synagogue was the subject of conjecture or
dispute; and from very few did I hear a word
of encouragement for the poor Jew. All sorts
of opprobrious language was poured forth upon
our unhappy people, and prophecies freely
uttered of the destruction of the building before
a few more days should pass.
You see how it is, my little Jew, cried
Zeno, as we turned away from some of these,
there is no hope for you. The gods have
decreed your defeat, and you are defeated.
Better trouble thyself no more about it.
Accompany
me to the Amphitheatre to view the
preparations that are going on, and leave your
bewildered countrymen to Pilate. Be assured
he will take care of them.
I made him comprehend at length, after
repeated attempts to avert the flow of his Greek,
that I was too much interested in the fate of
my countrymen and friends to be absent on
such an occasion. He took leave of me with
reluctance, but not till he had learned where
and with whom I dwelt, and had promised to
bestow upon me more of his company.
I returned to the house of Sameas. Anna
and her mother I found employed in domestic
affairs; wherefore I withdrew to my apartment,
and gave myself even a higher pleasure than
their society could have imparted, by
conversing
through my pen with you, my mother. But
the time has come when it behoves me to
repair
to the Hall of Pilate, that I may not lose
what shall there take place between the Greek
and the Jew before the Roman Judge.
III.
The
scene has passed; and I am again
returned
to my apartment and my tablets, to
describe
to you all that has happened.
The Hall of Judgment, as the Csareans
term that building, where the Roman Governor
hears and judges those causes which come
before
him, stands not far from the palace of Herod,
and, indeed, although it faces in an opposite
direction, and is separated apparently from it, is
yet connected with it by covered and secret
passages
,
so that communication can be quickly
made from one to the other. Pilate, they say
here, being ever fearful lest some revenge, either
public or private, should be taken upon him for
his violences committed against communities or
individuals, contrived these and divers other
secret methods of escape from one building to
another, and from one part of the city to
another. The building is not, however, like
the palace, of marble, and of the like elegance
in its design and ornaments; it is, on the other
hand, constructed of a dark and gloomy stone,
and though grand in its form and proportions,
cannot boast of what is properly termed
beautiful
.
As I now drew near, I perceived that on
all sides it was encompassed by crowds of
people
,
waiting for the coming of the Jews, and
what was to follow. The whole city seemed
to have come together into one place. I was
apprehensive lest owing to the multitude I
should find it impossible to force myself within
the building; for it appeared to me certain, that
if so many were without, the space within must
be more than filled. I thought it hardly worth
my while to proceed, and had paused, that I
might, at least, perhaps, by remaining where I
was, witness the approach of the Jews, and the
manner in which they would be received by
so great a concourse of citizens, when I was
suddenly saluted by the philosopher Zeno, from
whom I had been parted but for a short time.
He had evidently, by too fast walking, lost his
breath, for he could utter himself only, as it
were, piece-meal  a great evil to one whose
usual speech is like the running of a wine
cask.
How now, my Jew of Rome, cried he,
how think you your friends are to come up
with you at your rate of walking? He who
ran for help from Athens to Lacedmon
Phi
7*
Phidippides.
Ah, that is it  Phidippides  Phidippides
ran not so fast. It is well you halted as you
did, else had you lost my salutation and my
company.
Your company, said I, I fear still I must
lose; for owing to the numbers who are
pressing
into this narrow space, and are already in
advance
of me, I have resolved to return whence
I came, though I shall miss much that I had
hoped to witness.
Now shalt thou acknowledge, Jew, cried
he, that there is, for once, use and virtue in a
Greek. Follow me; and though thou shalt not
get on at the pace of Phidippides, we shall
arrive
soon enough. So lay hold of my gown
and come on. There is not a blind alley, or a
covered way, or a secret entrance in Csarea
that 's not known to me, which is one
advantage
that accrueth as a consequence of having
nothing to do.
So saying, he led the way, and threading
his passage among the throngs, at length
emerged into a bye way wholly clear of the
populace.  Passing through this, I perceived
that we had approached very near to the rear of
the principal building; then, by now
descending
,
and again ascending, enveloped now in
darkness, then suddenly coming again to the
light, meeting and seeing but few, and those
apparently officials of the place, who all smiled
and nodded to my companion as knowing him
well, we came forth, at length, upon the broad
paved area of the chief entrance; when,
ascending
a magnificent flight of steps, crowded with
others rapidly moving in the same direction, we
soon stood within the walls of the Judgment
Hall more properly so called, being the vast
apartment in which Pilate sits to hear whatever
causes may be brought before him. With the
knowledge of one who is familiar with such
places, Zeno, immediately upon gaining the
floor, pointed to the spot where we could both
hear and see to the greatest advantage, and
which none as yet had seized upon.
Whereupon
,
we without delay secured it.
These people, said Zeno, though now
apparently so quiet and peaceable, yet require
not much to be said or done, to throw them
into a ferment of passion, and mingle them in
bitter fight. The Greeks have bound
themselves
together by oaths, not to forego their end,
if it can be gained by any means which are
within their reach. They are too many for
you Jews, even though you were all of one
mind; but as I hear and know, you are divided
into parties which are little less hostile toward
each other, than any or all of you are toward
the Greeks. This will make their victory easy.
Pilate, too, is with them.
Zeno was interrupted in his talk, which
flows otherwise with a perpetual stream, by the
stir occasioned by the approach and entrance of
the deputation of the Jews. Their priests
came at their head, clothed in the usual
garments
of the service, followed by Sylleus and
those of the Herodians who had been selected
to accompany and support him. It was among
those who entered last, that I observed Philip,
Simon, and Eleazer. Immediately upon this,
Pilate, from an opposite entrance, made his
appearance, and advanced to his chair of state,
on either side of which were ranged his friends,
the officers of his household, his secretaries,
heralds, and soldiers.
The aspect of this man is cold and dark.
His countenance is bloodless, his eyes
restless
,
near together, and set deep beneath his
brows, which are straight and black. The
features are very fixed, and more as if they
were made of stone than of flesh. He neither
smiles, nor gives evidence, on the surface, of
any other emotion, either agreeable or painful;
but maintains one rigid sameness of expression,
except that at times a shadow so deep as to
seem cast by an external object, but in truth
proceeding from some terrible inward
commotion
lends to his face the darkness and terrors
of night and death. He appears, for the most
part, like one withdrawn from what is
immediately
before him, and brooding in secret upon
some deep design. This appearance I may
have seen in him, indeed, from first knowing
his character; which for a selfish rapacity, and
a heartless disregard of the rights and the lives
of those who come within his power, has made
him to be noted, not only here in the East, but
at Rome also. I thought him to be one, as I
observed him, into whose hands I should
unwillingly
fall; who would not, perhaps, indeed,
injure
or slay so much from feelings of wanton
cruelty, as from a cold indifference to the life
of another; just as there are those who will not,
truly, go out of their way to crush an insect, but
will not turn aside the breadth of a hair, if one
should perchance lie in their path; and those
who, if through some error, they have been the
cause of innocent lives being destroyed will
enjoy none the less their next hour's rest,
or their next cup of wine. This also appeared
to be the truth as to his character, from what,
at this audience, I was able to observe.
No sooner had he taken his seat and looked
round upon the suppliants before him, than he
said with abruptness;
Why is it that again, with a strange and
foolish obstinacy, Jews of Csarea, ye seek my
judgment seat? Do you think to change my
mind, by this new embassy? Think you to
gain anything by setting the whole city in an
uproar? Who speaks for you?
One of the priests replied, Sylleus, noble
Governor, the Herodian Sylleus is set to plead
for us.
Why not the Roman Sylleus? Methinks
it became you more to have among you a sect
of Romans than of Herodians. Belonging to
Rome, it were well that some of you, at least,
bore the name.
The name comes not, replied humbly
the same priest, chiefly from Antipas of
Galilee, but as much from his great father.
Ah, well, that is better. There were
little honor in coming of him of Galilee.
Where is this Sylleus? let him say on, and
let him be brief. A cause heard twice, may be
heard quickly. Let Sylleus the Herodian
declare
himself.
Whereupon Sylleus rose, and stood before
Pilate; and after much fawning, and a long
exordium of swollen flatteries, he was about to
enter upon somewhat more pertinent, when
Pilate's impatience broke forth in a stern
rebuke
;
Cease, Sylleus, to praise. We are
Governor
here in Csarea, we know; and the right
arm of Csar. Tell us not of that with which
we are already well acquainted, but come at
once to the matter in hand.
Most noble Pilate, then began Sylleus
again, we are fain to seek thy great presence
once more, for that we are well convinced,
that when before we stood in this place, the
people of the Jews, who are ever desirous to
demean themselves as good citizens, were not
represented by those who could or would make
known to you the real sentiments of devotion
to Csar, which fill the bosoms of our nation
generally, and more especially of the
inhabitants
of this great Capital. They spake, so we
judge, not so much as suitors for a favor, as
after the manner of those who stood to enforce
what they wished. Verily, their words were
more those of the foes, than the friends of
Rome. They spake too sharply of their rights,
and of Rome's duty to her far off provinces,
whom, said they, she is bound to protect, and
defend against aggression, specially when aimed
at their religion, which it hath ever been the
custom of Rome to respect and secure to her
subjects. Whatever truth, noble Pilate, there
may be in such things, we name them not, but
rather come pleading our friendship and
affection
for Rome, and asking to be held by her as
lovers and children. It was the Great Herod
who first taught our people to seek their
country's
prosperity no longer, in separating
themselves
so far from others in their manners, laws,
and worship, but in mingling with the people
of every nation, and adopting with freedom
whatever was seen to be excellent in their
various modes of life; and especially to make
these interchanges with those who are the
masters
and the model of the whole world. It is
well known to you, with what success he drew
almost the whole nation after him; but
particularly
those who dwelt upon the sea-coast;
so that in the process of not many years, the
customs and manners of Rome were to be seen
in a great many of our cities, and nowhere
more than in Csarea; so that even the games
and sports of the Circus and the Theatres were
to be enjoyed in many places, in Csarea,
Herodium, Gamala, Machrus, without the
necessity
of a voyage to Rome; and so that
even our religion, for adhering to which with
devotion, we have been famous through all
history, we began to think might relax
somewhat
of its harshness, and receive somewhat of
the milder spirit which marks the faith of
Rome. Receive it, then, O Pilate, as a truth
not to be gainsaid, that we, who live now, are
more pervaded by this leaven, as many do call
it, of Herod, than were those who lived but a
little while before us; to that degree indeed,
that, save in some few respects of little
moment
,
the Jew of Csarea may, without
impeaching
greatly one's powers of discernment,
be taken for a Roman. His garb is the same,
his language the same, his amusements the
same; and what separates him, is indeed but
little worthy of regard. Now, most excellent
Governor, if the Jews of Csarea be such, why
should they not be dealt with as friends,
subjects
,
citizens, and children of the Universal
Empire? We see not why a synagogue of
the Jews should be razed for this purpose, any
more than a temple of Jupiter or Apollo. We
will not yield to any in our love and honor of
Rome. Condescend, great Prince, to consider
this, our great affection and to grant our suit.
And now  Pilate interrupted him;
That is well said, Sylleus. Thou hast
done well, and said enough. I doubt not now
your love for Rome. But answer me this
are you not still Jews? Call you not
yourselves
Jews?
Assuredly we do, responded Sylleus.
Ah, hah, said Pilate, then are you not
Romans. A Jew is a Jew. A circumcised
Jew can be no Roman. And upon that the
Greeks and the rabble laughed. Pilate, as
VOL. I. 8
this subsided, continued, in a sharp and bitter
tone.
You Jews are surely a short-sighted,
besotted
people. What cares Rome, think you,
for your good will? Shall she owe you thanks
and favors, that you affect her, and honor her?
She owes not these to her own citizens and
children. What she wants, by the Gods, she
can command; her arm is long enough and
strong enough to reach even to you, and what
she would have you, that shall she make you.
What more would you say? Speak, for time
presses, and the air grows hot.
Sylleus thus urged, and finding, doubtless,
that much of the argument he had prepared
could not so much as be uttered in the ears
of the Governor, much less set forth in order
with his usual flourishes, came, at length,
after much hesitating, and a long and indirect
preface  in which he was more than once
interrupted and rebuked by the Procurator
to the statement of the proposition which
he had been directed to reserve to the last.
The Jews of Csarea, he began, as is
well known to your Greatness, and, indeed, to
all the world, are a poor people, and what little
wealth they can heap together is obtained by a
labor, and by hardships and industry, such,
it is believed, as the natives of no other land ever
present an example of. And if Csarea is
poor, so too is Jerusalem  Judea, and Galilee,
and Perea, it is all the same; we are a
small and poor people. Yet, according to
our ability, are we willing to part with our
hard-earned gains, if, in exchange, we can
obtain privileges and favors which to us are
more than wealth. Pilate raised his head,
and looked at Sylleus. Zeno remarked that,
in his judgment, for a Jew, Sylleus was a man
of discernment. Especially, he continued,
does it gratify us, who, as I have before
aimed to show, love Rome even as her own
children, when we can offer our mite to
increase
the lustre of her greatness. Nay, it
were not reason that we looked to obtain at
all times that which we covet, without some
sacrifice on our part, or some relinquishment of
what we value in due proportion to what we
receive.
You surely judge, said Pilate, like good
citizens and honest men.
Wherefore, most noble Governor,
continued
Sylleus, it is through the counsel of
our chief priests and the other most esteemed
persons of our body, that I now say, that to
ransom what is so dearly prized by Jewish
hearts, we gladly offer to the treasury of the
Empire a gold talent of Jerusalem, which,
though it may seem but a small sum to those
who hold in their hands the wealth of the
whole earth, is yet a huge one to those who,
as we do, acquire our riches, if we may ever be
said to possess riches, by little and little, and
never much.
An evident sensation was made throughout
the crowd by this proposition of the Jew. It
had not been looked for. I asked Zeno if this
was the way in which Rome raised taxes.
Little of money so got, ever goes to Rome,
he replied. This is for the purse of Pilate.
The Jew has touched the right chord, and it
sings music in the Governor's ear. He is
thinking of bracelets and ear-rings for his wife,
the beautiful Procla. See, he smiles graciously
on Sylleus, and seems not to catch the
murmurs
from the Greeks. If he heeds them not,
I warrant him they will soon grow louder than
he will like.
Pilate, for the moment while this was said,
sat silent and unobservant of all around him,
then suddenly broke out,
Thou hast said the truth, Sylleus. Rome
loves her distant subjects as her nearer, and ever
accepts with pride the tokens of their regard.
He was about to proceed with other things,
when he was interrupted by a loud and clear
voice, which I at once recognised as Philip's.
Listen not, O Governor, to the words of
one who, in every word he utters, seals the
dishonor of his country  But Philip was in
his turn, rudely silenced, at Pilate's instance,
by a herald who stood near; for at the same
moment he had observed that Lycias, the
leader of the Greeks, wished to address him.
Many of the Jews now cried out for Philip,
others for Sylleus, and the Greeks shouted the
names of Lycias and Philus, each party
striving
,
by noise and uproar, to secure the success
of its chief. Pilate at length succeeded in
enforcing
silence, and then called upon Lycias to
say what he would.
Most noble Governor, said the Greek, as
soon as his voice could be made to prevail over
the slowly subsiding tumult, it is a long time
that the honor, which the united Greek
population
of Csarea have proposed to render to the
reigning Emperor, hath been made a matter of
notoriety, both here in our city, and in the
neighboring places. Even at Rome, it hath
been familiarly spoken of by such as are
acquainted
with our affairs and been carried to the
ears of Csar himself. It hath been also
reported
to Csar, that the imperial colossus should
stand upon the loftiest point of the city  now
filled by the Jewish synagogue  so that it
might be conspicuous to all entering or
departing
8*
from the Port, and to such as travel the great
roads to the Capital, as those of Asia and Rome
now are; and more than this, that the ground
hath already been ceded to the Greeks for this
use by the Governor. To me and to us, is it
plain, O Pilate, that the honor arising from this
act on the part of the Greeks of Csarea, will
be more esteemed at Rome, than will be the
miserable pittance proffered by the Jews, which
can hardly be thought to be equivalent to more
than half the value of the building now
deforming
the finest quarter of the city. He can
scarce be reckoned a friend of Csar, and of
Csar's honor, who, for a colossus of marble
upon the topmost point of Csarea, shall
substitute
a talent of gold, which, while it
vanishes
in the using, the other endures with
nature
itself, from one part of which it is carved
out. If the omnipotent Tiberius be in want of
money, let the Greeks of Csarea make a
contribution
of such pence as they can spare, and
by the first ship despatch it to Rome. Here
was there much commotion amongst the
multitude
the Greeks exulting, and the Jews
showing signs of rage and impatience  Pilate's
pallid face grew whiter still. Zeno said,
That Greek is bold, is he not? But were he
not sure how it stands with Pilate at Rome,
he might as well have cut off his own head, as
said it. Trust Lycias for both courage and
cunning.
Lycias was about to begin again, when
Pilate
,
assuming his usual air, and rising, said,
I will hear no more of the matter. What I
have decreed, I have decreed. The first
judgment
shall stand. I was willing to grant an
indulgence
to you, Jews of Csarea, and to hear
what further ye might have to allege against the
Judgment I had rendered; but it has proved but
another occasion of tumult and confusion
Pilate was here broken in upon by the loud
voice of Philip  The true reasons, said he,
O Pilate, why thy judgment should not stand,
have not been rendered by the false Sylleus;
listen to me, and thou shalt hear them
A new uproar was now occasioned. The
Priests, with signs of rage in their distorted
countenances, shouted, Hear him not,
Pilate
,
he is mad! The Jews themselves hold
him mad. The Greeks, too, now took sides
with them in the endeavor to silence him, but
his voice prevailed over all.
The true reason, O Pilate, why this
judgment
should not be rendered is, that it will
breed riot, revolt, and war, in Csarea, and it
may be, throughout Judea. Deem not that
though some of the Jews be traitors to
themselves
and their God, all are therefore so.
For I say unto thee, there are those in
Csarea, and they are not a few, who will
sooner pour out their blood upon the altar of
their God, as did those Galileans whom thou
doubtless rememberest, or ever they will see
dishonor done to the house of their worship.
Believe not the foul-mouthed apostate, when
he tells thee that there is love between us and
thee, between Israel and Rome. I tell thee
there is hate  deep, deadly, inextinguishable
hate, and there is nothing else. The Jew hates
the Roman, defies and spits upon him. Herod
did not quite, although he did almost, un-Jew
us. There be some left who name not his
name, but another's who lived long since, of
whom, perchance, the noble Pilate has heard
somewhat, Judas of Galilee! And besides him
and much more, Herod Antipas, whom thou
lovest not; we hold from him, and hope,
helped by the God of our fathers, that he shall
do a work of which the world shall hear.
There is a cup in His hand, and the wine is
red, and as for the dregs thereof, ye of Rome
shall wring them out and drink them.
What more Philip would have said none can
tell, for at that moment Pilate's voice was
heard
Strike him to the ground! Hew down the
rebel  at which the soldiers, who were near,
made towards him as they could through the
press, but happily in vain; for the Jews who
were around him closed him in, many of the
other party joining them, and in spite of the
efforts of the soldiers, whose swords and spears
were flashing around and falling mercilessly
upon any who were nearest  they love nothing
like the blood of a Jew  Philip was thrust into
the thickest of the multitude, and so escaped.
But the words of Pilate were the signal for a
general tumult. The whole mass, heaved to
and fro in the struggles of all, either to defend
themselves, to assail others, or to escape from
the Hall; the confusion and the terror being
increased by the stern command of Pilate, heard
above all the din, for the legionaries to be drawn
from the Camp to the Square, he himself at the
same moment hastily disappearing through the
door in the rear of the apartment, by which he
had entered.
The throng being now too dense to permit
the use of weapons, every thought and effort of
each was centered in the endeavor to fly from
the place, and in the haste and hurry thus
occasioned
,
many, both of the Greeks and Jews,
were thrown down and trampled to death, in
the narrow passages, and on the descent of the
steps. When the streets were once gained, the
apprehension of the Roman soldiery caused
the crowds, with precipitation, to fly for the
shelter of their homes. As for ourselves, Zeno,
when he saw to what head the tumult would
grow, with a prudence which is a part of his
character, drew me away with haste to the
near neighborhood of the entrance by which we
had gained the room, so that when the tumult
had reached its highest, and no more was to be
witnessed with safety, we departed the way we
came; many who were near us, observing our
movements, and escaping by the same means.
As we rapidly made our way through the
narrow
and secret passes, by which we had
approached
the Judgment Hall, the air was filled
with the noise of the retreating and flying
crowds, and soon, above all, was heard the clang
of the trumpets of the Roman Horse, as yet at
a distance, they swept along the streets
toward
the scene of action. So great, however,
was the terror on the part of the people of this
weapon of Imperial rule, that by the time the
Horse had reached the Hall, they found
themselves
the sole occupants of the square and the
streets, a moment before so thronged with half
the inhabitants of Csarea.
I soon parted from Zeno, and hastened to
what I already begin to call my home. Anna
and her mother were awaiting with anxiety the
event of the audience. I had scarcely ended
my narrative of the occurrences of the hour,
when Philip appeared. He was now calm, but
bore marks, in the fiery glow of his countenance,
of the scenes through which he had just passed.
Although he conversed with moderation, and
with gentleness toward us all, yet was there a
wildness and restless wandering of the eye,
which showed to me that his soul was deeply
agitated, and was still devising further schemes
of resistance. Anna, after having heard from
both of us full accounts of all that had
happened
,
no longer made any effort to restrain
herself or Philip, but surrendered herself to
the undivided dominion of her religious,
patriotic
zeal, and by the lofty tone of her
indignation
,
and her sincere devotion to her faith, served
to lend a fresh impulse to her brother. Where
this will end, or what will next ensue, I cannot
pretend to divine; but the causes of discord
and quarrel are too many, and now too bitter,
to be speedily put at rest.
I cannot wonder, my mother, at the rage
into which devout Jews are thrown, or any who
retain the least attachment to their country,
and reverence for those who have lived before
them, or any remembrance of their ancient
greatness and renown, nay, who have any
proper feeling for themselves, when they
behold
themselves, the lives of their children,
their homes, the prosperity of their cities, and
the religion which they have received through
so many ages, made the sport of a tyranny like
this. Rome at home is compassionate and
indulgent
at least, magnanimous; but in her
distant administration of the extremities of her
vast Empire, where her own eye cannot
penetrate
,
she is, through her ministers, oftentimes
most unjust and oppressive. Pilate, as I learn,
and as I see, rules in Judea, not for the good of
the province over which he is set, but for his
own. His first care is to turn the streams of
wealth, of which he can obtain the control,
into his own coffers  next into those of Rome;
and whenever his own wants of more, and still
more, cry out louder than usual, or the cry comes
over the sea from his great master, then pretexts
in abundance are found, or invented, for
extraordinary
assessments upon the people, and to
that degree, that ruin to the merchant and the
husbandman often stalks in the footsteps of
the publican. Nay, among the Jews, those
who lend themselves to this service, and for
the sake of a livelihood, or possibly larger gains,
allow themselves to be employed as collectors
of these imposed burdens, are held in even
greater abhorrence than the masters whom they
serve. That toward both, all the anger and hate
should be felt which now rage in the breast of
Philip, and of those who are with him, is
natural and necessary; and I blame Philip,
therefore, not for his principles, but for his
policy
.
He surrenders himself wholly to his
passions, which bear him apparently with more
despatch toward the attainment of his object, but
deceive him, and end in leading him farther and
farther from that at which he aims. He, who
obeys his passions rather than his reason, is
like one who, on the ocean, should hope to reach
the port, trusting to the winds alone. They
may drive him swiftly; but if there be no
rudder
and no helmsman, the faster he shall go,
the farther it may be from the haven he seeks.
After a stormy day, I now willingly seek
repose. To-morrow the games of Herod
commence
,
and it will not be strange if disturbances
should again break out. When it shall have
passed, I will record its events.
The day has come and gone in peace. I
will not, my mother describe the scenes I have
witnessed at the Amphitheatre, resembling as
they have, even to the minutest ceremonial,
those of the same kind in Rome, of which you
have often heard, though you never witnessed
them. To thine apostate son was left that
office; and faithfully were its duties fulfilled.
VOL. I. 9
Never, as I think, was I absent after my tenth
year, from any game or show within the walls
of Rome  or never, except when my old
master
Plancus used to interpose, out of regard, as
he averred, to my progress in my studies, and
obtain from you, or from my father, an interdict
to be laid upon my movements. With my
father, I believe, he rarely succeeded, he being
ever ambitious, that, by mingling, at all times
and in every place, with the Roman youth,
especially
at their national sports and public
games, I should grow up in their likeness, and
lose my own. It was to you I owe it, that
occasionally
I was withheld from such scenes, and
kept, instead, to my Greek. But my relish for
them I find not to be quite dead within me;
even on the humbler scale in which they were
to-day exhibited in this provincial city. And
truly I was not the only son of Abraham then
and there present, but beside me, as it were, the
whole Jewish population of Csarea  so
successful
have been the means resorted to, to
tempt our people to adopt the customs and
manners
of their conquerors and masters. The
more strict, indeed, were not there, such as
Anna, Philip, Simon, and their friends; but
they are few in comparison with the whole.
On the third day of the games occurs the
Sabbath
,
when many more will be added to the
numbers of the absent; but so fatal is the power
of bad example, great numbers will also be
found in the seats of the Theatre  amongst
whom, alas, thy son may be.
On the evening of the first day  as I was
but now about to say  we sat together in the
Portico, looking both over the garden, and the
waters of the sea, as they then sparkled under
the light of the half-grown moon. Our talk
was of the games, and of what had been
witnessed
there. I related all I had either seen or
heard. Simon also was of our company; who
asked me whether any difference was to be
noted in the demeanor of Pilate toward the
Greeks and Jews. I told him I had noticed
none; or if any, that his manner was even more
gracious towards those of the Jews who were
near him than to any others, and what was
more perhaps, that at the side of Procla sat the
wife of Sylleus. There is no good designed,
said Simon, in any quarter, when Pilate
smiles; least of all, to us. Would that his
wife reigned here in Judea, instead of him.
Her smiles, and they are many, are of the
heart. Were her counsels followed, there were
no uncertain prospect of days of peace in Judea.
She is full of humanity, as he of cruelty.
Toward our people she has ever shown herself
prompt to do them favors, and atone, as she
might, for the slights and affronts of her
husband
and other lordly Romans. The Lord be
nigh unto her in the hour of her necessity.
Often has she been known, said Anna, to
interpose between the judgment of Pilate and
his victim,  believed by her to be unjustly
condemned,  and snatch him from the death
that threatened; and sometimes has she
herself
in the silence of night set open the prison
door, and unlocked the chain, and set the
prisoner
free, trusting to Pilate's love of her,
which all Csarea knows how fond it is,  to
overlook the offence. Her heart is full of pity,
and even the Jew is not shut out.
He is not, said Simon; to day at the
Synagogue and in the Market it passed from
mouth to mouth, that Procla was on our part,
and that to the wife of Sylleus she had declared
as much, and had said moreover, that whatever
it lay within her power to do, that would she
do gladly for the furtherance of our desires.
The peace with which this day has passed gives
hope that justice and milder counsels will
prevail
.
It is, said Philip, the treacherous calm
that precedes the tempest; the smoothness of
the stream before it shoots the precipice; the
stillness that comes before the lightning; the
quiet speech of Joab when he smote Abner
under the fifth rib. Look not for peace till the
yoke of slavery shall have been fastened upon
the neck of every man, who dares to stand up
and call himself a Jew. Procla's intercession
may buy the life of a malefactor, or save a
thief from the stocks, but at a time like this her
smiles would scarce avail to change the mind
of Pilate. His love of money and his dread of
Csar are stronger both, than his love of Procla.
'T is rumored, that the Greeks more than make
good the bribe of Sylleus.
Still, said Simon, I will hope the best.
If to-morrow shall also go over, and our temple
still keep its place, I will believe that the
Lord hath turned the heart of our enemy. For
it is Pilate's wont not to delay what he
purposes
.
I could not help saying here, what I did
not doubt was the truth, that it was not to be
questioned that Pilate would carry into effect
his purpose sooner or later; he might not do it
to-morrow or the day after, but as there was no
power to prevent him, and there was a strong
motive for him to do the Greeks this favor, he
would neither pause nor hesitate in the work
before him. This was, as I learned at the
Amphitheatre
,
the opinion of all who were most
capable of judging, who knew Pilate well, and
9 *
were interested in the event neither one way
nor another. And I added, that I could not but
hope, that, whatever iniquity there might be in
the measure, it would not be resisted, but that
afterward, since it could not be done before, an
appeal would be made to Csar. However, all
I could say was of little weight with any,
except
perhaps with Simon, who judges now more
calmly in the matter than at first. As for
Philip he declared if all deserted him, as most
seemed likely to do, he would fall alone under
the axes and engines, ere he would live to
witness
the impious wrong. Anna was of the same
mind.
Ceasing then to converse upon themes, which
were sure to agitate all who engaged in them,
we walked forth into the garden and spoke of
other things, and lingered till a late hour among
its avenues and shades. It was not till the
sounds in the neighboring streets had died
away, and the confused murmur that came up
from the vicinity of the Amphitheatre, where
idle revellers and the more dissolute youth of
the city pass both day and night, had at length
grown so faint as scarcely to be heard, that we
were warned to our rest.
The second day of the games has come and
gone in like manner as the first. But there
are, as it seems to me, many indications that
another will not pass so quietly. At the Circus
the affair of the Synagogue in all the intervals
of the games was, as it were, the sole topic of
discourse. Some, both of Greeks and Jews,
espousing one side, and some another; for
many of the Greeks are generous enough to
condemn the measures which have been urged
upon Pilate, and many of the Jews, on the
other hand, are base enough through
subserviency
to the Roman power to defend him, and
throw blame upon the churlishness, as they
term it, of the zealous, who will listen to no
propositions of surrender. Zeno, who, with
his troublesome partiality for my conversation,
was not long in perceiving in what part of the
Theatre I had placed myself, soon joined me,
that he might enliven, as he was pleased to
say, by his presence and discourse, the
solitude
in which I seemed to be pining. I
asked him, how in his judgment stood the affair
of the Jews; for however this man may render
himself both tedious and absurd, by the
perserverance
of his friendship, and the manner
of his talk, it still is universally admitted in
Csarea, that no other individual is during any
one day in so many different places, sees so
many persons, hears so much news, and heaps
together so many facts; so that to no other
source of information could I apply with so
great a certainty of obtaining the knowledge
for which I sought. He was very positive in
his belief, in reply to my inquiries, that Pilate
held to his original purpose, and that nothing
now could turn him from it; that the second
hearing of the Jews had done them more harm
than good; that Philip had enraged him, and
that he would now in spite of appearances soon
take his revenge. I told him, that I thought
Lycias had said more to offend than Philip.
This he admitted; but replied, that it was for
Pilate's interest, nay it was necessary to him,
to overlook that; and besides he attributed the
whole disturbance, into which Csarea had
been thrown, to what he calls the superstitious
obstinacy of the Jews. To-morrow is your
Sabbath, and to-morrow will the measure be
carried into effect, said Zeno; I doubt
this no more than that Pilate sits there before
us toying with Procla's bracelets, and now turns
his dark brows to watch the last agonies of that
dying gladiator. He reckons much upon the
Herodians  which, some say, but for
mysterious
reasons which I do not understand, is a false
reliance  and the divisions among you; and is
persuaded that there will now be but faint
opposition
,
and that on the part only of a few
madmen like Philip.
Philip throughout this day has been engaged
in secret movements with his party. It is their
purpose to post themselves in the immediate
neighborhood of the Synagogue, concealed in
the dwellings of the Jews which are nearest.
Many of these are inhabited by Roman Jews,
who would not admit Philip, nor any of his
adherents. But an equal or a greater number
are in the possession of those who are united
with him. These buildings are separated from
the walls of the Synagogue by very broad
streets, and almost surround it, and afford a
ready and secure place of concealment, while
awaiting the decision of Pilate; and of retreat,
if either their own desperate zeal, or the
Roman sword should spare them for such an
act. There can be little question but that
to-morrow
will behold the destruction of the
Synagogue. Although no public order has
been given, and the people will be tempted to
the Theatre by unusual spectacles; yet those
who know the manner in which Pilate
conducts
such affairs are well persuaded of it.
Lest, my mother, the events of another day
should not allow me to end and seal this
letter, and commit it to the vessel which
to-morrow
sails for the Tiber, I will close it
now, commending myself to you with all love,
and offering the salutations of the widow and
her daughter.
When the morrow is over, I will write of its
events.
IV.
That
morrow is past. Its sun has gone
down in darkness. I keep my promise, my
mother, and at once tell you of its scenes and
events.
It was, as I have said, the Sabbath. In the
household of Sameas the observances were as
with those of the stricter sort in Rome, except
that Philip was early abroad attending to the
affairs committed to him. Anna and her
mother repaired to the Synagogue. As they
were departing, Anna turned to me and said,
will you not, Julian, go with us? I said
that I could not; my anxieties were too many to
allow me to worship, and I did not choose to
be present with my body alone. She said
that my answer had rebuked her, for she was
sure she should think only of Philip. If,
said her mother, you will not only think of
Philip, but lift up your prayers for him, how,
my child, could you be more devoutly
employed
?
That is true, replied the
daughter
,
let us go, and pray for Philip and for
Judea. Farewell, Julian, go not to the games.
And with these words, the last which I heard
from her, she turned away and moved in the
direction of the Synagogue.
Not long after their departure, I too sought
the streets, uncertain whether to bend my way
toward the Amphitheatre, or toward the
Synagogue
,
which, whether I should enter it or
not as a worshipper, certainly had all my
thoughts. I was determined, as men ever are,
by the multitude; and them I found all
hurrying
toward the Circus. The city seemed
emptying in that direction, so great were the
numbers of persons on foot and in chariots, on
camels and on horses, many being from the
country round about, who were thus hastening
in the pursuit of pleasure. I, without will or
purpose of my own, was borne along with the
current. The expectations, as I conversed first
with one and then with another of those who
were going the same way, were great as to the
entertainment to be afforded.
It was to be the great day of the games.
It was announced, said they, as I might see
for myself on the corners of all the streets, that
an hundred Lions were to contend with one
another, with other beasts, or with men. That
was but a part of the show. There were
other things greater yet. Pilate had never
before, on his part, made so great provision
for the amusement of the people. Old men
said it brought to mind the days of Herod.
But long before I reached the plain on the
outskirts of the city, where stands the Circus,
I turned round, and moved in another
direction
,
giving myself up to my meditations
thinking now of you, my mother, then of my
journey to Beth-Harem, and most of all, of
Philip and his sister. So I kept on my way, I
know not how long, till suddenly the sounds of
our Sabbath music struck my ear. The street
were now still, and I paused and listened
The chant rose and fell with the gentle breeze
that was stirring, and by its uncommon
sweetness
drew me on in the direction of the sound
I had walked but a few paces, when, leaving
the narrow street in which I had been moving,
I found myself to my surprise in front of the
devoted Synagogue. I stood and leaned upon
a broken wall, and again listened with more
attention; for the voices of Anna and her
mother I knew were mingling in the strain.
But I had not stood listening long, ere another
sound of a very different kind from an opposite
quarter fell on my ear  the distant rumbling
of many wheels, the trampling of horses, and
the confused murmur which betokens the
movement of a multitude. My apprehensions
VOL. I. 10
at once interpreted the meaning of the sound.
It rapidly approached, and in a moment more a
body of artisans, with their implements of labor,
and massy engines for the levelling of walls,
accompanied by a crowd of the populace and a
small guard of Roman soldiers, came into view,
and moved on toward the spot where I stood.
At the same instant, as it were, the inhabitants
of the street up which the army of destroyers
were marching, the neighboring streets, and
the square  inhabited almost wholly by Jews
became aware that the long threatened and
overhanging evil was now at hand and about
to fall, and poured forth to witness or to resist
the desolation. As if by the power of magic a
multitude now stood in the spaces, where but
a moment before were but a few idlers like
myself.
The worshippers within the Synagogue,
warned by messengers from without of the
sacrilege
about to be committed, we now saw
descending
the lofty steps in slow procession,
bearing in their hands the books of the law.
They fled not at the prospect of the
approaching
danger, but gathered around the walls of
their ancient temple, as if by their presence
alone, with their revered priests and elders at
their head, they could avert the storm that had
gathered over them, or touch with compassion
the hearts of the rude servants of irrestible
power, now about to commence the work of
destruction. That troop of slaves with their
implements  axes, saws, bars, and battering
rams,  at the same time drew near, and spread
themselves, as if without delay to begin the
work, attempting to thrust back with violence
the crowds which accumulated around them.
But to this first and necessary work were their
men unequal, for they had to contend not with
the vile rabble that might have been found in
the neighborhood of a theatre or a market, but
with women, and children, and aged men, the
mothers, wives, and sisters of many of the
chief citizens of Csarea, together with the
priests and ministers of their worship. And
they were met, too, not by return of blows of
violence of any sort, but with tears and
intreaties
,
and importunate cries of deep distress,
imploring them to withhold their hands, nor
bury in ruins the venerable temple of their faith.
The loud sound of wailing and lamentation,
arising thus from the voices of the women,
mingled in strange and mournful confusion
with the rolling of the heavy wheels, the cries
of those who managed the engines, the oaths
and vociferations of the workmen, the shrill
braying of the trumpets, and the hoarse
commands
of the Roman Centurion, as he essayed
to preserve what order he could, hemmed in
and oppressed by so great a crowd of human
beings.
Pilate had ordered that no assault whatever
should be made upon the Jews, unless first
assailed by them; and that indulgence should
be shown to natural expressions of sorrow and
indignation; but that open resistance should be
punished without mercy. It happened soon,
therefore, that the Centurion, not being
permitted
to resort to any measures of violence,
found himself separated from the soldiers, and
the soldiers from one another, by the
irresistible
pressure of the crowds. This was indeed
of little consequence at first, because there were
no signs of any other resistance being made,
than that which proceeded from the weeping of
the women, and the passionate exclamations of
the men. But as soon as the workmen had
succeeded in planting their engines, and raising
their ladders, and were preparing to ply their
various instruments of destruction, a scene of
horror ensued, which, if that Centurion could
have controlled his soldiers, might in some
sort  supposing any humanity to have dwelt
in his bosom  by his interposition have been
prevented. For when, after having in the
manner I have said planted their engines in the
proper position, and they were then for the first
time about to ply them upon the walls, the
Jews immediately around could no longer
restrain
themselves, but threw themselves, the
women not less than the men, upon them and
clung madly to the wheels, to the beams, and
even to the head itself of the rams, and also
rushing in placed themselves between the
instruments
and the walls, so that neither could
the soldiers work their engines, nor, if they
could, was it possible to do so without crushing
vast numbers of the people that were upon them,
around them, or lying prostrate before them.
Such reverence and love was there among them
for the place and the Object of their worship.
But when neither by entreaty, nor by such
force as they could use, was it possible to tear
these miserable beings from their fatal grasp,
and when every warning had been given them
that there would no longer be any delay, then
by the force of the artisans were the engines
drawn back, and when they had been so held a
few moments, were let drive against the walls,
and all those who had chosen so to devote
themselves
miserably perished. Shrieks of agony,
cries of horror, and imprecations of divine
vengeance
at that filled the air. Yet it now availed
not. The engines were quickly drawn back
again, and again driven against the walls,
destroying
all who still were in their way. But
10 *
when by the Jews, who still possessed their
reason, it was thus seen that no signs of
devotion
and no proofs of constancy could prevent
the fated devastation, they then, as it were with
one accord, determined that their wives and
children should no longer be permitted to be
either witnesses or sharers in what was further
to ensue; and they were borne away not
without
force, so full were they of the spirit which
is ready to sacrifice itself in the service of its
God, to the dwellings which bordered upon the
space in which the synagogue stood. Long
before this I had with anxiety searched in the
crowds for Anna and her mother, but in vain.
But while I with others was engaged in this
service of placing the women beyond the reach
of danger, it was with the greatest joy that I
discovered them already secure upon the roof of
one of the loftiest dwellings.
Now while this duty had been performing,
the Romans, taking advantage of the temporary
dispersion of the crowd, plied vigorously on
every side their huge battering rams, and clouds
of dust, and the crash of falling stones gave
evidence how rapidly the work was going on.
The walls of the outer court and the porches
were fast tumbling in ruins. But no sooner
were the women disposed of, than the Jews,
actuated by one spirit of revenge, forgetting in
the heat of the hour the sacredness of the day
and their resolutions of forbearance, and rushing
in upon the workmen, by the overwhelming
force of numbers, drove them from their posts.
At this, the Roman Horse, and at the same time
also the Greeks, and all others who were hostile
to the Jews, poured in to the defence of the
workmen; and thus all around, both within and
without the walls of the Court, and throughout
all the surrounding streets, were the whole
multitude
mingled in bloody fight. As soon,
however
,
as the Centurion had ordered to the attack
the soldiers under him, then forth from out the
courts of the neighboring houses, from the
windows and doors, poured fully armed, Philip,
Simon, and their adherents; and though on
foot fell with fury on the Roman and his
troop.
The Jews were now concentrated on one side
of the square, the Romans and the Greeks on
the other, and with or without weapons, all
were engaged. But the Jews, notwithstanding
their desperate bravery, and the freedom with
which they sold their lives, were no match for
the cavalry of the Romans, and were soon seen to
yield their ground, and were, indeed, falling
back fast, when they were arrested, and made
to turn again with momentary success upon their
enemy, by the sudden appearance of a small troop
of mounted Jews, with one at their head, whose
commanding air, and impetuous charge, inspired
his countrymen with new courage.
Come on, cried he, men of Israel. For
the Lord and Judea  and, followed by his
little band, fell with fury upon the Romans. It
was at a moment when it was needful that
fortune
should show some favor to our people,
though to me it was clear that they could not
but soon be routed, and that with great
slaughter
for Philip, upon whom dependence was
placed, more than upon any other, was just
then nearly borne down by the advancing Horse.
But refusing steadfastly to retreat before those
whom he hated, but feared not, and to whom,
if so it must be, he was ready to sell his life,
he sought, and engaged, hand to hand, with the
Centurion. Though so unequal in their
advantages
,
Philip made up in some manner, for
his position, being on foot, by his stature, and
the superior strength of his arm. The fight
hung long doubtful; but, alas! as it could not
but be, the Centurion prevailed, and by a well
aimed blow, clove his antagonist to the ground.
At this moment the Jew horseman came up,
and I looked that he should on the instant
revenge
the death of Philip; but suddenly
drawing
in his horse, he cried out, in the Hebrew
tongue, Hah, Gentile, Gentile, beware the fate
of Abimelech. Had he to whom this was said
understood what those words conveyed, he
might, by stooping upon his horse, have evaded
the messenger of death; but he knew them
not; and they were scarcely uttered, when a stone
from a roof struck him lifeless to the pavement.
I raised my eye to the spot whence it came
it was Anna's form I there saw, bending over to
behold the work she had done; but at the same
instant, even as I gazed upon her with both
wonder and sorrow, a javelin from the hand of
a Roman pierced her through, and she fell back
upon the tiles.
There was then, my mother, no longer any
Csarea for me; and I flung myself from the
place where, till then, I had remained, (that I
might, in the event of the house being assailed,
be at hand for the defence of Anna and her
mother,) and mingled as full of the spirit of
revenge as any, in the thickest of the fight.
But why should I now say more? that soon
happened, which I had been looking for. The
news of the affray had been carried to Pilate
a legion was on the moment despatched to the
Synagogue, and with its overwhelming force
soon decided the contest. But I heeded not its
presence, I knew it not. Blind with passion
and grief, I fought madly, till, as I suppose, I
fell senseless, through loss of strength and
blood.  I awoke in a Roman dungeon. I am
in the hands of Pilate. What the event will be
I cannot foresee. If I perish, though thou wilt
lose an unworthy son, yet is he one who, in
whatever else he failed, failed never in his love
of thee. I can now say no more.
These lines I am permitted to place in the
hands of Zeno, the Greek, trusting that he will
despatch them speedily to Rome. Farewell.
V.
Before
this reaches you, my mother, you
will have heard of my safety; which earlier
knowledge you will owe to the friendship of
the Greek, who, as he has said,  not as I
believe
,
simply because he had no other
employment
,
has not ceased to devote himself to
my interests. It is solely too by reason of
the friendship, which so strangely and suddenly
he conceived for me, that I now find myself
on the way to Beth-Harem, having liberty for
bonds, the vault of the heavens above me
for that of Pilate's dungeon, life for death.
I can never know, indeed, that Pilate would
not in some other manner,  though Zeno had
not interposed,  have obtained a knowledge
of the circumstances to which I am beholden
for my liberty. Zeno himself declares that it
would certainly have been so; for that the
governor, seeing how many lives had been
already sacrificed, and that he might be called
to account for that day's confusion, would have
gladly seized upon any pretext to set free his
prisoners, which yet it was by no means easy
to do and preserve his own dignity and
authority
.
However this may be, I can feel none the
less my debt to the Greek, who has shown in
these affairs, that however he may affect to
have been moved in what he has done, by that
restless temper that must be busy somewhere
and about somewhat, he nevertheless possesses a
heart which is not only no stranger to kind
affections, but overflows with a wide and
generous
humanity.
My reflections, when, upon awaking out of
the insensibility caused by the blows I had
received, I found myself in a Roman prison, all
went to convince me that I should there end
my days. I had been taken in arms against
the reigning power; and, though I had not
been long in Csarea, could probably easily be
proved both to be a Jew, and to have been
intimate with Philip and Simon, the leaders in
the affray. Add to this the circumstance, that
my judge was Pilate, and you too will
acknowledge
,
my mother, that my days must
have seemed to me to be numbered. That
certainly was my conviction. Yet was it not
attended by any self-crimination for the part
I had taken, as I doubt not you will suppose
it was, or for the cause in which, as it seemed,
I had offered myself up. My heart approved
what I had done. I had stood up for the
injured, the oppressed, and the weak. I had
shown myself to be, what I had at length
found myself to be, a Jew;  one who was
ready not only to entertain an inward
persuasion
,
but to carry it into outward act. Hours
were days and months to me in that dark
solitude, for the quickness with which truths
revealed themselves to me, and struck their
roots into my soul, and grew up into strength
and maturity. I seemed in my forlorn and
hapless
state, to be myself an emblem of my
country
,
bound hand and foot, awaiting the sentence
of death at the word of a tyrannic and
irresistible
power. My mind reviewed with pain my
long alienation from the faith and worship of
my fathers. My misfortune seemed to me a
just judgment upon such mad apostasy, and I
thenceforward devoted myself, should my life
be spared, to the welfare of my country, by
such acts as should appear to me to be most
for her advantage and glory. Thy early
instructions
,
my mother, written upon the soft
heart of my youth, had then sunk deep; and
now, in my silence and darkness, they revealed
themselves and filled the place where I was
with light. The history of our people, and of
the care of Jehovah for them, of the good men
and prophets who had taught and died for
VOL. I. 11
them, all passed before me; and although I
felt myself still to be ignorant and unbelieving
in much more than I knew and believed, I
discovered that I knew and believed greatly
more than but a little while before I could
have supposed, and enough to make me a Jew
in very deed. The prayers, also, which at thy
side, or else seated on thy knee, I had in my
infancy been taught to say, though for many
a year they had not passed my lips, now
unbidden
returned, and again ascended a sacrifice,
for thy sake I will believe, not rejected. I put
not my trust, my mother, in the righteousness
of the thoughts and resolves, which perchance
the solitary fears of my dungeon, and the
human dread of a sudden, and it might be cruel
death by the scourge or the cross, and not any
love of what is good and right, may have
prompted. That were a vain reliance. I dare
not say as yet, that Rome and her seductions
might not, were they soon to try me, easily
uproot the virtue, that like a gourd has grown
up in a night. May my newborn strength be
spared such assault.
Thus was I, by the strange fortunes that
had befallen me, again recreated a Jew. Yet
was this, as I well knew, only so much a new
hindrance in the way of pardon or escape.
Could I with truth have declared myself a
Roman, there was not a doubt, that Pilate
would, on the instant, have overlooked the
natural ardor that had leagued me for the
moment
with the enemies of the state, seeing how
I was bound to them by both the ties of
friendship
and of blood. As little doubt was there
it seemed to me, that when he should discover,
as upon examination he would, the manner in
which I then stood affected both toward Rome
and Judea, there would be small hope of any
other event than immediate death. Day after
day did I lie in my dungeon, chained to a
pillar of stone, awaiting with patience, and
almost more than patience through the new
spirit that had taken possession of me, what
should befall. No sounds disturbed the current
of my thoughts,  which I have now declared
to you what course they took,  save the
regular approach of the jailor with the portion
of food which was allowed me, and the cries,
as of those who suffered torture, or who
lamented aloud their wretched bondage. The
jailor was one who appeared native to the
horrors of the place, and to be little different
from the stone on which I lay, save that he
possessed the power of going from place to place.
I quickly learned to refrain from seeking news
from one, who either replied neither by word
nor sign, or cursed me for my tribe and what
he believed my crimes. Once only did he of
his own accord open his lips, and that was to
declare, as he did with the laugh of a demon,
that that day, at the third hour, a score
of Jew dogs,  their heads downwards,
would die on as many crosses at the city gates.
His care of me, he thought, would soon be at
an end. I could not but ask if he knew who
they were who were to suffer. His answer
was in two words, as he drew the bolt of my
door, Jew dogs. The manner of this man
made me feel that there was a lower and more
pitiable state than my own. I was happy to
be myself rather than such an one. Nay, it
seemed to me I would sooner be the spider
or the toad that crawled over and around me.
But all this was to have an end. The door
of my prison was opened not many days after,
not by my jailor, but by Zeno the Greek,
crying out with rapid and noisy vociferation,
that through the intervention of Procla I had
at length obtained my freedom, but on the
condition, that I should at once take my
departure
from Csarea. I was as much amazed
at the sight and sound of this man as if I had
never known him; for in the crowd of thoughts
I had been so intently revolving concerning
the past and the future, the image of the Greek
had not once presented itself. Philip, Anna,
and their mother had often been present to my
thoughts, but not Zeno. Instantly, however,
I remembered my former conclusions
concerning
him, and was at the same time conscious,
that as he was the only being in Csarea,
beside the Jews, to whom I was known, and
who had it in his power to do me any service,
so it must be to him I was indebted for this
unlooked for prospect of life and freedom.
I therefore greeted and embraced him as a
friend and benefactor. He steadfastly reiterated
what at first he had declared, that it was to the
powerful intercession of Procla I was beholden
for my present happiness, who, having heard an
account of the way in which I became a party
to the plans and movements of the Jews, and
how I had joined at last in the tumult only
through a momentary impulse to revenge the
death of my friends, pitied me, and besought
Pilate for my release,  a mercy, which
without
much difficulty she obtained. But when
I significantly asked from whom Procla could
have derived her knowledge of me, a stranger
in Csarea,  all of my nation who had known
me being dead, or at least dead to Procla,  he
could not, he said, but admit that among others
with whom he had conversed of me and the
events which had taken place, was the wife of
Pilate, who had confessed, after some things he
11*
had let drop, that she thought, rightly
considered
,
I was innocent of any crime against
either the power of the Procurator or the peace
of the city, and ought to be set at liberty; and
so she would say to Pilate. I did not fail to
make him feel,  notwithstanding the difficulty
of ever obtaining an entrance between either
his words or sentences, so as to declare an
opinion,  I did not fail to make him at length
understand, that I felt how it was to his
humanity
and undeserved friendship, I owed my
deliverance. He impatiently listened to what
I had to say, more than once breaking in with
somewhat to the jailor, who was at the same
time busy in knocking off my chains. Both
these offices were, however, at length
completed
,
and we sallied forth from the prison
into the light of day and the busy crowds of
men.
I now had time to ask Zeno after the events
which had followed the tumult of that Sabbath
day. It was but little he had to say in reply.
The Jews were completely routed and
dispersed
.
When they found that to contend
longer was useless, they gave way in all
directions
,
and made for the security of their homes.
Almost all in this manner escaped from the
Roman soldiery; some, however, were seized
and cast into prison,  a part of whom had
already perished by cruel and lingering deaths.
Upon inquiring after the mother of Anna and
Philip and what had befallen her, Zeno replied,
that no sooner was the work of destruction at
the Synagogue completed, than the Greeks in a
crowd, joined by many of the Roman soldiery,
made for her dwelling and soon razed it to
the ground, destroying also the walls of the
garden, and whatever else there was on which
they could lay their rude and violent hands.
The widow herself, knowing in season of the
intended assault, was concealed in the dwelling
of a friend, and soon as the city became calm
again, disguising herself, fled for the dominions
of Herod.
I now yielded to the hospitable importunity
of Zeno, and accompanied him to his house.
This truly it was necessary for me to do,
whether it liked me or not, for with the
dwelling
of the wine merchant had been destroyed
all that which it contained; so that I could do
no otherwise than take shelter beneath some
friendly roof, till I should be able to repair my
losses. And this too must be done with speed;
for, although Zeno had used all his eloquence
to that end, he could obtain for me only till the
following morning to make such preparations as
should be needful, in order to my departure and
journey. Through the ready aid afforded by
the Greek these preparations were soon
completed
,
and before the sun had left his bed on
the day succeeding that of my deliverance, I bade
farewell to Csarea, and through its southern
gate took my way into the surrounding country.
A single camel was sufficient for such things as
I desired to take with me, committed to the
charge of his driver, a Jew of Csarea, well
commended to me by Zeno for his knowledge
of the road and his honesty. Zeno would
not allow me to depart alone, but must needs,
notwithstanding all the dissuasion I dared to
use, accompany me a part of the way. Soon
as the city gates were opened therefore we
issued forth, plunging at once into the hilly
region which stretches to the south of Csarea.
I had left the particular direction we should take
to Zeno, being wholly ignorant, as you may
suppose, my mother, of the country I was about
to traverse, except that I had a general notion
of the quarter where lay the Jordan, the Salt
Sea, and Jerusalem.
It was with no little satisfaction that, after a
scene of so much violence as had lately passed
in Csarea, and events that had ended so
disastrously
to persons for whom, though known but
for so short a period, I had conceived a sincere
friendship, I found myself once more
surrounded
by nature alone, which is ever at peace. All
sights and sounds at this early hour of the day,
and this calm season of the year, were such as
gave rise to healing thoughts. I had had
enough and more than enough, for once, of
what I have ever loved so well, strife and
uproar
;
and I greeted with a real and hearty
welcome
the new world into which I was now
entering. The air was still, the earliest rays of
the sun were just lighting up the highest peaks
of Mount Carmel, a few clouds lay sleeping in
the East, a peasant now and then, with his
loaded mule or camel, passed us on his way to
the markets of the Roman capital, while others
were just emerging from their dwellings to
commence the labor of the day,  these and
the like objects were now before and around
me, and I confess I felt it to be no unwelcome
change after the days spent in Csarea. I
rode on at first silently enjoying my new
existence
,
without a thought of my companion, or
of the way we were going; and as a thing
truly worthy of admiration, Zeno interrupted
not my reveries, nor once uttered a word, till at
length weary of myself and my thoughts, I
asked him, if the camel driver were taking us
on the most direct rout to Beth-Harem, for it
seemed to me that we were keeping too much
to the sea.
It is by no means, replied my companion,
entering eagerly the door I had opened, the
most direct way, but it is a safer way than any
other; and agrees by reason of its solitariness
with the wish, which but yesterday you
declared
,
to avoid, as much as might be, the more
thickly peopled districts, seeing that you felt
but little in the mood of mingling or conversing
with any,  a poor temper truly for a traveller;
for what shall he know more of a new people
or country, than before he saw them, who keeps
the company only of his own thoughts? He
may, indeed, publish the fact, that here he
crossed a river, and there a mountain, and there
passed through a city or a town, but of what
the people are, who are of more account than
hills or rocks, he will know no more than his
mule. A country is but a larger city, and how,
my young Hebrew, should I know the name
and the affairs of every man in Csarea, as
praised be the gods I do, if I went about like
thee, with a shut mouth and a frost-bitten
visage
.
If thou wouldst know what is in man,
the tongue is better than instruments of torture
to find it out. Used with discretion, and as
need shall be with cunning, and no corner of
the heart shall keep its secrets. There be few
in Csarea, Greek, Jew, or Roman, but by the
use of this gift of nature I am familiar as well
with their hearts as their faces. Pilate, the dark
Pilate, hath not escaped me.
How, I asked, interrupting the stream of
words, have you approached the inaccessible
Pilate?
Pilate, he replied, hath Procla, and Procla
hath Cataphilus, and through these two
Syracusan
glasses, properly adjusted, do I read his
soul. No man, not Pilate even, is wholly
himself
;
others possess a part, more or less; he
must let out into one ear or another, else, as a
wine-skin, would he burst with the inward
ferment
.
So that by a careful spying, you
without
difficulty learn the way through one into
another, and thus by direction or indirection do
you obtain universal knowledge. The sight of
a man, truly considered, is more in his tongue
than his eyes; the sight, I say, that sees more
than trees, clouds, or hills. But for thee, if thou
wouldst travel secretly and unobserved, and
without using thy true eyes, this way which
we take is the better; and, as I said, it is also
safer, and for that reason chiefly is it that I have
chosen it out of many. There may be those
in Csarea who would gladly do thee an ill
turn; for be it now known to thee, that in the
affray at the Synagogue, at that moment when
Philip and Anna fell, and thou didst then plunge
into the thickest of the fight, many of the
Romans
,
and some of consideration too, Greeks
also as well as Romans, bit the dust; and by
many has thy life been with oaths devoted.
This way is therefore best for thee; it lies
among these hills of Megiddo, a part of the
Carmel ridge as thou seest, and is least likely of
any to have been chosen as the path to
Beth-Harem
.
Here then thou canst linger and muse
at thy leisure, and dream or sleep. Yet before
I leave thee should I say, that by and by
turning
toward the east and leaving the hill
country
,
thou wilt suddenly find thyself at the gates
of Samaria; but being a Jew, thou mayest not
choose to pass among Samaritans.
Forgetting my new character I informed
Zeno with some little energy, that I was a
Roman
,
and cared not whom I travelled among;
Jew and Samaritan were alike. At this he
laughed heartily, amusing himself at great
length, with the ease with which I was first a
Roman, then a Jew, as the occasion or
circumstances
seemed to require.
Thus we travelled on, Zeno having found
me a listener again, and overwhelming me with
a flood of words  till the sun was well up,
and the chill air of the morning was giving
way before the heats of an unclouded Syrian
day, when he declared that, with whatever
reluctance
,
he must part from me and return to
the cooler retreats of the city. I commended
to him the mother of Philip and Anna, should
she ever seek again the precincts of Csarea,
and besought him, if such a step would give
her pleasure, to afford her every aid she might
require to enable her to reach Rome, and take
up her dwelling with my mother. This he
promised to do; and should such an event take
place, I am sure, my mother, it will be grateful
to thee as well as to myself. The Greek then
turning his horse's head, and giving me his
best wishes and the blessing of his gods, was
soon lost sight of on his way to the city. I
must confess a sadness at his departure,
notwithstanding
he so often proved a vexation
through the mass and the strangely assorted
varieties of matter, which without pause he
would pour into any ear that remained open.
But what was a sensible relief under such
inflictions
was the circumstance, that he rarely
required
sign of assent or dissent on the part of
the listener; it was enough if there were tokens
of so much life as proved him to be awake.
Being now left to myself, I took more note
of the country through which my road lay, and
of the nearer and more distant objects by which
I was surrounded. It was a region very full
of beauty of every sort; and I was not sorry,
though I truly lamented the loss of the Greek
as one who had befriended me, to be alone in
the midst of it. Hills of considerable height,
VOL. I. 12
like the lower ridges of the Appenines, which
here and there shoot out on either side to the
Adriatic and the Tuscan seas, were on my right
and left, some bare and rocky, but for the most
part clothed with verdure, and showing,
perched
upon elevations far above the path I travelled,
the dwellings of the inhabitants surrounded by
their vineyards, for which they win a place
where to a stranger's eye there seems little else
than cliffs of rock. But wherever the ground
opened, and the hills drew back a space, the
cottages of the peasantry were thickly set
together
,
buried beneath the foliage of the rich,
fruit-bearing trees of these climes, or
encompassed
by fields covered with the best products
of the season, or by plantations of the olive
and the fig. The tall and majestic date tree
was here and there to be seen overtopping all
others, and giving a sure sign of a neighboring
habitation. But chiefly was the eye pleased
with the vineyards, in which, as with us, the
vines are led from tree to tree and shrub to
shrub, where these natural supports are at hand,
so forming a thousand shady retreats from the
noon-day sun.
The vintage was already in progress, and
descending the craggy steeps, or winding along
the road, or standing at the wine presses were
mules and asses heavy-laden, and almost hidden
from the sight, by the overhanging burden of
the red grapes of Judea. Merry and noisy with
the wild songs of the country were many of
the troops of laborers, as we met them coming
and going with their fragrant loads. Peace
be with you, was the good wish often bestowed
upon me with free gifts of the ripe fruit they
were bearing along. All that met my sight or
hearing was proof of a happy and contented
people, for whom the earth yielded with bounty
what was needful to their support, and between
whom and a prosperity such as few lands could
boast no hindrance seemed to stand but this
slavery to Rome; this dependence not indeed
so much on Rome as on her servants, who,
oftener than is known to the powers at home,
thrive by the oppression and injury of the
subject
province. More and more, my mother, the
more I know and see of our tribe, do I find
myself
drawn to them. Not forever should a
people
like this dwell thus in subjection to a
foreign
power. Yet have they now continued for
so many years subject in this manner to Rome,
and so accustomed are they to the insults and
injuries of a state of slavery, that they perceive
not the evil of their condition; just as the limbs
long bound by chains come at length to be so
hardened, that iron is as any other substance.
Many have forgotten that they are slaves. So
long have they borne the exactions of the
tax-gatherer
,
that they see in him the messenger of
a lawful power. Especially is this so among
these hilly and remote regions, where they
witness
no other tokens of their dependent state
besides
the stated visitations of the publican;
dwelling otherwise in security and peace,
enjoying
the religion transmitted to them by their
fathers, and the various customs which
distinguish
them from every other people.
When we had journeyed on several hours,
and the heat had grown to be burdensome both
to ourselves and our beasts, we looked around
for a cool and pleasant spot, where we might
shelter ourselves from the fierce rays of the sun,
and obtain the rest and refreshment which were
now greatly needed. This, after passing over
a barren and sandy track, we soon found; for
upon leaving it and entering again beneath the
dark shadows of some trees, which from their
kinds denoted habitations at hand, we perceived
not far before us, beneath a spreading mulberry,
one of the humbler dwellings of which we had
passed so many. No ray of the sun seemed to
penetrate the high roof of the mulberry and
some lofty palms that were stretched over it.
The signs not of poverty, though the house
was small and low, were before us, but of
comfort
that springs from simple habits of life, and
natural wants which the fruitful earth
abundantly
supplied. At the door, turning the mill to
the sound of their voices and that of a spring
which tumbled from a rock at the side of the
house and fell sparkling into a rude basin below,
sat two young girls so separated from all other
things by their labor, the noise of the stones,
their music and laughter and the tumbling
rivulet
,
that our approach was not observed till we
were quite near them, when suddenly ceasing
from their work, while one shrunk backward
within the door of the cottage the other at once
arose, and advancing toward me, besought me
in reply to my inquiries for refreshment to
alight and rest myself during the heats of the
day, while herself and her sister would draw water
for our beasts. I was not slow to accept her
hospitable offers; and in a few moments more
I was reposing in the cool shade at the door of
the cottage, while our animals were turned loose
to feed upon the wild shrubs, and quench their
thirst at the spring, from which the sisters
supplied
the water in their large pitchers. As they
performed this service, while no others made
their appearance from the dwelling, nor did any
others seem to be in its neighborhood, I asked
if they dwelt alone.
Not alone, said the elder of the sisters, as
she poured a fresh pitcher of water into the
12 *
watering trough, yet almost alone, for mother
we have none, and our father is gone up to the
Feast where he strangely abides. Our brothers
are in the field on the other side of yonder hill,
where they gather the grapes. We shall not
see them till the sun has fallen. So it is, Sir,
every day; we are at home, but the rest are for
the most part away at their labor.
I asked at what feast their father was absent,
and where.
Truly, replied the girl with a look of
simple surprise, I thought you had been one
of us.
Perhaps I am, I rejoined, yet still I know
not where your father can be gone.
If, she replied with hesitation and
confusion
,
you were a Jew, as assuredly I should
judge you were from your countenance, you
could not be ignorant, that the great Feast hath
just passed, the Feast of the Harvest, at which
it behoves every good Israelite to go up to
Jerusalem
,
whither my father is gone, but whence ere
this he should have returned.
The hills, cried out Ziba the camel driver,
between this and the city, be full of robbers.
It calls for good courage and good arms to go
through in safety.
Our father hath both, replied the daughter,
and we do not fear.
But what, rejoined the camel driver, hath
thy father, a Samaritan, to do at Jerusalem? I
doubted to rest here  but
Fear not, said the girl, we are not of
Samaria but Judea; but were it not so, the
water of the spring could not harm thee or thy
cattle.
That may be, replied Ziba, or may not
be; when a people are left of God, it is reason
that neither their water nor their grain is
wholesome
.
The girl at this laughed heartily as she
said, Our grain is grown indeed partly on the
soil of Samaria; beware of the cakes I shall
now bake, lest they choke thee, or change thee
to a Samaritan or a Devil. But rest you now
while we make ready some food.
Saying this, the sisters retreated within the
cottage, bearing with them the meal they had
been grinding, and while I slumbered through
weariness and the heat,  it was about the fifth
hour,  they prepared hot cakes of wheat and
barley, milk, cheese, and honey, of which, when
restored by sleep, we partook with many thanks
for the great refreshment. When this was over,
and Ziba was employing himself in making
ready the animals for our further journey, many
questions were asked concerning the late
troubles
in Csarea, a rumor of which, both going
beyond and falling short of the truth, had
reached this lodge in a wilderness. We
hear, said the sisters, that great numbers of
our people were slain. But as we judge from
what we know, the Jews were over hasty, and
put themselves needlessly in the way of danger.
Alas! we have ever been a people fond of
quarrel
.
But, said I, do you suffer no burdens
which are hard to bear, bound on you by this
Roman power? And may not the slave turn
on the tyrant who treads him under foot?
What say your father and brothers, when the
publican comes with his Roman warrant for the
fruit of your labors, which goes not to the
treasury at Jerusalem, but to Pilate's coffers, or
across the great sea to Rome?
They replied, Ah, Sir, but then we live in
peace in our homes, and enough is left whereon
to subsist. Prophets have dwelt in poverty, and
why should such as we care to be rich? And,
besides, if we paid not our taxes to the Romans
we should pay not less to some governor of
our own at Jerusalem. Our father says, that
our own people, when they have held the
power, have been as hard as Rome. Our
brothers think not so indeed; they are ever
crying out for freedom, and think that to be
delivered from Rome and Pilate would be
freedom
;
while our father tells them it would
rather be anything else.
Thy father, cried Ziba, if no Samaritan
is worse than a Samaritan, being, as he is a dog
of Herod, the slave of a slave, on whom may
all curses light.
Thy tongue, cried the girl, inflamed
with sudden passion, is false as Gehazi's; and
take heed lest his leprosy cleave to thee. My
father is no slave of Herod, and no traitor in
act or thought. Were all Jews such as he,
then might we rule ourselves. But it is, as he
says, because of the rotten heart of the people,
that it is needful we be in bondage to Rome or
some other power. It is for our sins that it is so,
and must be so. Besides, Sir, turning to me,
we have ever found a friend in Procla, the wife
of Pilate, to whom we yearly carry up our
country wine and the choicest of our fruits.
Ah hah, cried Ziba, now doth thine
own mouth condemn thee.
I beseech thee, said the girl, addressing
me, rebuke thy slave; his tonge offends.
We are none the less Jews because of the
favors of Procla. There are none than we
more zealous in every custom of our fathers.
But we may be Jews and still believe that a
Roman hath a heart as well as we. If it seem
strange, that we, though so distant, do know
the wife of Pilate, it chanced with her, as with
thee, to rest here with her attendants, as for
her greater pleasure she took this more secret
way,  and to those who love the face of the
earth, this more pleasant way,  to Jerusalem;
Pilate himself passing through Samaria. When
we saw her, we learned that the Gentiles were
not all such as at the synagogues we were
told, but that the God of the Jews is also the
God of the Gentiles, and has set his image in
them. For, Sir, surely never was there in
woman a gentler soul than Procla's,  nay not
our mother's,  and that is much to say,
too much it would seem, I doubt not, to those
who knew
her
only. Spite of thy slave, we
hope and shall say so, that no evil befel the
wife of Pilate in the fight at Csarea  for
the whole city we have heard was in arms,
and many slain on either side.
I assured her that no evil had befallen her,
and imparted a greater pleasure still, when I
said that I myself, though I knew her not, had
been beholden to her for my liberty.
As I said this the younger sister exclaimed,
See another traveller approaches, he is in
good time. The cakes are yet hot upon the
hearth.
At the same moment emerging from a
pathway
among the surrounding shades, in a
direction
as if he had come from the sea, appeared
the traveller; apparently oppressed as we had
been by the heats of the mountain passes or
leafless plains. After the wish of peace had
been exchanged, the stranger was at once
besought
by the elder sister to come with his
horse to the spring, and himself to alight and
partake of the simple fare which still covered
the board,  an offer not to be refused; indeed,
which was gladly accepted. My attention
was at once fixed upon the new comer, for his
whole appearance was remarkable. The signs
of wealth were many and great, in the horse
he rode and his trappings, and in his own
dress; but these, though they caught the eye
first, were at once forgotten in the greater
power of his countenance and form, which
instantly made the beholder conceive of him
as one raised above others by birth and
condition
,
or his own natural force. He was in
the midway of life or beyond. His eye, of
a deep and penetrating glance, seemed not
only to see what it fell upon, but to pass
into it and through it, not as if with any
injurious intent, but because simply it had
that power. His color was as dark as that of
the Jews ever is in this hot climate,  darker
than we often see in Rome, except in those
who have just crossed the sea,  his beard of a
just length and black. These things I at once
noted as he saluted me with the others, and
conversed with the sisters. I would willingly
have remained, but as when he arrived I, with
Ziba, was just on the point of departure, I
could not well do so, and therefore inquiring
first the distance and the direction to the tomb
of Ahab on the outskirts of Samaria, I was
about to set forth, when the stranger said that
as he was pursuing the same road to the same
place, he would accompany and direct me, if
that would give me pleasure. I was not slow
to accept the proffered service, and when
resting
but for a few moments he had partaken
of some fruit and wine, we bade farewell to our
entertainers and betook ourselves to the road.
When I first turned to where the young
Jewess had pointed, and beheld my companion
as he issued from the dark wood, it had seemed
to me, as often happens, as if the same event
had once taken place before, or, as if a dream
had suddenly come to pass. As he approached
and I beheld him nearer, I did not doubt that
I had in some place and at some time before
seen him. In a single moment more the truth
was plain, that I looked once again upon the
Jew horseman of Csarea, who, more like an
apparition,  even like the terrible horseman
that of old in the temple fell upon the royal
thief, Heliodorus,  than a reality, had risen
from the earth, and for a time turned the tide
of battle. It was with great joy that I found
myself persuaded of this truth, for it could not
be but that such an one must be of power
among the Jews, and fitted to give me all the
knowledge and counsel I could need or desire.
At first it did not appear reasonable he should
have on his part any knowledge of me, but
when I considered that from what Zeno had
let fall, as well as from the manner in which
my weapon and my body had been hacked,
I had been long and fiercely engaged in the
fight,  though in some sort beside myself,
it seemed to me not unlikely, that he also
might have some recollection of me, which was
made certain almost by the manner in which
his eye now and then fell upon me, as we rode
on, and was again quickly withdrawn. I,
therefore, soon as an occasion would allow,
turned our discourse upon Csarea, asking him
whether he had now just left that city. He
replied, that, as I had seen, he came not
immediately from that direction. He had last
come from Antipatris; but since he was in
Csarea, he had journeyed to the north as far
as Sepphoris; but Herod having suddenly left
that place, whom he had hoped to find present,
he had not remained, but withdrawn at once to
the sea coast.
VOL. I. 13
You have not been idle, I rejoined,
since the affair in Csarea, when this same
horse bore you against the centurion and his
troop at the moment the brave Philip was cut
down.
I too am right, then, replied the stranger,
in supposing thee to be the young madman
who broke loose at the same moment, but
driving headlong and blindly into a mass of the
Greeks was quickly overpowered and pinioned.
I marvel to see you among the living, having
once been within reach of Pilate.
I then gave him an account of the manner
in which I had been so fortunate as to escape
from his power; and in my turn asked him by
what chance he had happened to come up at
the unexpected conjuncture he did, and by
what means, when the odds were so great
against him, he had been able to effect his
retreat.
As soon, he replied, as I heard of the
intended outrage upon our people in C
sarea
,
I resolved to be there to stand by them as
I might. I could not, however, reach the place
till the morning of the Sabbath when the
assault took place; when, having no means of
learning what was to be done on the part of the
Jews,  the fight, indeed, was already begun,
I could only rush upon the scene in the
manner I did, and with such followers as, with
but brief notice, I could persuade to join me.
I fought till the coming of a fresh legion of the
Roman power made longer resistance to be
certain destruction or captivity, without any
attending advantage, when with the rest of our
unhappy countrymen I fled; and while they
took shelter in the bye ways of the city and
their dwellings, I, borne by my good Arab,
passed the gates, and soon gained the
neighboring
hills.
But why, I asked, as you made toward
the centurion gave you that warning  to save
a life you yourself were about to take?
For the reason, he replied, that even as
I would not that child of mine should do the
deed of Judith or Deborah, so did it grieve me
that Anna a child of Sameas should, whom I
had known and loved as a daughter. Neither
was I willing that a brave Roman should die
the death of a dog. Yet how knew I but it
was the Lord's doing? And who was I to
hinder or defend? Wherefore gave I forth that
uncertain voice, which if the Lord so pleased
the man should comprehend, and so be saved
for a more worthy death with me hand to hand,
a fate I should have soon dealt out to him.
It pleased the Lord that he should die as a fool
dies, by the hand of a woman.
And it was to revenge her death, I said,
that I threw myself into the fight, which
otherwise I should have shunned; for I deemed
it needlessly provoked. As I said these last
words, the eye of my companion fell upon me
with a meaning quite different from its former
expression, and which showed that dark
passions
were lodged within.
How sayest thou? he bitterly asked
needlessly provoked? Is the life of a Jew
nought, and his faith nought? Shall he at the
word of a Roman give up both? Is he forever
to be the sport of the tyrant? Are his only
words to be, here is my neck for thy foot, and
my throat for thy knife? Verily I thought
thou wast a Jew also. Why then didst thou
fight to revenge the death of a Jewess? What
was she to thee?
She was much to me, I said, as was her
mother  even as for two weeks and more I
had dwelt beneath their roof, and in that short
time had I come to love her as a sister. And it
was to revenge her death, and not because I
could justify the revolt of the Jews, that I
joined the fight. Yet do I not, in saying this,
admit that I am no Jew. I am now a Jew, if
I was not in Rome whence I am but lately
come, and it was because I had become a Jew,
that I withstood Philip and his adherents to
the last, as more mad than wise. They were
as men driven by their passions, and seeking
their own revenge rather than their country's
good.
At this the Jew horseman looked at me as
if he hardly understood me, notwithstanding
his far-reaching and all-embracing eyes. A
calm again came over him, and in the tones of
his former conversation he said I perceive,
young man, there is virtue in thee.
Abjure
thy Rome a little longer, and dwell
among thine own people, and thou wilt grow to
be worthy of thy great descent. But the
Roman
Jew, as I take thee to be, is no Jew.
I said that it was my purpose to see the
whole of the land, in its length and breadth,
from Dan to Beersheba, and from Arabia to the
shores of the Sea, ere I again returned to Rome;
and but for the interruption of my plans
occasioned
by the tumults of Csarea, I should long
since have been at Beth-Harem, whither I was
now bound, and whence, after abiding there a
space, I should set forth on my Jewish travels.
Whom seek you at Beth-Harem? asked
the stranger; for I myself dwell there, and
will guide you on the way.
I said I sought the dwelling of Onias a prince,
as I was told, of that country.
None so well as I, he quickly replied, can
13*
take you to his dwelling, for I am Onias of
Beth-Harem.
At this unlooked for announcement, I was
amazed as you may well suppose, my mother,
and could only say in return, that I then was
his nephew, Julian of Rome, the son of
Naomi.
Not less astonished, than I, was thy brother
in his turn. He welcomed me heartily to the
land of our Fathers, and would not doubt that,
when I had dwelt for a time beneath his roof, I
should take too deep root in the soil ever to
flourish again in that of Italy. He asked with
great affection after your welfare, and wished
that you too had undertaken your travels to the
East. For a long time we conversed of the
condition and welfare of our family, dispersed
as it is so widely in Italy, Greece, Egypt, and
Syria. He ended with saying, that he trusted
ere long that events of such a kind would take
place in Judea, as to call back all wanderers and
residents in foreign lands to their native soil;
new scenes were about to unfold.
Since leaving the cottage among the hills,
where we had been so hospitably entertained,
we had journeyed on through a richer and more
highly cultivated soil. Although the region
was still hilly, and rocks were to be seen jutting
out on the sides of the hills, yet was there no
spot to be discerned from their base to their
summits, which did not bear testimony to the
labors of the husbandman, and was not
burdened
with the products of the latter harvest.
Villages on all sides, wherever the eye could
reach far around, were seen half buried amongst
the dense foliage of these regions, and the
highways
everywhere filled with the heavy wains,
drawn by oxen or bulls, and laden with fruits
and grain. Never had I beheld a region that
gave better proof of industry and skill on the part of the inhabitants; or where the population
appeared to enjoy more of the common
comforts
of life. We were still winding along
among valleys of utmost beauty and fertility,
when as the hills on the north began to open,
Onias said, that we were now within the
territory
of Samaria, which, for his own part, he
would gladly have avoided; but seeing, as he
judged, that I should feel desirous to pass by a
place so famous as the city of that name, he
had departed from the course which he was
accustomed
to pursue when he crossed over from
the sea to Beth-Harem. Soon, said he, as
we reach yonder hillock on the summit of
which you can already see the ruins of the tomb
of Ahab, will you obtain a view of the city.
In a few moments we stood on the place to
which he had pointed. The ruins of what had
been a structure of some magnificence covered
the spot, over which towered palms and
cypresses
.
Before us and below us lay the city,
built upon an elevation of an oval form in the
midst of an extensive plain, bounded on all
sides by a circle of hills. We ourselves were
upon a part of the southern range which thus
hemmed it in. At a distance were visible,
toward
the sea, the tops of Carmel, and toward
Galilee Mount Tabor, towards the Jordan
Hermon
and Gilboa, and behind us Gerizim and
Ebal; while in the north, like the light clouds
that were above us, we could just discern the
snowy peaks of Lebanon. The city glittering
beneath the rays of the sun, then not far above
the horizon, gave unexpected tokens, in both
the extent of the walls and the overtopping
structures within, of its extent and the wealth
of its inhabitants. I expressed to Onias my
delight
and surprise.
What you see, he replied, is the work of
Herod; not, as you may believe, of those
half-idolaters
.
Herod wanting a strong hold here in
the heart of the land, rebuilt Samaria, which,
since the destruction of it by Hyrcanus, had
lain in ruins. Now, by reason of the immense
sums which Herod expended in the building of
the walls, and in erecting temples and theatres
within, and especially because of the multitudes
of new inhabitants, Greeks, Jews, and Romans,
whom he compelled to remove thither, it is
grown to be a place of some consequence, but
not of so much as its foolish inhabitants are fain
to believe. They are a bastard race. Upon a
Gentile stock have been grafted decayed and
rotten branches from all parts of the earth, so
that there is as little of the blood of the Jew in
a Samaritan, as there is of the true faith of a
Jew in his doctrine. Come on, let us give them
our backs. May their prosperity decrease
daily.
I would willingly have lingered longer on a
spot so agreeable in itself, and which spread out
before the beholder so wide and beautiful a
prospect. Inwardly resolving at some future
time to return and examine at my leisure a
country that seemed to offer so much to reward
the observer, I followed Onias, and Samaria was
soon hidden again behind hills and woods.
Sebaste, said Onias abruptly as we
resumed
our journey, Sebaste is the name which
Samaria now bears, given to it by that flatterer
Herod; a Roman name to a Jewish town  as
ill sorted as a born Jew with a Roman name.
What ill chance gave thee the name of
Julian
?
My father, I answered, would have it so,
who, he might know, was no lover of his own
race.
I might have guessed as much, replied
Onias; Rome weaned him from Judea. And
when Rome spoiled him of his Jewish nature,
it wrought a greater ruin than sometimes when
it spoils a kingdom. Thy father was born for
greater things than he ever performed. His
days were passed in amassing wealth; they
should have been spent at the head of armies.
So, said I, is it ever the nature of the
more powerful to draw everything over to itself.
The greatness, splendor, and renown of Rome,
dazzle the young mind and easily take it
captive
.
It was but a little while since, that to be
known to be a Jew, was to me the great
affliction
of life. In truth the shame of my descent
has been to me the only evil I have suffered
from my birth. Wealth could satisfy every
wish of my heart, but it could not cause me to
be born again; it could not change the hue of
my skin, nor the features of the face.
Happy for thee, Julian, that a power higher
than thyself ruled over thee and saved thee.
Judea needs thee; and I trust to see thee
answer
to her call.
I said, that I was now bent upon knowing
the exact state of the country, that I might
learn what part it became me to act. I could
not in Csarea take sides with Philip, because
as I judged, he was over hasty, and outwent the
judgment of the people at large, whereby he
injured rather than benefited a good cause.
Nevertheless, rejoined my Uncle, it was
a sign of the times, and showed what is in the
heart of the Jews. What happened in Csarea
would have happened also in Jericho, in Sychar,
in Bethsaida, nay even in Samaria; for so much
may be said for Samaritans, that they love not
Rome, but look, even as we do, for a
deliverance
from her dominion, and for a Deliverer.
Julian, the time ripens! The wise and the
good of our land, with impatience await what
shall ere long be made manifest.
Onias said this in deep and significant tones.
I hoped that he would go on, but he paused.
I then said, that even in Rome I had heard
somewhat of that concerning which he spoke;
but it was little and uncertain, and I knew not
what to think. From my mother I had heard
of a day of deliverance to which our tribe
looked
forward, and of the coming of Messiah; but
of what was truth and what was error, in such
expectations, I knew nothing. Philip too had
spoken of the same things. But, to me, it all
seemed doubtful and baseless, without anything
certain and fixed, to which the mind could
attach itself;  while that Judea was an
oppressed
and degraded kingdom, that her rights were
withheld, her sceptre unrighteously wrested
from her grasp, her liberties gone, were things
that every eye could see; and the remedy for
such evils not difficult to be devised, nor out of
all hope to be carried into execution.
Onias, at this, looked upon me with an
expression
not easy to interpret. But words soon
followed.
Young man, said he, your speech is
both pious and impious. The piety, I believe,
is your own; the impiety is your father's.
Had God forsaken you, as your father did, you
had now been altogether as one of the Gentiles.
But He has watched over and redeemed you
for ends greater than you now know of. When
once beneath the roofs of Beth-Harem, I shall
trust to weed out the errors that now offend
thy mind, and plant in their place the seeds of
truth. There be others there also, men learned
in our laws, at whose feet a willing disciple
shall drink in wisdom as water.
Onias, as he said these words, fell back into
himself, as I perceive he is ever prone to do,
and we continued our way in silence.
The shadows of evening were now around
us, and we were travelling still among the hills
that stretch to the east and south of Samaria,
but not in solitudes, for the country was
everywhere
thickly peopled, and the ways were yet
filled with travellers to and from Samaria, and
with the peasants of the neighboring places,
returning home with empty or loaded wagons.
I was looking to keep on our journey during
the early part of the night, and reach the
Jordan
at least, before we slept; but my uncle
now informed me that a little distance beyond
where we were, we should arrive at the Inn of
Jael nigh unto Thebez, where we should rest,
for our beasts' sake, until the following day.
While he was speaking we emerged from the
hills and woods, and descended the last slope
which conducted us to the plains. As we thus
descended, Mount Hermon was before us, over
which the moon was just climbing; and
beneath
us lay the valley of the Jordan stretching
to the horizon, covered with its villages,
the nearer of which were clearly visible,
with groves of the palm intermingled
sending
their lofty tops to the heavens. I was
too much engrossed by the beauty of the scene
to think of my companion; and we rode on,
each pursuing his own thoughts, till we
approached
the Inn of Jael. This we found
thronged already by those who had come to
seek shelter for the night; for, at this season of
the year, although a fierce heat is apt to rage
through the day, the air becomes cold at night,
VOL. I. 14
and heavy dews descend, so that the covering
of a roof or of a tent is necessary. We at first
believed there could be no room for us, the
concourse of strangers was so great, the
courtyards
being crowded with their beasts and their
lading, and the apartments and the roofs with
their owners and attending slaves. But no
sooner did Jael discover who was his guest
than the room, which had been refused us
by some to whom we had first applied, was
quickly furnished. We were conducted to
the roof where, a tent being spread over us,
we partook of our evening meal and prepared to
rest for the night.
When we had supped, and I then sat
looking
off upon the surrounding country and
conversing
,
Jael, our host, joined us with low
obeisances and formal speech. He hoped that
the great Onias had returned in peace. All
the country had lamented his absence. It was
many days, and seemed months, since he had
bestowed upon his poor dwelling the honor of
his presence. I learn, said he, that thou
hast been beyond Sepphoris even to Sidon.
Farther than that, Jael, replied Onias,
even as far as Antioch and Edessa. What
hast thou heard from Beth-Harem of late; are
all well?
All are well, replied Jael; to day a
traveller from the East, and who had passed
through the midst of Beth-Harem, reported, as
from those who had knowledge, that all were
well in the house of Onias.  Thou wast not,
then, at the outbreak at Csarea, where the
mad-cap Philip, son of Sameas, threw all the
city into a blaze.
My uncle frowned as he said, Jael, thy
soul is too much in thy purse. The Lord
reward thee not according to thy zeal for him;
for thy lot were then truly but as that of the
wicked.
Should I, said Jael quickly, plough up a
wheat field thick with full and milky ears only
to try a better seed? Should I shave this
beard, in hope that a comelier one might
sprout? Should I take out a bill against my
wife, that I might win perchance a better?
My beard is well enough, my wife is well
enough, my wheat is well enough. Ah what
shall come of change and commotion but losses?
Who suffer now? None but rogues and mischief
makers. Who
I will not reason with thee, said my
uncle with impatience. It is well for Judea
that some souls are made of other stuff.
In my belief, continued Jael, the Jews
of Csarea were dealt with after their deserts.
A man now-a-days can live scarce a day in
peace for these sons of Belial. But the blood
let in Csarea may keep it cool in Jerusalem,
so shall good come of it. Hast thou heard the
news here on the Jordan, Onias? If we now
bestir ourselves we may do greater things than
they in Csarea.
What mean you? said my uncle.
I speak, said Jael, of John of Hebron,
who hath taken pains to travel beyond the
Jordan
,
and up and down in that region, some
say, stirring up the people, but others only
preaching. But who can stir the people more
than he who preaches? The ears of the
council
or of Herod I trust will be open to take
note of him.
But what mean you? said Onias, and
of whom do you speak? Jest not after thy
fashion.
I speak truly but what I hear, replied
Jael, and jest not. I have not seen this
wanderer
myself; but have heard somewhat from
every one who hath come from beyond Jordan.
Some even hold him a prophet; but it were
nearer a truth, I doubt not, to hold him
possessed
of a devil. Prophets do not grow on
every bush.
How is he followed? asked my uncle.
From far and near,' answered Jael, have
people resorted to him, some even from
Jerusalem
.
But that makes for nothing, seeing that
they of Jerusalem are ever running after some
new thing.
What, continued Onias, is the manner
of his life and appearance?
Jael could not say. He had heard a
thousand
varying accounts from travellers, but knew
not which were true nor which were false.
His belief was that he was one in part beside
himself, and who was therefore just the kind of
adventurer to amaze and seduce the people.
With the help of a few magic arts, he would
soon make himself great.
The vociferations of new comers, now calling
loudly upon Jael, put an end to our discourse;
our host descended with reluctance to perform
some of the duties of his office, and soon after,
closing the folds of our tent, we fell asleep.
14 *
VI.
Fatigued
by reason of our journey of the
preceding day, the sun was far advanced into
the heavens before the noise of the inn-yard
woke us from our slumbers, and we were ready
for the pleasing labor yet before us. Crowds of
travellers, in not more haste than ourselves,
surrounded the gate-ways with their camels,
asses, and other beasts of burden; some
quarrelling
with Jael on account both of their
entertainment
,
and the sum he had demanded of
them; some with each other about some idle
distinction of nation or tribe; while a large
number pursued in quiet their own affairs, or
looked on and laughed at those, who, because
life did not present enough of necessary evils,
were seeking to multiply them. Jael moved
among them a sort of monarch, from the power
he possessed, not over others, but over himself,
therefore indeed, over others also. He was not
to be ruffled by any of the reproaches, which,
whether justly or not, were showered upon
him. Those who had abused him most he did
not fail to dismiss from his dominions with some
wish of peace, while from them he received,
perhaps, only curses in return.
Jael, said Onias, as we stood beneath the
shadow of a plane-tree, watching the scene,
while Ziba was making the last preparations;
Jael is a man who lives for himself alone.
Though you behold him so pliant, and so
prompt to please and serve, and so patient under
what seem undeserved reproaches, he is yet as
void of faith, both toward man and God, as this
pomegranate-shell is of meat. His aim is but
one, his purse. And to fill this in the best
manner he justly thinks, is to attract by his
attentiveness and submissiveness to all,
people
of all names and nations,  Jew, Samaritain,
Arab, or Roman, it is the same to Jael, and Jael
is the same to them. He is just to one, as soon
as to another; and will defraud one as soon as
another. In what proportion he is knave, and
in what honest, no one knows. When I am on
this road, and weary with the way, my feeling
is, and doubtless it is so with all, here now
shall I be certain of such observances as hardly
my best friend could lavish upon me; and I
approach the roof of Jael as if it were another
Beth-Harem. Behold there! how to that
churlish
Greek he returns smiles and parting
salutations
for railing. He then approached us as
if for some further discourse, but we at the same
moment mounting our beasts and bidding him
farewell, he only wished us well on our way,
and we sallied forth from the yard.
The sun shines not more constantly, said
Onias, as we plunged into some deep, thick
shadows, beneath which the road here wound
along, than the face of Jael; but while the
sun shines for others, Jael shines only for
himself
.
His smiles were frowns, unless each drew
fish of some sort to his net, birds of some sort
to his snare. He perceives no difference
between
Roman, Greek, Jew, and Samaritan, but
as they contribute more or less to his wealth,
which grows and swells like Jordan in the early
rains. Though the land now lie cursed and
barren, and the enemies of the people of God
rise up around her, and dwell within her very
borders, carrying her not away into captivity,
but binding her a captive on her own soil, not
a finger would this man move for her
deliverance
.
Nay, rather, I doubt not, would he league
himself with the adversary, than that the base
traffic should suffer damage, which fills his
hands with gold. And many such there be
here, and over the face of the whole land, so
that were Messiah himself to come, I surely
think they would deny him, except he came in
Csar's name. Saw you not last night his
manifest vexation at the reports brought from
the Jordan?
It was evident enough, I replied, that
he liked them not. They foreboded in his ear
a new uproar as in Csarea. But in these rural
districts there could be little danger.
I know not that, answered Onias; the
people lie thickly sown among these deep
shades; we see them not, but they are for
multitude
like the ripe seed of the mustard shaken
by the winds from the tree. A great cause
would call them up in hosts not easily
numbered
.
And a slight cause rouses them. For
if many be of Jael's nature, more are not. The
ears of the people are wide open to any sound
of liberty. The rulers, as is ever with those
who enjoy power, are indeed of another mind.
Change could do little for them in the best
event, and might shake them from their seats.
But the people do yearn, even as the hungry
for food, for the approach of some power that
shall raise them to their ancient place. They
await its coming with impatience.
They will then, I said, flock around this
prophet on the Jordan; if he be one in truth.
Yet we perceive no signs of it.
There are not a few, rejoined my uncle,
who, moved by what they deem a divine
impulse
,
go forth to teach and declare in the
streets and highways, in wild and desert places,
what they might as well deliver within the
walls of the synagogue. These now cease to
stir the people. He, of whom Jael spoke,
seems to be of this order. There will be other
signs,  another approach, when He shall come.
Time will unfold what it shall.
Onias here withdrew into himself, buried
in thought, of which he seemed to desire no
participator. So we then rode along in silence
together on our way; but soon wearying of
this, I left my uncle to his reflections, and
turned back to where Ziba was slowly toiling
along with his heavy-laden camel, that I might
hold discourse with him. As I reached him he
was singing at the top of his voice a song in
praise of the wines of Judea; but soon as I
joined him he broke off, saying, that by the
song he was singing he was trying to lose the
taste of the vile drink that had been served to
him by the rogue Jael, which was more sour
than the visage of Ben-Ezra of Csarea. Truly,
those maids in the woods knew how to deal
with a stranger, camel-driver though he was.
They were no Samaritans after all, that was
certain. Their wine was sweet as a dried grape,
and it was poured out like water. Jael's,
indeed
,
was in abundance enough, but what
signifies
an abundance of that which cannot be
swallowed. Yet would he stand by and
commend
it as fit for kings, and sweeter than wines
of Greece or Italy, with such oaths and smiles,
too, that one was ready to give the lie to his
own burning throat. Well, well, wait a while,
and the poorest of us will have better wine
than the best of Jael's.
How so? shall you all turn vine-dressers?
or what is to happen?
What is to happen? A Jew! and you know
not that? You may hear it every day with
your ears open. Things are not to remain as
they are. Some new kingdom is to be set up,
some say under Herod of Galilee. So the
Herodians
,
most of them, think. As others judge,
he who is to reign is yet, and shortly too, to
make his appearance, but how or whence, no
one knows, or can know. But why do I tell
you this, when you are yourself, I doubt not, a
scribe at least. Yet, methinks, I heard you
are from Rome.
I am from Rome, I answered, but still
I am a Jew.
What sort of Jews, he asked, are they
in Rome? I do not know that I should
think thee a Jew. Do they keep the law in
Rome?
Surely, or we were not Jews.
I see not that, answered Ziba. We
keep not the law here in Judea, yet we are
Jews.
There are two ways, said I, of keeping
the law; one is, to keep the letter of the law
only, as the Pharisees; the other, to observe
the letter, but keep it in its spirit too.
We only do the first here-abouts, replied
the camel-driver. There 's that Jael; he is
an elder of the synagogue hard by his inn.
You would think, to see him there, as I have
when on this road, that never a prophet loved
God like him; yet the next day shall you pay
him a full sum for sour wine, and your camel's
food shall be half chaff, while he will at the
same time so smile and affirm as to cheat you,
before he has done, out of your own judgment.
As I have heard the Prophets read and the Law,
they command not only to say prayers, offer
sacrifices, and go up to Jerusalem at the feasts,
but to be an honest man besides. Is it not
so?
Surely, I should think it so.
I warrant you it is, if it is anything. I truly,
do not keep the law any way; I am a
camel-driver
.
But this, that I have said, is the sort of
keeping I see in Csarea and Jerusalem. Ah!
what do I not know of some of those long-faced
Pharisees? Many is the time in Csarea I have
tracked them from the very doors of the
synagogues
to their haunts. For me, I love an
honest sinner like myself. None of your
two-faced
,
smooth-tongued, rotten-hearted knaves,
who, having cheated the world all the week,
think on the Sabbath to cheat God as well, by
their fastings and prayers. It is these, who
choose the highest places in the synagogues,
where we can all look on and see the game that
is played, that teach us to despise not them
only, but the law too. Such have more to
answer
for than their own wickedness in the
judgment-day, who have not only not kept the
law themselves, but hindered those who would.
There 's many a ruler of a synagogue I have
known, who, if he were in the world to
come to keep company with Abraham, and
Isaac, and Jacob for his reward, it would not
be good company enough for Ziba, the
camel-driver
.
In the new kingdom you speak of under
Herod, or some other, you will look, I
suppose
,
to see all these things mended, shall you
not?
I know not as to that, replied he; as I
said, I shall then look to have plenty of wine,
sweet wine, too, not such as Jael's  and
other such things, for the reason which is plain
enough, that the Romans will be driven off,
and all that now is stolen from us and carried
VOL. I. 15
away beyond sea will remain here, and the
poor will have their share of it. And,
perhaps
,
vastly more than this, for the priests tell
of great things. But I believe less than half
of what a priest says. Some of them say the
kingdom will last a thousand years, and some
forever. Many good things might come to
pass in that long time, or even if less than half
as long.
But do you not suppose, that under
Messiah
men will be honest,  honest and good?
I know not how that is to be, said Ziba;
I hear not much about it, that is all I can
say. They talk of great riches, great armies
and victories, and of having Rome under our
feet; and Romans for slaves,  dogs as they
are;  but they say little about keeping the
law any better then than now. And, by my
head, I think if there was much to be done
about that, we should hear less of the new
kingdom, than we do. But come, let us
prick on; there are travellers yonder about
to meet us, from whom we may learn news;
let us come up with thy companion, who lies
in wait for them under the shade.
So saying, he urged his beast into a round
pace, and we soon came up with those who
were advancing from the region of the Jordan,
but who, before we reached them, were
pausing
with Onias beneath the shadows of some
spreading trees. They were a company of
merchants from Philadelphia, beyond Jordan,
bound to Csarea. After the tedious
ceremonies
of salutation were over, which in these
parts occupy as much space, as in Rome the
business itself would for which they are the
preparation,  Onias first asked them of the
prosperity of their city, and then of the country
round about them, and if there were of late
anything new concerning Arabia, which
questions
,
when they had been diligently answered,
and they had asked as many in their turn, and
received the desired replies from Onias, my
uncle then inquired of them concerning the
rumor which had met him at the inn of Jael
at Thebez, of a prophet, who had made his
appearance in the neighborhood of the Jordan,
and whether they had either seen him, or heard
of him. He, who seemed to be the principal
person of the company replied, that they had
crossed the Jordan at the ford just above Enon,
and had slept in that village, where indeed they
had heard of the person of whom Onias spoke,
but he was not now in those parts.
What, asked Onias, eagerly, think the
people of him? and has he been at Enon?
He has not been at Enon, answered
the other, but passed by on this side the river.
The people, however, seemed to think, from
what was reported of him on all sides, that he
was surely a prophet. They could speak of
nothing else at the inn where we lodged, but
we were too weary with the heat and travel of
the day to give much heed to what was said,
besides that affairs of our own were to be
transacted. If, as would seem, you are bound
to the same ford at which we have crossed, you
will learn there more than we can tell. It were
better, I doubt not, for this wanderer,
whosoever
he may be, to stay at home and attend
to affairs that concern himself alone. He who
would mend the state does the most in that
way, and most surely, when he keeps himself
and his own affairs whole. The Lord will
prosper the diligent. And when all are
diligent
,
each in his own business, then riches
are multiplied, and the whole land is a garden.
The wisdom of what you say, replied
Onias, is past all doubt. But then when men
are not diligent, when the wicked rule in the
land, when it is because men are the subjects
of Sin that they will not mind their affairs and
their households, what then shall be done?
Before they will become diligent, they must be
brought away from their wickedness; they must
be made to know that it is their sin that stands
between them and their own prosperity and the
prosperity of their country, and that except
they repent the vengeance of God, it may
well be feared, shall be poured out upon them,
as of old on these cities of the plain. But who
shall do this great work? Where is the rabbi
or the priest among us, who hath either wisdom
or power to reach ears that are dull as adders',
and hearts hard as the nether mill-stone?
Verily, we may despair for Israel, except the
Lord have compassion and send unto us whom
he will.
When the Lord sends or speaks, rejoined
the other, the signs of his presence will be
such as the eye cannot be blind to, but will see
and confess as it does the sun over our heads.
I learn not of any such signs, in this case; but
rather that he of whom we speak is some
houseless
traveller, sordid and poor in his attire, and
likely to be in the keeping of some devil,
rather than his own wits. But you will hear
and know what you wish as you travel further
on. In the mean while the Lord keep you.
Come, neighbors.
Saying this, and giving a blow to his ass,
he started on his way, followed by his
companions
and their loaded camels; not concealing
by their loud talk and laughter, as they drew
off, that they held my uncle's earnestness in
light esteem. After the civil encounter of the
15*
first meeting, which we had observed as we rode
up, I had looked for a quite different interview;
but Ziba's opinion was perhaps a just one, that
they had hoped to drive some trade with us,
and seeing no hope of that as the conversation
was prolonged, but that we were quite another
sort of travellers, they scrupled not to vent
their vexation in the way they did.
As they disappeared, Onias broke forth; A
besotted and ignorant people! what hope is
there of Judea? The one part are slaves to
Rome, another part are slaves to riches, and
another part are slaves to sin. Yet is the Lord
as capable to turn the heart of this people,
corrupt
and stiff-necked as they are, as I the head
of the beast I ride. One thing is not easy and
another hard to him; one is not more easy than
another; nor one more hard than another. He
can take up all Rome in the palm of his hand,
and blow it into air, even as fine dust, and this
great plain of the earth itself can he crumble
into atoms by a word of his mouth, and it shall
vanish forever. What to him, then, is Judea,
and the hearts of all her people? Can he not
turn them whithersoever he will, and is there
any to hinder? The end of time is come, even
upon us; the days are fulfilled; and that, which
all who yet have hearts desire, shall come.
This broad land which to-day lies cursed and
barren, delivered over to the hands of strangers,
may even to-morrow, if the Lord so will, (and
ere long the word shall go forth,) sit beneath
the shadow of her own king, and blossom as a
garden of roses. Shall Pilate longer reign where
David did? Shall this Roman Nebuchadnezzar
from the other side of the Great Sea forever
hold us in this worse than Babylonian
bondage
?
These things, and more than these, did
Onias pour forth, rather as if uttering what was
passing through his mind, because it would
come to the lips, than as addressing me. Ziba
was in great astonishment, and doubted whether
he, who was so caught away from earth, were
not himself possessed of a spirit of prophecy.
He said, that although he was but as one of
the wicked, yet when he heard one speak, who
seemed filled with a good spirit, he felt moved
toward him, and could be easily turned about
by him as he would. The priests and
elders, he continued, move me not, seeing
they read and speak as though their own
hearts gave not out what they said, but their
lips only. So that if it appear that they
themselves
who know the law best, and are the
priests of God, are not persuaded of what
they declare, that it is true and excellent, how
can they persuade me? I have ever seen that
when I take a traveller through steep and rocky
passages, full of windings and pitfalls, and
reported to be beset by robbers, they ever have
the faith which they behold in me. But I
cannot
believe the priest, because he believes not
himself.
I could not deny that he had reason on his
side in some good measure, and that until the
synagogue was reformed, he would find little
motive to change his way of life; yet, I added,
that surely all the synagogues were not alike,
nor all the rulers and priests; he ought not to
make one stand for all; doubtless, there were
those, who were as pure as the law they
taught; I had known such in Csarea, and
even in Rome. Ziba, however, never had.
He believed there were none such, and that
their hypocrisies had succeeded in blinding me.
So have I found this poor man, even as I have
found many in Rome, having much good in his
heart, and many desires of what is better, yet
in truth believing in nothing, and trusting none
by reason of the deceits and vices, which he had
seen to be practised by those who have been
the ministers of religion.
Good men will ever make good men. And
even in the precincts, my mother, of the idol
temples of Rome, have I seen virtues to grow
up and flourish, and all good habits and customs
prevail among the worshippers, not, as I believe,
because there was any force in the faith they
had or thought they had in their gods, nor
because
they themselves thought there was, but
only because they beheld sincerity, goodness,
and simplicity in the lives of the priests, who
urged such virtues upon them. If a priesthood
is pure, the faith of the people will be stable;
the reality, which their own hearts tell them
religion is, will not be contradicted by what
they see in the characters of those who profess
to know and believe more than themselves.
But so soon as the worshipper suspects the
sincerity
or the virtue of the man, who makes it
his business to teach virtue and the law of faith,
then it seems to him the foundations on which
he had been standing are taken away from
under his feet, and all is darkness and doubt.
What has it been,  why should I forbear
to utter the truth,  but thy virtues, my
mother, which have preserved some faint light
of faith in my soul. Long before I could
declare
the reasons why it was so, I felt that the
worship of our synagogue was day by day
uprooting
the early religion which by thy care
had been planted in my heart. I used to tell
you of my thoughts, and how it was because of
what I knew or believed to be true of our Priest,
that I felt my youthful reverence for holy things
to decline and die within me, and how it was
because of what I saw and heard of the divine
virtues of the venerable Saturnus, that I was
almost persuaded to become a worshipper in the
temple of Jupiter. They who gathered round
that excellent old man, and listened to his
maxims
,
but more than all, were daily witnesses of
the manner of his life, felt that there was
nothing
so worthy and real as what they saw in
him, and they strove to become like him. This
was true faith. I heard and admired with them
as often as I could elude thy watchful eye, and
it was only thy image ever rising before me
that saved me from throwing myself into the
arms of an abhorred idolatry. For, I said, if it
is not what Saturnus believes of his Jupiter,
that draws me toward his temple, and I scarce
know what he believes  I am persuaded,
moreover, that whatever it is, it is a miserable
superstition  but simply the divine beauty of
his spirit and life, why for that should I esteem
his religion more than my own? Shall the
virtues
of Saturnus, the Pagan, weigh with me
more than those of Naomi the Jewess? Are
they either more in number, or more god-like?
If the virtues of the Pagan bind the youth who
hear him to his faith, shall not the virtues of
Naomi bind her son to his? So that often as
for reasons, which thou knowest well, I was
tempted to renounce the religion of my father,
and all belief of every kind and name, it was
still my unwavering faith in the reality of
virtue as seen embodied in my mother, that
held me back and taught me patience and
humility
.
I waited; and distrusting my power
at so young an age to determine questions so
weighty and difficult, resolved to believe in
virtue if in nothing else, because I saw in thee
that it was a something as stable and real as the
earth itself, and beautiful as the light.
Our road since we left the inn of Jael, had
run through a country with a surface gently
flowing like the summer waves of the sea,
rising and falling, but never with abruptness,
save that on our left at this point of our journey
there rose a steep and lofty hill. Soon leaving
that behind, the prospect before and around us
was wholly that of an extensive plain, crowded
with villages, covered with an abundant
vegetation
,
and giving tokens in the richness of the
soil, and universal verdure, of our approach to the
Jordan. As occasionally we emerged from the
deep and grateful shades, which were cast over
our road by the heavy-leafed trees of these
warmer regions, and gained a slight
elevation
,
we could see the waters of the river here
and there gleaming through the foliage. Next,
Enon rose before us, standing not far from its
banks on the hither side, and Onias having
affairs to despatch in that place, we made
towards
it, although, as you will perceive by the
marks which I have set down of our journey,
it lies far out of a direct course from the hills of
Samaria to Beth-Harem. It was necessary that
Onias should tarry there a space, and besides,
as he assured me, although coming by the ford
of Enon would extend the line of our travel,
yet should we be abundantly repaid by the
greater pleasantness of the road, especially by
that part of it, which, between Enon and
Beth-Harem
,
lies on the bank of the river, and on its
eastern side.
After parting from the three merchants of
Philadelphia, the day being then far advanced,
we had met abundance of travellers, both such
as belonged to those regions, and such as
had come from different parts of Pera and
Arabia
.
Of many had we made the same inquiries
as of the merchants, and from all obtained what
established the truth of the rumor which had
first met us at Thebez  that a stranger from
the south country had appeared on the Jordan
and in the districts on either side, about whom
the people were greatly stirred, but concerning
whom they did not seem to have learned
anything
from which much could be gleaned as to
his real character and purpose. The
expectations
of the whole nation being toward the
appearance of him, whom they believe to have
been promised, they readily behold in any
remarkable
qualities of an individual some of the
features, which they expect to distinguish that
great personage, and thus easily deceive
themselves
.
What we desire to see, we are apt to
think we see. So that although in this John
from Hebron, there be in truth none of the signs
which should announce the Messiah, all are
wondering within themselves, and to one
another, whether it may not be he. At Enon,
while Onias was prosecuting his business with
those whom he wished to see, we still continued
to ask the same questions of all, as on the road,
but without arriving at any knowledge that was
much more distinct; and what we heard from
one often was at variance from what we heard
from another; and this notwithstanding John
had already been on the Jordan near the place,
accompanied by some who had joined him as
followers; so difficult is it where the
expectations
are of a certain character, to make up our
judgments according to the real appearances
before us, rather than in agreement with what
exists only in our own minds.
When Onias had ended what he desired to
accomplish in Enon, we set forth towards the
Jordan which now lay but a few furlongs from
VOL. I. 16
the town. I approached with curiosity and
delight this stream of which the name and
history
had been so long familiar. I well
remembered
how, as the feet of the Priests who bore
the ark touched its brim, the waters dried up,
and after they had passed over, the multitudes
of Israel followed in safety, notwithstanding it
was the time of harvest and the Jordan
overflowed
all his banks  a miracle which for its
greatness is like those wrought in Egypt, and
which together show so evidently that God
manifested himself in those days to such, and
for such things, as he deemed worthy. At this
time of the year we found the river deprived of
more than half its waters by reason of the
drought; and so, although it seemed broad,
broader
in truth than I had looked to find it, yet did it
also appear much more shallow, seeing that I
had overlooked the fact that, like all rivers
which take their rise among mountains, it is
subject to great inequalities, being swollen so as
to overflow its banks at the time the snows
melt and the early rains descend; and then
during
the great heats of summer being diminished
in like proportion below its ordinary size. The
banks were thickly grown over with every kind
of shrub and tree, here and there overhanging
the waters, then retreating and leaving an open
space of clear grassy slope. The gaudy flowers
too of this climate were everywhere glittering in
the sunlight, or else themselves sending out rays
of light by reason of their gorgeous colors, as they
grew among the deep shadows of the trees. Birds
too  now indeed silent through the heat of the
day  but of hues like flame, glanced hither and
thither amongst the branches of the willow or the
broad terebinth. And up and down on either
side of the stream were companies of the
inhabitants
of the neighboring cities and villages,
reposing in the shade, or watching their
children
as they pursued the shining insects that
darted through the air, or venturing into the
Jordan sported in its swift running waters.
The scene on either side of the stream, as it
wound its way along, was very beautiful to the
eye and the mind; and as we slowly bent our
steps to the water there where the ford was, and
entered it, we could not refuse, so inviting was
all around and not least the cool waves running
below, to linger and pause frequently as we
went over, each confessing that if we sought
to indulge our humor, it would be to remain just
there where we were through the heat of the
day. But as such pleasures must have an end
we presently reached the further side of the
river, and pursued our way on the Eastern bank
down toward Beth-Harem.
Now, exclaimed Onias, as we left the
waters
of the river and ascended the opposite
bank, are we within the Dominions of Herod,
who is in part at least a Hebrew; yet whether
a Hebrew but in part or not, it is he who should
now be king of Judea. Philip is not he. He
is too much the lover of peace for such times
as are to unfold. Herod was born for them.
Yet even Herod, said I, is subject to
Rome. It matters little who is king of the
Jews so long as he holds of the Romans, not
of us, or of God.
As the eye judges, Herod is truly subject
to Rome, replied Onias. But there are
those who serve and yet govern. Is Tiberius,
or Sejanus truly Emperor? There are those
who appear indeed to be among the low and
humble, who yet, by reason of the soul that
reigns within, are higher than monarchs. Some
though there be a crown of universal dominion
on their heads, are yet as nothing  nay as
dirt  in comparison of him on whom the
glory of the Lord rests. Tiberius is to-day the
absolute lord of the universe, but another may
be more than that to-morrow, before whom
that great Emperor shall humble himself as
a slave. Hast thou faith, Julian, in the
prophets
?
I said that I had been duly instructed in
them by the piety of my mother, and that I
doubted not they were moved of God.
Of whose kingdom then speaks the prophet,
when he says that his kingdom shall be
everlasting
?
I suppose I should answer, of the Messiah;
but I pretend not to know with exactness the
sense of the prophets. I am but a learner as
yet in my own religion.
Nevertheless, said my uncle, thou hast
answered well. Doubtless it is said of the
Messiah. His kingdom shall be from sea to
sea. Now, even now, is the time it were
come. But if God's Kingdom come now and
be universal, that of Rome shall be
swallowed
up and lost as a drop of water in the
sea. May this thy kingdom speedily come,
O Lord, and thy servant behold its glory.
My uncle as he uttered this ejaculation fell
into his musing frame from which it was a long
time ere he showed any disposition to return
and resume his discourse with me, which
indeed
gives me not much light from his
refraining
,
as it were, to say all that is in his thought.
He does little more at any time than approach
the borders of somewhat that lies in his mind,
never fairly laying open the regions about
which he excites your curiosity. I presently,
however, asked him of Herod, of whom we
had just spoken and of whom I knew little,
and of a brother of his, who held some small
16 *
government under Rome in the Eastern part of
Judea.
Herod, he replied, about whom you
inquire
,
the oldest living son of the great Herod,
and often known under the name of Antipas,
is one well able to reign over a larger dominion
than that which he possesses, which is indeed
but a pitiful rood of earth, if one compares the
territory with Rome or with what he is fit to
govern. He is of all the sons of Herod the
Great of the nearest approach to his father, in
respect to the vigor of his mind, and all
qualities
that go to make a monarch worthy of his
name and empire. Especially does he possess
that far and deep seeing eye that penetrates the
purposes and minds of other men, and knows
how to lead them, and cause them to work his
will, whether or not they themselves would
choose to do so. He amazes by the sagacity
and subtlety of his devices. For while you
have deemed him to have been engaged in one
enterprise, or compassing one object, suddenly
it appears that he had a quite different end in
view, and those who look on can only admire
at a power which they cannot comprehend or
measure. A great destiny awaits him. The
central sun of Rome may yet grow dim before
what is now the feeble glimmering star of
Galilee.
More surely and sooner, continued Onias,
might we look for such issue, could he work
according to his will with his brother who
governs as tetrarch in Trachonitis  Philip.
But in him we find none of the signs of true
greatness. He is a Jew indeed; but a Jew
with none of the ambition of the Jew. It is
enough for him to govern his little kingdom in
peace, administering justice among his subjects,
enlarging the borders of their prosperity, and
paying duly and without any signs of
discontent
his subsidies to Rome  the proof and
the badge of slavery. Though mild and gentle
among his people, he is yet obstinate, and
intractable
to the will of his brother, who hath
hitherto failed, with all his skill, to pour into
him a portion of his own spirit, and wake to
life a soul dead to his own honor and the
greatness
of his country. Were another Antipas in
the seat of Philip, another day would soon arise
upon unhappy Israel. Yet though to the eye
of man mountains of obstruction intervene, all
is easy and the way smooth to the power of the
God of Abraham. A reed from the banks of
Jordan in his hand shall break in pieces the
earth. And by one, as well as by two or a
multitude, can he confound the counsels of
princes, and bring them and all their greatness
to nought. What was the rosy-cheeked David,
the little son of Jesse, with his sling and
stones, to the giant of the Philistines with his
sword like a weaver's beam? Truly in
himself
he was as a lamb before a lion lean with
hunger. But seeing Jehovah was in the arm
and sling of the boy, of what avail were the
sword and strong armor of Goliath? It matters
not neither how nor where Philip bestows
himself
,
nor whether he gives or withholds.
Himself
,
not Judea, will be the loser. So, too,
touching
him who dwells in Jerusalem, Herod-Philip,
the affairs of the world can proceed without
him, even though he should refuse to his
brother the little power, which, by reason of
his descent alone, he holds over the populace
of the capital. Nevertheless, what he may
refuse, might be won through another.
You mean, I said, his wife. For I had
heard of her through Philip and Anna in C
sarea
.
Yes, replied Onias. I speak of her, the
daughter of Aristobulus, in whom lives all the
greatness of the great Herod. Had the
providence
of God made her a son instead of a
daughter, the world had now been full of her
fame. Even as a woman much might be
achieved, but what can a lioness do yoked to a
mule? She must first break away from the
unequal bonds that yet hold her. Thou hast
not seen Herodias, Julian?
I have never been in Jerusalem, I replied.
But she is often in Csarea, said Onias,
and was there, as I have heard, at the games of
Herod; was it not so?
She was looked for, as was also her
daughter
,
with great expectation, I replied, but
they came not.
Doubtless, answered Onias, her husband
had intelligence of the expected tumult, and so
forbore to put himself where his presence might
have been taken amiss by Pilate. Yet I
marvel
why Herodias went not; since it is no
less than the very life of her life to oppose her
proud and lofty beauty to the milder charms
of Procla, and so divide, at least, if not bear
away with triumph, the praises of the theatre.
Mayhap, however, Antipas was in Jerusalem.
These things I set down, my mother, as
answering the questions you have asked
concerning
this family. As I learn more from
thy close and reluctant brother, more will I
deliver.
We were now far on our way to
Beth-Harem
,
and ere the sun should leave us, we
should easily reach it. I was truly desirous
to arrive, as with my common impatience I
had become weary of my long communion
with Onias, relieved only at times by a little
jesting with Ziba, and not less with the
sameness of verdant beauty, which
stretched
all along on either bank of the Jordan.
Yet was it, I believe, still more than these a
desire to behold the residence of Onias, and
the fair Judith, that occasioned my
dissatisfaction
and some complaints, I fear, of the slow
progress we made. Much had been told me of
the estates of Onias by Philip; but more by
Anna of Judith, his daughter, who, she
would say, is the bright star of Beth-Harem
and of all that region, and in her light you,
Julian, will forget this little dark shadow in
Csarea; but then, what is that to me? I am
content it should be so, while I can have the
love and friendship of Philip. Alas! my
mother, that a light like that of Anna should
have been so early quenched! To her, and
her brother, do my thoughts continually turn
back, whenever the novelty or beauty of some
present object does not take me away from
myself
.
If Philip was rash and over-confident, he
was, nevertheless, brave, and a willing sacrifice
for the freedom of his country. No thought of
his own glory, I believe, ever had a moment's
place in his mind; it was rage at the
oppression
of Judea, and a thirst of revenge that
drove him on, and swayed him so as to blind
him to the obstructions, which,
mountain-high
,
lay between him and the attainment
of his end, nor only that, but made his
ruin and death as certain as his attempt.
Though I could never approve as wise the
measures which he pursued, and think it was
only passion and the spirit of revenge that
could justify them,  which truly justified all
that he did, and would have justified all he
could have done, or devised,  yet do I abhor the
wanton tyranny, which drove him to his
rebellion
,
and wait with impatience for the day that
shall witness a just retaliation. And this the
more, as the form of Anna rises before me as at
the moment I last beheld her, transfixed by a
Roman javelin,  that child of truth and nature,
who loved her country and her faith as Roman
never did, but who loved her brother more, and
concealed it not, but would confess that though
her reason sometimes doubted him, or rebelled,
her heart was ever stronger than her reason, and
made her the very counterpart of himself.
Certain
I am, that no other will ever again so
possess
my soul as Anna; yet had she lived, who
could have shared any portion of that love,
which was no longer hers to give, but was all
her brother's? Anna dead is to me, perhaps,
as much as Anna living ever could have been.
As thoughts and remembrances like these
arose in my mind on the way, I hardly wished
to see Beth-Harem. I would rather dwell
among the dead than the living. I cared neither
for Onias, nor Judith. But they quickly gave
way again to others, and I was ready to press
my uncle to make more speed. At a moment,
when I was in this latter mood, thy brother
said; Behold, there are the walls of
Beth-Harem
!
We must now for a space part from
the river and turn our faces toward the hills.
The sun was not far from his setting, and
was pouring over the land a whole flood of
yellow light, as we thus left the river and moved
on among the more broken and uneven lands
which lay toward the East. When we had
continued not long in the midst of such scenes,
passing among the rich fields of the
husbandmen
with their simple dwellings half-hidden by
overhanging vines, or buried beneath fruit-trees,
we at length entered upon lands, which, by the
manner in which they were cultivated, and their
great extent, showed that we were approaching
the dwellings of some of the richer proprietors
of the soil. Soon, upon emerging from a grove,
through which our way had wound along, we
came upon open, level grounds, covered with
veneyards, olive-orchards, fields of grain, and
wide-spreading pastures, in the centre of which
upon a gentle elevation stood ranges of low but
extensive buildings, which I needed not my
uncle's exclamations to assure me were the
dwelling of Onias. A few lofty palms, and a
single terebinth of a great size were the only
trees immediately near it, as, except that for a
considerable space in every direction there
stretched out a smooth and verdant floor of turf,
the grounds on all sides were usefully devoted
to gardens and vineyards. Over and beyond the
fields and buildings of the prince of these
regions, were visible the walls and towers of
Beth-Harem, giving me to see that while it was
not a place of the largest size, neither was it
insignificant either for its extent, or the
structures
whose outlines could be distinctly
discerned
,
gilded as they now were with the last
warm rays of the declining sun. Quickening
our pace, we soon threaded the winding way
which led from the public road to the house.
As we rapidly approached, Judith, followed by
her maids, hastened to meet us. Onias,
springing
from his horse, tenderly embraced and
kissed her, asking a thousand questions of her
welfare, and of that of all the household.
Then, turning to me, he said, and here is thy
half-gentile cousin of Rome, with his gentile
name, Julian, the son of Naomi; he is now thy
charge. Let him have no reason to say, that
the barns and store-houses of Onias refused to
open for him their best treasures. For his
mother's sake, and his own, replied the
daughter
,
VOL. I. 17
he is welcome; his Roman name shall
not deprive him of Jewish hospitality. Onias
then leading the way, we entered the house.
The refreshment of the bath, in which, and
in other forms of washing, the Jews of
Palestine
indulge yet more than we of Rome, soon
restored me to myself after the heat and fatigue
of our long journey. The household of Onias
I found to be numerous; composed, however,
not of his own descendants,  as Judith is
his only child,  but of members of our
large family from every part of the world,
whom he gathers round him, even as a
patriarch
of old, exercising over them a sort of lower
providence. When we had eaten, we ascended
to the spacious roof, to pass the evening hours.
A broad tent was here spread to defend from
the dews which at this time of the year begin
to fall, and from the cool breezes which
sometimes
spring up in the night, even after the day
has been oppressive through its heat. Here we
either sat and conversed, or else walking about,
I learned from the mouth of Judith the names
and directions of the principal objects in the
scene, being lighted up by a brighter moon than
it is ever our fortune to behold in Rome.
Onias seemed little disposed to join our
discourse
;
yet, whatever was his preference for a
close communion with himself alone, he never
refused to lend his ear when Judith spoke.
We had been talking of Rome, Csarea, Philip
and Anna, of Pilate and Herod, to all which
Onias had given but little attention, when
Judith turned to him, and said;
I hope, father, that now these long
expeditions
will cease; or if they must still be
undertaken
,
that you will be persuaded to send our
new cousin in thy stead, who has not as yet
seen that region. But what of so great
moment
can a vine-dresser, here on the banks of
the Jordan, have to do with princes?
My daughter, replied Onias, seek not to
know what may not be revealed; at least, not
as yet, nor to woman's ears. Let this suffice
thee,  that the vine-dresser of Beth-Harem is
not leagued with princes for any end which his
daughter could not approve, or Jehovah smile
upon.
Judith, who had evidently spoken in a
sportful
manner, seemed grieved by the grave reply
of her father, and hastened to say, that she
doubted not her father; yet, could she not but
apprehend possible evil, when he was departing
so far from his wonted manner of life, and
binding himself to associates so different from
his former ones, as Herod of Galilee.
Onias rose and walked to and fro upon the
roof.
Presently he asked if any had been
impatient
to see him while absent. Judith replied,
none, save a messenger from Machrus. Had
he brought letters? asked Onias. No; his
communication must be with Onias himself.
He, then, kissing his daughter, and
commending
her to her bed, and me to early repose
after the toil of our journey, descended to his
apartment; we following him, and resorting
also to ours.
VII.
I awoke
, my mother, not in Rome, though
my dreams had carried me there, and placed
me at your side, vainly attempting to win away
your attention from the book of the prophets,
which according to your wont, in the morning's
prime, you were diligently pondering. It was
the rebuke of your sometimes severe
countenance
at an impertinent jest of mine, that broke
my slumbers. Slowly the mists of the night
drew away and left me in the full
consciousness
of my position. My eyes fell upon
unaccustomed
objects; the open casement held up
before me a distant prospect of stream and plain,
hill and tower, such as I never before had seen;
the song of birds, whose strains were new and
strange, voices of laborers or of the servants of
the household calling to each other in the Syriac
tongue,  not even yet an agreeable melody,
met my ear; these, and other sights and sounds
by degrees informed me that I had been sleeping
neither in Italy nor Rome, but was still a
sojourner
in the barbarous clime of the further
17 *
Palestine, even upon the outskirts of the Asiatic
deserts. In that sense of utter feebleness of
the will with which we first wake in the
morning
,
it seemed to me, that I would renounce all
knowledge of other places and people, for the
sake of being once more in Rome. I cared not
for Onias, Judith, Judea, nor the whole East,
in comparison with Rome and thee. But
action
,
and the bath, and the fresh air of the
housetop, soon scattered these worse than
dreams, and restored me to my manhood.
In a part of the dwelling not far from where
I had slept, I found Onias and Judith, with
others of their large household, awaiting me at
a table well covered with bread, fruits, wines,
and dainties unknown to the vocabulary of
Roman
art. Thy stern and contemplative brother
saluted me, methought, with no very
encouraging
fervor, but very much as if he were
addressing a new comer as little welcome as
expected. But this I regarded not, for I
knew, that so soon as his dreamy thoughts could
be gathered together, some from Jerusalem,
some from Galilee, and some from Rome, he
would comprehend who I was, and I should be
dealt with accordingly. From Judith my
greeting
was quite otherwise. She hastened to meet
me as I entered, and by the natural ardor of
her manner, and the glow of her most
expressive
countenance, made me feel that I was in
but another home. Indeed, my mother, thy
niece is very beautiful. Shall I speak of
Rebecca
,
or Ruth, or Rachel, or Judith of old?
Rebecca at the well, with our great father Isaac,
as tradition paints her, was not to be placed by
the side of Judith, the daughter of Onias, when
she rose from her embroidered couch and gave me
the salute of peace, and then proffered me the
refreshments of the loaded board. I believe I
only gazed at her in return, and gave as many
signs of distraction as Onias himself; for before
I had fully recovered myself, I heard from one
who was near, Can it be that Rome hath no
women? Those few words, not intended to
reach my ear, brought me to myself, and gave
a new direction to my eyes, and unloosed my
tongue. There was then no want either of
food for discourse, or of disposition to engage
in it, save on the part of thy brother, who
during
the whole repast spake never a word, unless
it were in reply to questions urgently pressed
upon him, and those relating to the matters
immediately
before us.
No sooner were our duties discharged towards
both ourselves and the substantial dishes that
had been set for our refreshment, than, Judith
leading the way, we turned from the apartment
where we had been sitting, and were conducted
by her to an extensive portico, stretching
along the side of the house that overlooks the
Jordan and the vineyards which lie along his
banks. The single terebinth of a giant
size, of which I have already made mention,
stood near this portico and spread its broad
arms so far, that some of them reached and
cast a grateful shade over the spot where
we sat, defending our eyes agreeably against
the rays of a bright summer sun. The
dwelling
of Onias, I could now observe to be
even more extensive than in the twilight of the
preceding evening I had supposed; and to be
composed of parts varying greatly in their
forms, giving signs of having been built at
periods remote from each other, and by those
who paid no regard to any other rule than to
indulge
each his own particular fancy in what
he added or altered. As I have said the building
is low and of but a single story; yet its
lowness
is in seeming only, owing to the large
space which it covers. The rooms within
are lofty, and the portico where we sat  of
Roman construction and order  is of a height
not less than that which adorns the house of
Drusus on the Palatine. I was not surprised
to find Roman architecture here beyond the
Jordan; for since the power of the Herods has
been felt in Judea, there is scarce a
considerable
town but it is adorned with Roman
structures
;
so that to behold their forms as I
travelled
through the country lifting themselves up
on every side, overtopping and outshining the
native buildings, it truly seemed to me that I
was in Italy rather than elsewhere. Sebaste,
Tiberias, Gamala, Csarea, and Herodium not
far from Machrus toward the Dead Sea, are
all Roman or Greek. The older portions of
the dwelling of thy brother are neither Greek nor
Roman, but in a much earlier manner. They
are built of huge stones rudely put together, but
in a manner to defy the power of time to disjoint
or cast them down; of the same manner and
form with those, which are found in all the
country stretching to the east of the Perea and
Trachonitis, but by whom and in what age
erected no history relates. They appear,
travellers
report, to be rather the work of Titans
than of men, and have served for the
dwellings
of successive generations.
Those parts of thy brother's house, which
are the work of more modern times, bear small
resemblance to each other or to the original and
older portions, but spread themselves out in every
various direction and form, agreeing only in the
same general elevation; to this, however, there
is the exception of a single broad tower rising to
such a height as to overlook the whole region
round about. Another Portico runs along a part of
the front which faces towards the south,
resembling
that in which we were now sitting,
but of less extent. A large space as an inner court
is enclosed by the sides of the building, where
a fountain plays, and over which is often drawn
during the hot days of summer an awning of
cloth upon a frame prepared for it, as a
protection
from the heat and as yielding an agreeable
shade. It is without difficulty partially broken
up, or removed, when either more of light, or
air, or warmth is desired, or when it becomes
needful either to raise objects from the court
below to the roof above, or to lower them down.
The proper ascent to the roof is by stairs from
within the dwelling; yet it can also be
ascended
from without.
You are pleased, as I judge by the direction
of your eye, said Judith when we were seated,
with these proofs of a Roman taste. They
cause you to feel as if you had wandered but a
little way from home, and were not quite
among either strangers or barbarians. Of your
family we have scarce heard anything more,
than that you have adopted the Roman religion
with Roman customs.
You have rightly judged, I answered,
that I am pleased with these signs of Roman
taste in this noble Portico, as well as in many
other things. The useful and ornamental arts I
would have common to all, and by no means
confined
to one people or one faith. It is no good
reason because Judea holds one form of religion,
in which she excels other nations, that she
should reject forms of art in which others excel
her. Do you not think so?
I do indeed, Judith replied. Nations are
more likely to live in harmony the more they
can innocently adopt of each other's customs,
as well as the more they can see of each other.
And so thought our ancestor, Alexander, to
whom we owe most of these modern additions,
but so thinks not Onias, the son of Alexander.
In saying which Judith raised her eyes from the
embroidery on which she was employed and
turned them on her father.
Verily I do not; rejoined Onias. This
worship of everything Roman is the new
idolatry
,
which not less than that of old, into which
our rebellious forefathers were ever falling,
shows us false to our true descent, unworthy of
our name and faith, rebels against God, and if
we repent not, destined quickly to perish. We
are one half of us pagans, heathen, Romans,
Greeks, everything, in Jews' clothing. The
last offence is, to be ashamed of what God hath
made us, and that the Jew is. Surely God's
judgments will overtake and overwhelm us.
My father,  may he rest in Abraham's bosom,
was a good man, yet nevertheless a
worshipper
of idols not less than Ephraim. In this, at
least, may I be permitted to boast, that my
hatred burns toward all but Judea. Julian, I
rejoice to tell thee, my daughter, is better than
by your first words you have taken him for; he
has in part at least renounced the false faith in
which he was nurtured, and returned to that of
his Fathers. Born a Jew, but living thereafter
and believing as a gentile, he has now, since
his foot has touched the soil of Judea, and
his eye seen her dishonor and her wrongs,
turned back to what he was when his only
learning was such as fell upon his ear, as he
sat an infant upon the knees of Naomi. If my
ear deceived me not, thy cousin last evening
gave thee in part a history of his life.
He spoke, said Judith, of Csarea, of
Anna and Philip, and of his adventures in their
behalf; but of his faith I could gather but little.
It is in truth a greater joy than I looked for to
greet him not only as one of the household of
Alexander, but also of that of Abraham and
Moses.
I then for the satisfaction of the fair Judith
imparted to her much of what I had already,
on our journey thither, related to thy brother,
concerning the earlier part of my life and the
causes that had led on to changes so
considerable
.
She heard with deep attention, her hands
often ceasing from their employment and her
countenance turned towards me, showing her
too much engaged in what was said to bethink
herself, whether she were listening to any other
than a familiar and long accustomed voice. I
wished my story longer for the sake of such a
hearer. In the manner in which she yields to
nature in the ardent expression of her
countenance
,
being governed by no other power
than her own feelings, Judith reminds me of
Anna; but while Anna was too much swayed
by others, Judith is mistress of herself, and with
all her passion shows a firmness which could
not be turned from any path she deemed right.
So at least I judge now after so brief an
acquaintance
.
When I had ended, Judith said, I praise
God, Julian, that he has brought you back
safe amongst your own people, and to his own
service. But then, I at least will tell you,
what from your narrative you seem not to have
learned at Csarea, that though Judea is
trodden
upon and oppressed, as you yourself have
witnessed, it is not in her innocence that this
has happened. She is not guiltless before God.
Think not that she suffers but for her iniquities.
It is these that have brought her so low, blotted
VOL. I. 18
out her name even from among the nations, and
caused that for these many centuries no prophet
of God hath come as of old to instruct and hear
us. Wickedness is in the land. They who sit
in Moses' seat are usurpers. The law is
honored
by the lips but broken in the life.
Cunning
men have put their own conceits in the
place of the word of God, and pass them off
upon the people for his own truth. Through
the multitude of such interpretations and the
impudence of the priests the law is set aside
and of no effect. It is not, Julian, deliverance
from Rome alone that can heal our diseases. An
Egyptian bondage (and ours is lighter) were
not to be deplored like this great corruption of
the heart. We need a physician of the soul
who shall thoroughly purge it, and make it a
dwelling cleansed of every foul thing, a
habitation
meet for the spirit of God. Freedom
from Roman Power could not do this. Alas!
I fear it would but swell our pride the more,
and remove farther off than ever the day when
God shall visit his people. Till he shall see
signs of repentance he will never come, never.
Jordan would sooner flow back to his springs.
As Judith said these things tears stood in her
eyes, which were lifted from her work, and
fixed upon the flowing river as it wound along
gleaming in the sunshine.
Onias, who had been pacing to and fro along
the portico, now paused before his daughter and
said;
Judith, Judith, thou art ever too exacting
toward our unhappy land. Thou judgest her
hardly. Her sins are manifold in truth, but
still are we not of the seed of Abraham? and
who then is like unto us? who shall ever rise
into our seat? whom doth Jehovah honor but
us, and for whom as for us are the ages waiting
to bring forth their treasures? shall not the
promises of God be made good? Moreover,
what causeth the sin that is and for which the
land mourneth, but this thrice cursed power of
the gentile over us? While the idolater is in
the land and its ruler, will not the people as of
old bow down and worship the images that be
everywhere set up? First, my daughter, first of
all must the oppressor be smitten, and the
oppressed
made free; then shall the seed have been
destroyed that brings forth this harvest of
iniquity
.
Then shall righteousness find space
and soil to grow, and the gentile shall not be
here to cause blasting and mildew .
A maid servant here quickly entered and said
that a messenger from Machrus was just
arrived in haste inquiring for Onias. Thy
brother at this started, and with precipitation
passed into the house following the servant.
When he was gone I still sat conversing with
Judith; but perceiving that her mind was now
frequently withdrawn as if possessed by other
thoughts, I too departed and bent my way
toward
the deep shades, which not far before us I
beheld covering a slight elevation on the hither
bank of the river. Beneath those shades, said
Judith as I went, you will find a calm and cool
retreat, where, when as now the sun blazes with
unusual heat, we sometimes pass the noonday
hours. A simple structure stands beneath those
trees, hidden now from our sight which overlooks
the river and the vineyards. I commend you to its
pleasant seats. Saying these things she passed
into the house, while I pursued my way to the
vineyards on the banks, and the retreat to which
Judith had commended me.
Passing in my way through gardens, olive
grounds, and vineyards, I came at length to the
spot at which I aimed, distant at least half a
Roman mile from the house. The building,
hardly to be seen till approached very near, I
found to be of a circular form overrun with
vines, which climbing up the columns to the
roof then hung down in a confusion of polished
leaves, bright berries, flowers, and fruit. A few
gray rocks here and there breaking through the
ground rendered the ascent on the side toward
the river difficult, the more as among them
grew wild plants, shrubs, and flowers, according
to their will, untouched by the hand of art.
From the entrance, open toward the south, the
eye fell first upon the slope of meadow and
vineyard along the nearer bank; then upon the
sacred stream as it wound slowly away and was
hidden at length by overhanging foliage, and
last upon a remote prospect of hill and wood,
mountain and desert, even as far as the
borders
of the Dead Sea, till the warm haze of
those regions shut in the scene and mingled the
heavens and the earth together. I was not
unwilling
to enter where there was held out so
rich a promise of rest and seclusion. Couches of
many inviting forms standing around tempted
to repose, of which, to say the truth,
notwithstanding
the sleep of a long night, I still had
need. Here then I passed the morning and
midday hours, now gazing forth upon the new
scenes before me, and wondering what my
course should be, and now watching the labors of
the distant husbandman as he gathered in the
last returns of the harvest; sometimes buried in
musings which, beginning in somewhat bright as
morning, ended as is their wont in sleep;
sometimes
satisfying at once both hunger and thirst
with the grapes which ministering hands had
heaped upon the table; and sometimes in
writing to thee, my mother, to thee whose image
18 *
waking or asleep is ever before me, outshining
all else above or below, real or unreal. No step
intruded on my privacy, no sound disturbed my
slumbers or my musings, save that of the bee
as he flew from flower to fruit, or from fruit to
flower, or of insects and birds, as half asleep
they sent forth now and then a drowsy note,
showing that they as well as I were tasting
the joys of a perfect repose. Thus I either sat
or lay, until the sun sinking behind the hills,
and the growing coolness of the air, warned me
of the hour of the evening repast; for here as
with us the principal meal is at the close of day,
when the heat hath subsided and its labor is
done.
Many days like this, only varied with such
changes as you, my mother, will readily
imagine
,
now passed away. Instructed by Judith,
I made myself familiar with Beth-Harem and the
surrounding regions, visiting with her, or alone,
all such objects and places as were worthy to
be seen, either for their present interest and
beauty
,
or for their connexion with the early history
of our people. In these brief journeyings I
saw and discoursed with many of the
inhabitants
of these parts of Judea, in every condition
of life. Among all I discovered a temper of
dissatisfaction, and undefined desires and
expectations
of somewhat soon to be unfolded of
advantage
and glory to the land. Some great one
is to arise, they are sure, who shall fulfil in his
person and his deeds, and the power of his
dominion
,
all that seems to them foretold by their
prophets. They have been much stirred by
the sudden appearance of this John of Hebron
on the banks and in the wildernesses of Jordan;
but they do not see in him the signs of that
power whose approach they are expecting,
though they hold him to be one sent of God.
We all desire to hear and know more of him.
But, as we learn, he is now in upper Galilee.
Onias has been absent many days, insomuch
that Judith wonders greatly thereat.
No more, my mother, at present. Name me
with affection to our neighbors and friends, and
especially to Hirpinus and Lucretius, who are
returned, as I have heard, suddenly to Rome.
Thou shalt soon hear again. Farewell.
VIII.
I keep
my promise, my mother, and again
present myself with wishes of health and peace.
Now when Onias had been absent, as I have
said, many days, to the great concern of Judith,
which in these times is not strange, for so
much does wickedness abound in all parts of the
land, that it is not without danger that any
one trusts himself in remote or unfrequented
places,  he at length returned in safety indeed,
but as it seemed also, in no small perturbation
of mind. His manner was more close and dark
than even that which is usual with him, and it
was a long time before, by our approaches,
whether more or less direct, we could arrive at
the causes of his discomposure. Judith, by her
playfulness at some seasons, and her deep
earnestness
at others, seldom fails to reach her father's
inward ear; and though he at times turns away
even from her, yet is it done never with
severity
,
or as if it were possible for any word from
her to offend him. Although her questions now
seemed to grate with harshness on his spirit,
yet he refused not to answer them. We have
missed you greatly, father, these many days.
But since you have been in kings' palaces we
look to you to make amends for your long
absence
,
by the agreeable things you have to tell
us. Saw you the fair daughter of Arabia?
They say she is unhappy.
Who say so? asked Onias.
Surely, said Judith, you have heard it
many times. I speak but the common rumor.
I know not how it is, replied Onias. It
is a pity if it be so. The great should never
marry,  or not till their greatness is reached,
and they can take their equal.
Because one is great then, exclaimed
Judith
,
he must no longer be a man! Truly I
think as to the women of Judea, they would
rather marry a man for the reason that he hath
the affections of a man, than because he has the
greatness of a king or hero.
Yet, answered Onias, a man may find
all in one, which Herod hath not. The
daughter
of Aretas hath a seemly beauty enough, if
one, great like Herod, should have regard to the
poor varnish, easily spoiled, of a fair skin
beauty more than enough to satisfy him,  but
the wife of Antipas should show other and
greater qualities.
Surely she hath goodness, said Judith, so
the world reports of her. And is that not
much?
But, said Onias with force, she hath not
greatness. She is no meet companion of a
king.
Alas for us, rejoined Judith. Let me
die a maid. As I have ever judged no
greatness
is greater than a true love. But this I see
is woman's folly.  The poor lady must be
unhappy
I think; and all we have heard of
Herodias
is now, I doubt not, true. Herod's
journeys
to Jerusalem are in search of greatness.
I marvel how the Arabian king will take these
rumors. Methinks, if he be as fathers should
be, Herod will have his hands more than full.
Seeing Onias to be disturbed, I asked, to
divert
the conversation to another subject, if at
Machrus, he had learned anything concerning
the affairs of Csarea. This gave a new turn
to his thoughts, but at first, I feared, hardly a
more grateful one, for he was manifestly
troubled
.
But he spake with freedom.
Csarea, he replied, is, as I learn, still at
peace. But between Pilate and Herod there is
growing up discord, springing from that affair.
Angry letters have passed between them.
Pilate
hath even thrown upon Herod the blame of
my presence and taking part in the fight; and
though he hath not continued to require my
being delivered into his hands, as at first he
did, he doth demand that the citadel of
Beth-Harem
be surrendered to the Roman forces to
be occupied by them. To this Herod must
yield,  he can do no otherwise,  so that in
not many days troops from Csarea will cross
the Jordan on this errand.
It appears to me, I replied, an
unreasonable
measure of precaution much beyond any
possible danger to Rome, to set a garrison to
watch an individual  a vine-dresser here on
the banks of the Jordan. Pilate's vigilance in
Csarea was by no means in proportion to
this.
Doubtless, Julian, it is so. That is very
true. It seems so, indeed. What then is true,
but that Pilate sees deeper than does the
common
eye, and discerns dangers brewing of which
others are not aware.
But what other dangers are there, that Rome
should stand in fear of? I asked. I can see
none. The people of these regions seem quiet
and at peace.
So they appear, replied Onias. Surely
there is nothing that shows otherwise. The
Jew is all too well disposed to peace. In that
rogue Jael, who keeps the inn at Thebez, you
may behold one whom half the Jews of the
land are not ashamed to resemble.
Nevertheless
there are others, if in the comparison few,
who are of another mind. There may be
danger
from these. The cold rocky ground often
covers over hidden and fatal fires.
You utter yourself darkly, father, said
Judith; your words hint at more than they
speak.
Be content, my daughter, with so much;
neither look farther nor deeper than the words
themselves which I have spoken. But whether
there be danger, or not, I cannot like to see
Romans
in the citadel of Beth-Harem.
In this manner did Onias communicate with
us on his return from the fortress of Machrus.
What his apprehensions really are I cannot tell,
for he plainly is not disposed at present to make
even Judith a partner of his thoughts. It seems
not to be believed that Pilate should have any
such fears of Onias or myself, as to render so
strong a measure necessary as that which he is
about to take; and in my judgment he hath
seized upon the affair at Csarea merely as a
pretext, which with the people will possess
some show of reason and be abundantly
justified
at Rome, for taking possession of a strong
hold, which in the occurrence of hostilities
would be of so great advantage to the stronger
party. Herod, is greatly and justly incensed at
so high an act of usurpation on the part of
Pilate
,
for Beth-Harem lies within the boundaries
of his tetrarchy, and is secured to him by the
same acts of the senate which have given him
his dominion. But what people are secure
against the aggressions of Rome or her
governors
,
when it suits their purposes to encroach upon
them? The possessions of any King tributary
to her stand but in a breath. A word spoken
beyond the seas in the heart of Italy, and
thereupon
distant empires are dismembered, kings
and princes dethroned, treaties violated,
territories
alienated, honor, justice, and mercy
trampled
under foot. Herod has no power to
contend
with Rome. He can but remonstrate
and submit. But the friendship, which hath
heretofore subsisted between the Roman
Governor
and the Jewish Prince is from this
moment
at an end; and the mutual offences, which
will now be given and taken on the one side
and the other, it is not difficult to foresee will
ere long lead to serious misunderstandings or
open feud.
A few days have passed away, and what Onias
feared and foretold has come to pass; the
Roman
power has made a secure conquest in
Beth-Harem. We have witnessed the arrival of
the Roman troops, and the departure of those of
Herod. The populace of Beth-Harem were
VOL. I. 19
much stirred, when they beheld the soldiers of
their own prince giving way before the arrival
of those of their oppressors. As it was known
both by couriers, who had gone before, and by
the distant clouds of dust and sounds of
martial
music, that the Romans were actually
approaching
,
the inhabitants of the town poured
forth, both for the purpose of beholding the
scene and of giving vent to their displeasure in
insults and reproaches. We also repaired to the
plains, just without the walls, and standing
beneath
the shade of the groves, which on this
side the town everywhere encompass it, to
which the inhabitants constantly resort for their
recreations during the warmer days of summer,
we awaited the approach of the soldiers.
While here we perceived, that the people were
well disposed to stir up strife whenever the
soldiers should appear, to which they were
diligently encouraged by many of the chief
citizens, who, not less than the rabble of this
strange people, seem ever ready for tumult,
though nothing be to be gained thereby. They
seem to have no control over their passions or
of their expression, but utter freely whatever
they conceive in their minds, regardless of the
possible or probable consequences, which such
rashness may draw after it. As we stood
conversing
we observed a large multitude posting
themselves before the gates of the town, as if
by merely placing themselves there, they could
obstruct the entrance of an armed force, while
the most that could happen would be
throwing
an obstacle in their way for a few moments,
in doing which many might in the confusion
be trampled to death, while no possible benefit
could accrue. Nor were the Priests and Rulers of
the Synagogue, Shammai and Zadok, ashamed to
be among them, giving edge to their passions
by their gestures and language. Zadok  the
more zealous of the two, whom I had before
seen in Beth-Harem on the Sabbath  when he
had sufficiently bestowed his counsel on the
rabble, came toward us, just then when by the
braying of instruments and the neighing of
horses we knew that the Romans were at
hand.
Well met, Onias, he cried, as he joined us
hot with his exertions, and covered with dust,
and you too, Sir Roman  and  laying his
hand on his breast, or rather on his beard,
which swept over it, and bending his head
toward Judith  thou also, fair Rose of Sharon;
but, daughter, there will be dust on thy leaves
if thou standest here, and that too from filthy
Roman feet. Get thee farther back, child.
Look to this flower, Onias, let it not be soiled.
Mind not me, said Judith; it is not dust
from without that is to be feared, even though
it be from Roman feet. A breath blows it off
again.
The priest cast a quick glance at the girl, as
if suspecting a hidden meaning in her words.
Judith immediately added, as if she had said
nothing that had deserved attention, Why,
Zadok, dost thou set thyself to inflame the
people more than is their nature? Their hearts
are already bitter enough, methinks.
An eye for an eye, young woman, he
answered
,
as thy princely father would say also,
and this young cousin of thine too if his face
is to be read aright. An eye for an eye!
Would it could be an eye for an eye. But it
will be a long day before the Jew can do upon
the gentile what he hath done upon the Jew.
But a long day will have its end, and, may I
be one to see it. There come the idolaters!
See their pride in scarlet and horses, in armor
and in music! Ah, if the sight of a mole is
given me, their bones shall never rest in the
sepulchres of their Fathers. Who is he at their
head, sitting forsooth as if he were Csar
himself?
One who stood by cried out, That is
Saturninus
the Centurion.
While he spoke, various outcries arose from
the people, while some brandished their arms
in a threatening manner, or else sticks and
branches broken from the trees, and others
scraping up the dust in their hands threw it into
the air, or hurled it against the soldiers. Just
as the Centurion was passing where we stood, he
could clearly perceive, that the entrance to the
city was wholly obstructed by a crowd of not
men only but women and children also, who
thronged the way. Although from the insults
heaped upon him on every side he could not
but learn what was the temper of the people, yet
he evidently did not suppose, that the dense body
of people before him was gathered there for any
other purpose than to witness his entrance, for
waving his sword, while he put no check on
the pace of his horse, he made a signal as if
the way should be cleared, and as if expecting
it would instantly be obeyed. But no
movement
followed. On the contrary the people
pressed more closely together and increased their
cries of rage. Whereupon the troops were
ordered
to stand still, who, though they were set
upon in a thousand ways of ignominious
assault
,
yet took no note of it save to utter in
under tones fierce and bitter curses. The
Centurion
now advanced alone toward the crowd,
and speaking to them in calm and manly tones
begged them not to hinder him in his entrance
into the city; he did not come to do them any
19 *
injury, but on the contrary, while he should
remain among them, hoped to be a friend to them,
and protect them against any evil that might
threaten; perhaps he should remain but for a
brief space, when the troops of Herod would be
restored; if they would retire and allow him a
free and easy passage, and if those who had
command among them would persuade the
youths and others to intermit their violence, he
would promise to do them no harm nor suffer
any of his soldiers to take any revenge for
injuries
already committed; but otherwise he
might not be able to restrain their fury.
To this speech they answered only by fresh
outcries and filling the air with dust.
Perceiving
then that the obstinacy of the people
was not to be overcome, Saturninus returned to
where we were standing, together with many
others of the principal citizens. Singling out
Onias without difficulty as chief of them all, he
besought him to aid him in his peaceful
endeavors
,
that he might not be compelled to
betake
himself to measures of force, which he
should be sorry to resort to, not less than
others would be to witness or suffer them. It
must be easily in the power of such as you
seem to be, he said, to divert from their
purpose
a multitude of obstinate persons, who can
certainly have no expectation of either fighting
or overcoming, and are only indulging their
passions to our great vexation and shame.
Before Onias could utter a word in reply,
Zadok shouted forth, Oh! press on noble
Roman! There is a manly victory before thee.
There stand the women and little children of
our city. Ride over them with thy steel-hoofed
horses, and historians shall chronicle thy deeds.
As thou didst in Csarca, do here  ride
swiftly
,
kill and slay.
Thou misjudgest Romans, replied
Saturninus
with mildness, if thou thinkest we
would hurt the unarmed and helpless. But
surely it is more than foolish to encourage the
people in these mad insults, which can at best
have no other end than to convert into enemies
those who now are friends and well disposed to
remain so; but what thou wilt not do another
will, and the gods be thanked.
These last words he said as he beheld Onias
hasten towards the gate, accompanied by
others
,
and make signs for the people to disperse.
As the Centurion saw there was a hesitation
among the crowd, some being disposed to yield
and end their idle display of rage, he gave the
order to his troop to advance at a good pace.
Whereupon the whole body, nothing loth, set
forward
to the sound of their trumpets, and at a
quicker pace too than they knew was intended,
which had the desired effect; for no sooner had
they approached in this manner near the crowd,
quickening their motion more and more, than
the terror of the sight, and the fear of being
trampled to death by those whom they knew
they had filled with anger, caused them to
scatter in great confusion on either side of the
highway, many falling and rolling over each
other, to the great entertainment both of the
Romans and of all who beheld it; not a few
hardly escaping from under the feet of the
horse; nor would have done so but for the
forbearance
of the riders. Without further
hindrance
,
then, they rode on to their quarters in
the midst of the city.
As the last of them passed within the gates,
we turned away towards thy brother's,
Shammai
and Zadok accompanying us.
Ah, said Zadok, as we walked along,
doth it not grieve the heart of a son of the
freeman Abraham, who wandered to and fro
from Dan to Beersheba without let or hindrance
whithersoever he would, and when it pleased
him went even unto Egypt, his wife Sarah with
him, and when it pleased him came back again,
calling no man master, being a slave to no one,
doth it not, I say, grieve the heart of one of
this generation, to behold how we are fallen
into this accursed slavery to the gentile  our
towns held by his soldiers, our steps dogged by
his taxgatherers?
Yet, said Judith, is it better to wait the
Lord's time for our deliverance than seek it by
our wisdom and strength. He hath promised,
and the promise will be kept.
Yea, young maiden, as in the synagogue
I have oft affirmed  to which thine ears I joy
to perceive have not been closed. He hath
promised indeed, and even in our day do we
look for the fulfilment. Moses hath spoken of
the salvation, and all the prophets. But holy
Daniel  hath he not in words not to be
doubted
or gainsaid, as I will show thee
Therefore, Rabbi, what I would say,
gently interposed Judith,  willing to avert
the threatened rehearsal, is, that seeing the
promises have been given, which because given
of Jehovah will be kept, ought we not to wait
rather in patience times which he hath
appointed
for our redemption, than strive to hasten
them by acts of our own. We are as the blind
when we aim to look into the designs of infinite
intelligence; and as children who should think
to move Mount Hermon, when we do aught in
the hope to hinder or hasten them.
Zadok scowled at these words of Judith, but
added, What the Lord hath done in the days
past of our history to the gentile, and the
worshippers
of idols, to such as gave themselves to
the worship of Baal and Moloch, and even to
their priests, killing and slaying, he hath taught
his people to do. How oft by his prophets of
old did he send them forth to destroy his
despisers
from off the face of the Earth.
Doubtless, replied Judith, it is that for
which I would have our people now wait. Let
the Prophet who is to come, and for whom
we now wait, appear, and whither he shall lead
let us follow, and what he shall command, let
us do. But while he comes not, let us withhold
our hand. It is his bidding that shall make
deeds innocent, which without shall be black
with guilt.
Thy words, here interposed Shammai,
are as those of the wise king of Israel  they
are as apples of gold in pictures of silver.
Judith perceived as she thought a hidden
reproach
in the words of the Rabbi, and
feeling
as if in her earnestness she had offended
against what was due to her elder, her face was
covered with blushes and fell upon her breast
as she said; nay, Rabbi, I meant not to teach,
but only to speak for the cause of present peace.
Surely it can be of no avail that the scenes of
Csarea should be repeated in Beth-Harem.
We there lost those whom we greatly loved,
yet hath their loss brought no profit to our
nation
.
The power against which we would
contend is too mighty to resist, if God be not on
our side. Alas! Father, forgive me; I fear I
teach again  and the fair girl covered her
face with her hands.
We need, said Shammai in gentler tones,
to be rather forgiven of thee. They who
hold of Judas are apt to be of a harsh and hasty
speech, which must make our peace with thee,
my daughter. We are a fierce and contentious
race.
We had now reached the dwelling of Onias.
When we had entered, Judith hastened to offer
for our refreshment delicious grapes with pitchers
of wine just from the presses and water cooled
with the snows of Lebanon. To the Rulers she
presented with her own hands the bunches that
were ripest, and fairest, and poured out for them
the new wine, mingling with it both snow and
water. Their spirit was greatly softened by the
services of Judith, and by the cooling effects of
the fruit and wine, and Shammai holding up
the cup from which he had drank, and looking
intently at its proportions said;
Verily, Onias, the cunning of man is like
the cunning of Him who made him. How
many are his devices for our comfort and
adornment
.
Here is this cup of silver curiously
wrought, from Rome I doubt not; these carpets
from Persia; these rich hangings from
Damascus
;
these couches of silk from the farther India.
Wisdom, saith Solomon, is better than silver, or
gold, or rubies. Yea, O wise man, so it is.
Yet these are good nevertheless, and thou wast
too wise to give them bad names. So again he
saith, there is nothing better for a man in this
life, than that he should eat and drink, which
is also a wise saying. We may well call
that wise which simply describeth a natural
thing. It needed not he should have eaten
so good grapes or drunk so good wine as
these to have taught him that. Every man
will say it, who in the morning riseth and
findeth
nothing better than a cake baked on the
coals, with a piece of honey. As I think, it is
only when a man eats or drinks that he can say
his soul is without trouble. Verily he is
righteous
overmuch, as the great king saith, and one
greatly impertinent moreover, who, like the
foolish Essenes, seeketh to please God by
refusing
with contempt the good things he hath
taken the pains to create, and cause the earth to
bring forth for his entertainment. It would be
right, that such an one in the resurrection
should be defrauded of his expectations. He,
that despiseth what the Lord hath made and
pronounced good, should himself be despised
and his portion taken from him. Daughter,
this wine is good. Yes  that is what I would
have  let it be filled once more. Onias, who
is this Saturninus, as some one called him, whom
we are to have to rule over us?
Onias replied, that he knew not.
Perhaps then, continued the ruler, our
young Roman knoweth him. To this I
answered
,
that I knew only his name, that he was
of a good family (the family, my mother, of
M. Scvola Saturninus) and had served with
credit in the army.
May he and his army perish, cried Zadok,
ere they leave the walls of Beth-Harem.
In the mean while, said Onias, it were
better that the people trouble him not. What
is done, let it be done, not as to-day.
Ah, Onias, I see thee. Thou wouldst take
them by craft, thou wouldst catch them by
subtlety
.
I would not catch them at all, Onias
replied
;
but let them dwell among us in peace.
When the time cometh it will be seen that it is
come. I shall trust to see this same Saturninus
and know him.
So we conversed of many things, till
Shammai
,
bethinking himself of affairs that required
his presence, took his departure, Zadok
accompanying
him. The elder of the two rulers
VOL. I. 20
Shammai  is one whom for many things both
Judith and Onias esteem; while for other
reasons
they think but lightly of him. He is, if
one may say so, a sort of Epicurean in a Jew's
dress  and among what nation, tribe, or religion
is not the Epicurean to be found? The
dispositions
which nature hath given him are such as
inspire affection; but the boldness with which
he administers the office of ruler of the
synagogue
,
while in his heart he doubts or
disbelieves
the faith of which he makes so open a
profession, causeth him to be treated not so much
as a friend whom they can admit to their entire
confidence and love, as one whose cheerful
presence
and discourse add greatly to the pleasures of
any society of which he makes a part. His
years ensure him reverence. Judith, indeed,
having known him from a child, doth more than
reverence him. Of Zadok thou shalt hear
another time.
IX.
The
longer I remain among this people, my
mother, the more strange do they seem; but the
more too do I become bound to them, and
especially
to the members of this household.
They are a people beyond any other religious,
and yet, as I suppose, beyond any other
superstitious
and wicked; which seems to proceed
from this, that they make distinctions between
the worship of God, and virtue; and consider
these two things as not necessarily joined
together
.
Not but what the same error is to be
observed elsewhere, but that here it appears to
be more universal. Prayers are made upon all
occasions, and in all places, but they are a
ceremony
by themselves; and being once said, the
matter is over; so much was due to God by
command, agreement, or custom, or tradition,
and the debt has been paid. Then how their
life shall be ordered is another affair, and
governed
by interests, rules, and motives which
belong to itself. Some who are esteemed to
stand at the head of the religion, and who
generally are of the Pharisees, are as
remarkable
for their want of goodness, or rather as
notorious for their vices, as for their piety
toward
God shown in a strict observance of the
Sabbath and the least points of the Law. So
long as religion shall be held as somewhat
distinct from virtue must it continue to be so;
and so long will the faith in one God, in which
we may justly boast over all other nations, be
little better for the interests of goodness than
the Roman's faith in many.
But at the same time is it true, that some
have been instructed even as it was my
fortune to be by thee. Their religion hath been
connected with their life; their many prayers
and fastings, their sacrifices and offerings, their
goings up to the feasts, their observance of the
law to its smallest requirement in every outward
rite and act, has all been done not in the place of
virtue, but in addition and as incentives to it.
Of this sort I need hardly say to thee are Onias
and Judith. They are careful observers of the
law; but while exact in the mere ceremonial
part, they are even more exact in what pertains
to righteousness. Nay, they would by many
be thought to neglect observances on which
others greatly pride themselves, though none
can be found to charge them with any
infringement
of the greater matters of the law. The
hypocrisies and over-righteousness of the
Pharisees
are not theirs, nor the indifference of
the Sadducees. They believe in Moses and
the Prophets  in the law that guides them
in this life, and in the resurrection at the
last day, for which the law fits them by
its commands. But they pretend not to
more than they have. They are content to
do what to them seems necessary, without
seeking
to gain the admiration of others by
extraordinary
acts of piety and the observance of all
the lesser points of the law. Truly, their lives
are beautiful. Onias indeed oftentimes seems
severe and harsh; but he is a just man and
fears God, and serves him in that very way
which to him seems right. The law withlb>
the traditions, which are its interpretation,
are to him the lights  the greater and the
lesser, by which he draws every breath and
shapes every step in life. He asks for no
more or better. He sees no defect, there is
nothing incomplete to be supplied. If the law
were truly kept, Israel, he says, would rise to
her proper glory, and would overshadow the
whole earth,  prosperity and riches and love
and glory would make the land of Judea the
wonder of the earth, and the seat of an
everlasting
kingdom, for its felicity, like the paradise
of the first pair.
20*
Judith, though her reverence for the law is
great, and though she reads diligently the
prophets, and observes their precepts, and
performs
the required rights, is yet secretly sad and
unsatisfied. So much have I gathered, not
from any set disclosure she hath made of her
thoughts, but rather from the language of her
countenance, from words that have dropped
from her, and yet more from what she hath not
said when certain subjects have formed the
matter of discourse. With the rest of the
people
she is anxiously dwelling on what the
future
shall reveal, but differing from them, her
hopes are of some one, who shall prove himself
to be a reformer of the manners of her nation,
as much and as well as the subduer of her
enemies
.
She thinks that the medicine needed is
partly that which shall purge the heart. So
that when she speaks of the Messiah, it is as a
prophet and a priest that she delights chiefly to
regard him. She asks for a teacher and a guide,
who shall lead her farther into a knowledge of
God and of things invisible, than she can now
penetrate. The priests of the law do not give
her what she asks  the law itself is dark and
refuses to speak of the things of which she
desires most to learn. The harp of David,
though the music is sweet, and all the tones it
speaks find an accordant response in her soul,
yet are not its notes enough to answer one by
one to the wants she feels. The harmony is
not complete.
For myself, my mother, I judge that this
people want liberty first  truth afterwards.
The truths for which a soul like Judith's
sighs would fall on stony ground falling
upon the hearts of slaves. In the slave the
thoughts are bound as well as the limbs. They
cannot think or feel as men, who cannot move
and act as men. The outward bondage
becomes
necessarily one that is inward also, seeing
the body and the mind are one. Is it not in
vain therefore to look for any great advantages
to come from a prophet, who shall not first
appear
and act in the character of a deliverer and
conqueror? So thinks Onias, and so thinks the
nation. When the looked-for Messiah shall
appear, it is certain, so judges the whole people,
that he will appear as one who shall first of all
bring deliverance to the captive, and a ransom
for such as are under bonds; nor can any signs
in heaven or on earth show the approach of the
true Shiloh, but such as proclaim him prince
and conqueror.
How astonishing the news I hear through
thy letters and the common channels of the
present ascendency and power of Sejanus!
With any due proportion of humanity and
modesty
it is not to be doubted, that he might have
founded a name and authority that might have
overshadowed Tiberius. But, surely, the gods
having now decreed his destruction have made
him mad. Is it possible Romans should endure
such remorseless cruelties? What a fate is this
of a city and empire like Rome,  with an
emperor
buried in a desert island, old in years and
older in crime, feebler through lust and
intemperance
than through age, the object of
universal
detestation, yet ruling these many millions
with the mere breath of his mouth, and besides
him, this second self in Rome, carrying on his
own schemes of cruelty and ambition, pleasing
his great master in proportion to his excesses,
since the iniquity of the satellite serves as a
shield for that of the principal. When will the
justice of God overtake such wickedness? You
are alarmed, my mother, at such language, lest
spies and informers should bear it to the secret
tribunals of power. Be not afraid. My letters
are entrusted to none but known and faithful
hands. Besides we are not of the noble
Roman
families. We are not a mark high enough
for the emperor or his tool. Nevertheless read
them in secrecy, with doors and windows closed;
and then carefully conceal or destroy them.
The coming to Beth-Harem of C. Sentius
Saturninus, my mother, has, both to the
inhabitants
of the city and to us of the household of
Onias, proved anything rather than an evil.
His presence, together with his soldiers, has
acted as a wholesome restraint on the licentious
rabble, and the quarrelsome factions within the
walls, keeping or restoring peace where Herod's
authority was wont oftentimes to fail; and to
us he shows himself well disposed to
cultivate
our society and friendship, and make
himself
of service in many ways. When the
duties of his office allow him a season of
recreation
,
he seeks the precincts of thy brother's
dwelling, and either walking up and down on
the banks of the Jordan in company with thy
son and niece, sitting under the vine-covered
arbor, of which I have told thee, or else at the
table, partaking of the hospitality of Onias, we
have enjoyed many hours of agreeable
intercourse
.
He is youthful for the rank he holds,
but his great merit in campaigns, both in
Germany
and the East, have won for him early
advancement
.
The qualities of his heart are as
remarkable, as those of his intellect; so that
even in the army he has been called the good
Centurion. If rigorous in preserving discipline,
he is not unnecessarily severe. His justice
may always be relied upon; and when he
punishes
,
it is against the feelings of his nature; he
would pardon if it could be done with safety.
It was the last Sabbath that Onias made a
supper for Saturninus, at which sat down many
guests besides. Shammai, Eliel, Zadok, and
Eleazer, rulers, and doctors of the law from
Beth Harem were also there. The house was
bright with the multitude of lamps, and the
tables bent beneath the wealth both of the service
and of the meats with which it was loaded.
Music was added to the entertainment, which
came to us not too loud nor yet too faint, from
a neighboring apartment; and as the feast drew
to a close, there were gathered on the grounds
before the dwelling other members of the
household, the servants, the husbandmen, and
all of every other humble office belonging to
this great vine-dresser, where to the sound of
the timbrel, pipe, and harp, and by the light of
the fading day and the new moon, they joined
in dances common to the inhabitants of the
country. When we had sat at the tables the
usual time, we then resorted to the portico and
the rooms overlooking the Jordan, where for
our entertainment we either watched the
movements
of the rustic dance, or fell into such
discourse
as our thoughts were led to by the time
and place, and the objects around us.
Thus it is, said Saturninus to Judith,
that you of Judea keep your day of worship.
It is not so with your people, as I think, in
Rome.
So it may seem, said Judith, because there
by the necessary confinement of a city, our
usages are not made visible to every eye as
here, and you, I doubt, were never, when in
Rome, within the dwelling of a Jew.
I must confess, replied the Centurion, I
never was; but I can truly affirm that this has
not been because of any hostility which I have
entertained toward your nation, but simply
because
chance never threw me into their
society
.
I doubt not your word, replied Judith. If
it had been your fortune to have mingled with us
in Rome, you would have found I may presume
to say mainly the same observances there as
here; for we are to a wonder the same people
the earth over. How say you, Julian? for your
testimony must be beyond dispute.
I said that it was certainly so.
The stranger, however, observed
Saturninus
,
conceives of this day as if it were rather
a day of fasting and worship alone.
It is far otherwise, answered Judith. We
worship indeed on this day, and we rest from
labor, as do also our cattle and servants; but
otherwise
it is a day of feasting, not of fasting. It
must be the strictness with which labor of every
kind is prohibited which hath given origin to
the feeling you have expressed. Labor is
indeed
absolutely forbidden  that is the great end
of the appointment. Our merciful law hath taken
good care of the humble and the poor in this, that
the rich and the great cannot deprive them, nor
even the more helpless dumb beast of this
repose
.
No man however great in Israel dares
compel the toil, or even permit it, of man, woman,
or animal. This you will allow is both wise
and merciful.
It is indeed, replied the Roman. I wish
that in this point at least, the law of the Jew
were also the law of the Roman and of the
world.
But continued Judith laughing, so
exacting
is our law on this point, that were you,
Saturninus
,
to become one of us, and were so much as
to break the law in the least iota, even by bearing
your sword or lance from one place to another,
we should stone you even to death.
Alas then, replied Saturninus, I can never
be a Jew. But I suppose you speak but in jest.
Well, said Judith, we are not so savage
or so strict now. If you will become a
proselyte
,
I can promise you an easier yoke. Nay for
that, some of our doctors make it light enough.
But that must not be heard by our Rulers.
Shammai's voice happily shields us. We need
not fear being overheard, when he hath the
argument.
A loud burst of merriment from the group of
dancers before us here for a moment interrupted
our conversation. Judith, springing from her
seat and beholding the gayety of the peasants,
their wives, and children, could not be restrained
from joining them, but saying that she would
return soon bounded along the portico and down
the flight of steps and in a moment was in the
midst of them the merriest and most agile of all.
Such an example being given, I was not slow to
do likewise, so that till we were well wearied
with our exertions we continued to mingle with
the dancers and partake their pleasures. The
delight
which the accession of Judith to their
numbers
occasioned,  whom all of her servants and
dependents seem so to love that her service is their
highest pleasure,  was very manifest in the
increased
hilarity with which they engaged in
their sport as soon as she became one of them.
When we returned to the Portico, Saturninus
was seated and conversing with the Doctors,
whom we also joined. They had been
evidently
talking of the synagogue, for Saturninus was
inquiring of Shammai, why the stranger from
Enon had that morning been denied the
privilege
which he sought of speaking to the people,
while others were freely allowed.
Should a man, answered Zadok before
Shammai could find his words, who is a
follower
VOL. I. 21
of one that is reported to be rather in the
keeping of an evil spirit than of his own, be
allowed to speak in the name of the Lord? It
is not every one, though he may esteem himself
wise and as one of the elders, whom we are
ready to take at his own word. It was not
hard to guess with what new insolence he
would have entertained our ears.
Nevertheless, said Eleazer, I would gladly
have heard what it was he was so swollen with.
His own mouth, I doubt not, would have
condemned
him more than any reproof of ours.
So without doubt it might have been,
interrupted the bitter voice of Zadok, but so
it might not have been, and had the bag of wind
once found vent, who can tell what blasphemies
would have flowed abroad, to seduce, and
deceive
,
and pollute the hearer? What John hath
done, he would have striven to do.
His mouth was well stopped, said the
other.
Aye, said Eliel, it was  for the people
would have heard him gladly.
I should not marvel, if on the next Sabbath,
said Eleazer, they clamored more still to hear
him.
Let them clamor, replied Zadok, they are
neither rulers nor doctors, nor will all their uproar
make them so. There are the streets and the
highways; let him use them, and none will
hinder. Ere the next Sabbath it were no
wonder if the half-witted populace of
Beth-Harem
took him for the Christ himself, as I
hear in the region of Genessareth they begin
to do his master.
So it is indeed reported as I learn, said
Eleazer, but it is reported also that he says
plainly he is not the Christ.
He saith it to-day mayhap, rejoined Zadok,
but let the folly of the people in those parts
increase, as it is the nature of folly to do, and
carry greater crowds than now to his Baptism,
and we shall see what his meekness will do.
His sordid attire, his fastings and prayers are the
gins and snares to catch fools, and when the
multitude of them hath sufficiently grown, he
will have cheated himself, as well as them, into
an opinion of his own greatness he did not at
first entertain. Fools make fools.
It were well methinks, said Shammai, if
there were not so many others to set gins and
snares of the same sort to cheat those whose sight
is small. If John catches the people in that way,
he is not the first who by fastings and long
prayers has gotten a good opinion among the
people, which, if they could have seen behind
the veil of his prayers into his deeds, might not
have retained its fragrant odor.
It was easy to see at whom Shammai shot
his shaft, for Zadok's brow grew darker and
his lips drew back from his long teeth as he
said;
It is no crime to observe the Law of Moses
even to a tything of mint and cummin, that
I have ever heard. The blessing of Jehovah is
upon such. The law is the law, and it is not
kept except it be kept.
Most true, Rabbi, said Shammai, In
respect
of the rites of the Law, they are delivered
with exactness and are kept but in one manner.
In respect of other things we have choice.
They are not so weighty. In them justice may
be put by for a time; so did David. The Jew,
who should strive to be more than he, surely
would seek to be righteous overmuch.
Zadok stroked his beard but answered not.
But if that be truth, continued Shammai,
which we have lately heard, the world will
not long be afflicted with either the wisdom or
the folly of this madman, if he be indeed a
madman.
What is it? what is it? said Zadok
reviving.
Why this, said the Ruler, that he is
thrusting himself into Herod's affairs, which is
much as if he leaped into a lion's den.
That is news indeed! replied the other.
Ha! ha! I had not heard it. But what is it
he hath done? Let us hear.
Behold now, said Shammai, how this
learned Doctor scenteth evil afar off and snuffeth
up the odor thereof as of a pleasant sacrifice.
It were a charity to his soul not to answer him.
Why is the heart made to delight in
misfortunes
of others and vent curses on them? The
Jew by his nature, young Roman, curses thee
and all thy people.
As I judge, replied Saturninus, it is the
Jew that curses, and not the man who lives
under
the Jew. A Jew infant reared in Rome
would not speak such curses. It is your law
that shuts your hearts against the love of others.
Nature has no such tuition.
No, Saturninus, quickly interrupted
Judith
,
it is not our Law so much as the
traditions
which have supplanted it. True it is, our
people were made the instrument to destroy
impure and idolatrous tribes, and have been
instructed not to mix with any nations,
worshippers
of many gods. But this was, that a
purer religion might be preserved among one
people at least, that should be a pattern to the
rest of mankind. The Jewish is the only
people
who cleave to one God, without image or
picture through which to adore him, or by which
to conceive of him.
21 *
What is it he hath done, Shammai, said
Zadok, with impatience, what is it he hath
done? let us know.
That is true, rejoined Saturninus. But
it has availed little to mankind that you have
held a better faith, while a spirit so hostile
toward others hath prevailed. For men are
little inclined to copy those whom they hate, or
by whom they are hated.
Doubtless that is so, said Onias, but the
truth hath been too great to be wholly destroyed
in that way. Just as the sun shines through
dark clouds and thick mists, so hath this truth
shone through all our errors, vices, and
wickedness
,
and cast some light upon those who were
sitting in darkness. We have hindered it much,
but not altogether. Our commerce, and even
our wars have served to carry it abroad.
Yea, said Shammai, that is so; but after
all that hath been done for us, and in spite of
the law and our worship, the Jewish world is
but as any other. Jerusalem smells not sweeter,
I fear me, to the Lord, than Rome or
Alexandria
.
The man is mad, quoth Zadok, and
speaketh blasphemy. Verily, Shammai, it were
a righteous act to cast thee out of the
synagogue
.
Then, said the ruler, would there be at
length a chance of my amendment. A man is
rarely better than his companions.
Hear him! said Zadok, Hear his
railings
!
But cease now, and let it be known
what thou hast heard of John.
It is this only, that he raves madly against
Herod for what he is reported to purpose
concerning
Philip's wife. The king, trusting to
have ended his iniquity in peace ere it got much
abroad is now as mad as he.
Ah! that is good! cried Zadok. Now
we shall see what a prophet can do against a
king. Now we shall see how this tanner from
Enon will bear himself on the Sabbath.
Nay, they may claim thus much at our
hand, said Shammai, both John and his
disciples
,
that they are bold and fear no one,
and that is a prophet's mark.
Now, cried Zadok, let us sing hosannas.
Shammai holds John to be a prophet! Let us
report it in Beth-Harem  Shammai, the
learned doctor and ruler of the Synagogue, that
stands between the market and the citadel, and
which once heard the voice of great Hillel,
Shammai, the Hebrew, the Greek, the
Philosopher
,
follows after John of Hebron with an
uncombed
beard, unwashen hands, a beggar's robe,
and a leathern girdle about his loins
The grinding of millstones, cried
Shammai
interrupting the hoarse sound, the braying
of asses, the shrieking of the wind among the
dry cedars of the Dead Sea, the creaking of the
wine press, are not to be named, Zadok, with
the shrill trumpet of thy voice. Thou needest
not repeat thy proclamation, for it has already
been heard beyond the walls of Beth-Harem.
With these sayings, partly in jest, and as it
seemed to me partly in earnest, these learned
scribes and rulers took their departure, and
returned
to the city. When they were gone, it
being still early, and the sounds of the dancers
and their music being over, we continued
sitting and conversing.
These priests and rulers, said Saturninus,
take life lightly, if one may judge them by
their words. They seem each as if two persons,
the one light and sportful and open, the other
standing back, close, secret, and dark. They
appeared not to utter their true thoughts, but
to be playing with the subjects that came up.
It is partly so, indeed, said Judith, as
perhaps with all of us, at least with very many
of us, we are one thing to the eye, one thing on
the surface, but another quite to him who hath
sight to see beyond, and wit to draw up what
is there in the greater depths. Sometimes the
outer clothing is the fairer and better, but often
it covers over a worthier thing than itself, and
conceals it from all but those gifted with a
sharper, and more penetrating vision.
Yet, continued Saturninus, in one thing
they seemed to agree, in showing dislike of the
prophet, who is said to have risen up, and to
have commenced the labors of a reformer. But
why should one be feared, who comes only as a
teacher of virtue?
The rulers dislike and oppose him, said
Onias, not because he is a prophet, if indeed
he be one, but because he is not more of one.
The common people, as you may have been
told, crowd his steps and hear him gladly.
They are caught with every one who sets up a
pretension like this.
But, said the Roman, even if he were
no more than a reformer of the morals of a
people, were I a Jew, I should receive him
gladly
.
It were a happy day for Rome, could some
one arise whom the gods should fill with a
spirit and a power to waken her from her
slumbers
of death. There are many there, whose
prayer to the gods is, morning and evening, at
home and in the temples, for more knowledge
and light. For the darkness now is one that
may be felt. The people still worship the
ancient gods with faith in them more or
less. But the learned and the thoughtful ask
for a better religion than their ancestors have
bequeathed, ere they can give it their belief
and their obedience. We are buried in
mysterious
gloom. We grope as blind men, not
knowing whence we come nor whither we go.
We have an instinct, which teaches the reality
of some Cause equal to the production of this
broad world, and the overhanging sun and stars.
But we know him not; we know not how to
conceive of him, nor in what manner with most
acceptance to approach him, save that here also
our instincts serve us somewhat, but guide each
one a different way. What we mean by virtue,
we are persuaded with some general conviction,
must be the most pleasing offering we can
bring to the altar of the Supreme God; but
we know not in what proportion we should
bring him that offering, or others of prayer,
sacrifices, garlands, and music; moreover we
cannot tell how to think of our life, what it is,
and when to terminate  of death, what it is,
and to what with certainty it bears us. So that
we of Rome long for nothing more than for a
teacher and reformer, who should by his genius
exercise authority over the minds of men, and
by divine inspirations pour into them the light
of truth. I would give an ear even to one
of not more promise than this wanderer in the
wildernesses of Jordan, seeing that perchance
he may be filled with a divine spirit  for it
would appear that we are not able of ourselves,
who see so little way, to say in what manner
and with what appearances a messenger from
God would approach us.
It is to me, said Judith, a pleasure to
hear such opinions. Dwelling, even as I do,
under a religious law, which hath the true God
for its author, even I desire a knowledge
superior
to that which now, as a people we possess.
And with many, with multitudes in our
unhappy
country, I wait for the redemption of
Israel, for a new comforting of the people of
God. And with certainty do we look for a
teacher, who shall complete and perfect the law
now given to us, and establish us in a condition
of virtue and happiness, as well as of outward
glory, we now cannot so much as dream of.
Night and day, day and night, do prayers go
up from this whole people, from the sinner as
well as the saint, from the child on its mother's
knee, as well as from him who is standing on the
borders of his grave, that God would please to
cause a new day to rise upon us, and his
kingdom
to come and be established in the midst of
us. I cannot then but look with expectation
toward every one who approaches and gives
any signs that God is with him. What to
think of John I know not, nor do others, as it
would seem. The common people, who in
some things see clearest  would not God
endow
them with a sense to know his messenger
when he should come  follow after him, as
we hear, daily in increasing numbers, and by
baptism are enrolled among his disciples.
Would he were in this region, that I might hear
for myself and judge for myself.
My dear child, said Onias, think not of
John, nor of any great thing as to come of him.
He is nought, stark nought. I too at first
looked
toward him with expectation, or rather with
a wondering curiosity, but God is not with him.
He too is a deceiver, or deceived, like so many
who have gone before him. In the early days
of thy mother Eunice all Judea was stirred
from its lowest depths, yet it proved in the end
but a delusion of Satan.
Of whom and of what speak you, I asked.
Doubtless the knowledge of what I would
speak of never reached thy ears, for it was
before thou sawest the light. I speak of the
child born at Bethlehem.
Not even a rumor, said I, hath ever
reached me.
It fell out in the latter part of the reign of
the great Herod. I even was but a child.
Herod I know; and of him heard much at
Csarea; but not of what you now name.
Surely, said Judith, have I heard from
my mother, in my youth, tales of the
wonderful
child born at Nazareth or Bethlehem  born
too I remember me in the stable of an inn,
whom kings came and worshipped. The rest
is gone from me, or has mixed itself with a
thousand such tales from the far East.
In Jerusalem and all the neighboring parts,
said Onias, as indeed throughout Judea, have
fables,  some with portions of truth
intermingled
,
passed from mouth to mouth. I then,
as I have said, was but a child, yet did many
things fall upon my ear, which sank in and
have not since departed. But I rather speak of
what afterwards came to my knowledge. All
Jerusalem was at that time in great expectation
of the immediate appearing of the Messiah, and
ready to convert anything beyond the facts of
every day into a wonder. Among a thousand
rumors no one knew what to believe, and
the events since that day have shown that there
was nothing to be believed. But the stories
handed down assert the birth of a child, as
thou hast said, Judith, in the stable of an inn
of Bethlehem,  whose parents were strangers of
Nazareth in Galilee,  and whose birth was
declared
to some shepherds in the neighborhood
of the town by a vision of angels. As I think,
and as many thought then, what those peasants
saw was in their dream. Yet so confidently
VOL. I. 22
was the vision reported, and beside that, the
appearance
of a bright star, pointing to the very
spot where the child lay, that many believed,
and it came to be a rumor throughout the city
and all the parts round about, that he who was
to be King of the Jews was at last born. This
coming soon, as it could hardly fail to do, to the
ears of Herod, alarmed him not a little; for it
was not unknown to him, that the people were
constantly looking when this future king should
come and assume his throne. Nay, there were
not wanting flatterers, who persuaded Herod
that he himself was the looked for Messiah.
But he believed them not. Yet not being ready
to surrender his power into the hands of any
other, and fearing, lest there might be some
truth in the tales which were passing from one
to another, and filled the city, he, according to
his nature, determined upon a cruel measure for
allaying his apprehensions; for he gave sudden
and secret orders for all the children in
Bethlehem
to be seized and slaughtered, that so
the new-born king might perish with them.
Yet the order was not so secretly given, but
that a warning came to many in season, who
escaped the intended destruction. Among
them, it was affirmed by some, was the young
child, though by others it was asserted that
it had perished. But since, it has been well
known that they fled  the parents and the
child  to their native place, where they have
dwelt, he who was to be a king, quite
forgetting
his high dignity, living and laboring
humbly enough, subject to his father as a
carpenter. Wherefore the wonders related of
his birth are thus shown to be delusions or
worse. The only thing we know to have been
real was the destruction of innocent children
by the king, of which the parents of the child
were the cause, either by their own acts and
delusions, or the delusions and acts of others,
which they could not prevent. Their own
safety they effected, but left behind others
miserably
to perish through their means.
This is a strange story, said I.
Not so strange to us, replied Onias, who
are ever greedy of what is marvellous, and who
dwell on the borders of the land of fables.
Who, asked Judith, were these people
from Nazareth, that they should pretend to the
glory of being parents of the Messiah? Is it
not our belief, that he shall come of the House
of David? Surely their lineage might be
traced.
So much was true, replied Onias. It
was found, that they were in truth of that
family
,
though poor and unknown.
What, father, was the name they bore?
asked Judith.
I have forgotten, answered Onias; nor
do I remember that of the child; though
among other feigned things it was sent abroad,
that an angel had announced the name by which
it should be called.
Were there many who gave their faith to
such pretences? I asked.
It cannot be denied, said Onias, that
very many believed, and more waited in hope
to see what might come of it. But the more
wise and prudent saw not, in any of the things
affirmed, the signs that should fitly announce
the Messiah of Judea. Especially was it clear,
that he, upon whose shoulders was to rest the
government of Israel and of the world, would
not first breathe in the feeding trough of a
camel. It is not so kings are born; much less
the King of kings. How should the people
of God know their sovereign in such a form,
and how should they be guilty, should they
reject or destroy him? After a time no more
was heard of this wonder of Bethlehem; and
by the generations of to-day it is forgotten that
such events have been.
So, you will have us to believe, I said,
will it be with this John of Hebron.
That, Onias replied, is what I would say.
The signs of Judea's deliverer are not more in
this baptizing wanderer of the wilderness than
they were in that peasant's child. And when
the people have run after him, and fed their
foolish hopes on chaff, they will return to
themselves
,
and wait. Many times have our hopes
been cast down, and they will be again if in
our folly we fasten them on this new preacher.
A good man he may be, but no more. He who
is to come hath not yet come; nevertheless he
may not be far off, but standing in the midst
of us while our eyes see him not. John indeed
speaks of one to follow him. But neither is
it he.
Saying this, Onias rose and withdrew.
When he was gone Judith said, My father
will not believe until such an one appears as he
looketh for, and John is far from that. But so
I, Julian, cannot judge. Are we to say how a
messenger of God shall manifest himself to
men, or what form, whether that of a servant
or a king, his Messiah shall take? Alas! for
me a king were a small gift indeed. What to
me were it if David again came forth from the
grave, or his greater son, or any of the Prophets,
and erected here in Judea the throne which so
many are impatient to behold? Of what avail
were such an one to me? My soul  and, Julian,
I am not alone  hungers for somewhat more
nutritious
,
that can feed and support a higher life
than that of the body  for an entertainment
22*
richer and more divine than could ever be had
in a king's palace. We have kings now, and
courts of luxury. I could resort to Herod, or
Pilate, or Philip, but what should I find there
that I want?
But, dear Judith, said I, do you not now
in saying this yourself commit the error which
you have just noted in Onias? He turns
away from this wild man of the wilderness,
this son of thunder, this unlettered and humble
child of nature, this stern preacher of
righteousness
,
because he does not agree with the
picture he has formed in his mind of the
Prophet whom God will send, when he sends
forth his Messiah; and do not you also make
your own thought the measure of what God
shall do, when you refuse your homage to a
king? Yet, surely, when the prophets speak
of him who is to come, it is of one who is to
govern Israel, and rule over the kingdom of
David  it is ever of the Christ, as King.
Yes, Julian, she replied, without doubt
I have condemned myself. I am wrong. I
should have no judgment in matters too high
for the reach of our poor thoughts. And yet
how can one, who feels the darkness within,
cease to conjecture and hope, and look forward
for that which the heart, as God hath made it,
pants for, as the spent hart for the water-brooks?
But surely our wisdom is, as our office, to wait for
the signs in patience of the soul, which shall
give us assurance of the Prophet of God
whenever
he shall appear. To you, Saturninus,
these opinions I suppose are strange and new.
Not so, replied the Centurion; I have
been long in Judea, and the faith and the
hopes of her people are already familiar to my
ear, and my mind. I have heard much of that of
which you have now spoken, and ever listen with
satisfaction to any who converse of such things,
as thereby I become more exact in my
knowledge
of the forms of religious faith, which
prevail
among your people; and it has ever been the
thoughts of men concerning their religious
observances
and doctrines, that have possessed for
me the highest power of attraction. As I enter
the precincts of the dwelling of a new people, it
is the first investigation with me, what is their
belief of the gods? or have they none? or do
they worship the forms of nature, and the
instruments
of her power? Among you of
Judea
have I alone found thoughts of God,
worthy
of the mind to entertain concerning that
being, whom no mind can ever understand. I
mean among the common people, and the whole
people; for among us, philosophers have long
held and do now hold opinions on such things,
hardly less worthy to be reverenced than such
as are to be found in your sacred books. But
with you, adequate thoughts and conceptions
of the Divinity are a universal inheritance.
So, said Judith, they may seem to you,
when you place them by the side of opinions
held by the Roman populace. But so they
seem not to me, and to many of our tribe who
wait for the coming of the Just One. Our
doctors
and priests by their traditions, by which
they have changed the law delivered by Moses,
and in its place thrust their own figments, under
which they escape from the obligations of a
true piety, and in its stead offer to God and man
the dead sacrifice of a ceremonial exactness,
have corrupted not only our religion but the
very hearts of the people, and with truth
doubtless
it may be affirmed, that beneath the fair
and painted show we make of faith and love,
their is hid unbelief, hatred, malice, and all
uncleanness. The visible and apparent
goodness
is as a treacherous covering of verdure and
flowers over dead men's graves, through which
he who treads thereon falls into depths of foul
corruption, that the mind dares not contemplate.
Of your Roman people there must be more
hope than of us, we having perverted and thrust
from us a higher truth. I wait with hope to
hear good things yet of John. As yet all that
we learn is as nothing. We hear to-day by such
as have come from farther up the river, that he
declares himself to be but the herald of one
greater than himself, but who that greater is,
or who himself is, only darkly hints.
So, said I, Ziba hath reported to me,
receiving it from those who deal in news at
Beth-Harem. The people, he says, are greatly
moved with curiosity, many having gone up
toward Galilee in the desire to see him. They
were not a little enraged that the rulers gave
not to his disciple, the Tanner of Enon, the
liberty to declare himself. But in private
dwellings
they have heard him, and even on the steps
of the market-place. They intend that on the
next Sabbath his voice shall be heard in the
Synagogue, if any power of theirs can bring
it to pass.
The heart of our people properly so called,
Saturninus, said Judith, is better than that
of their guides and masters, our proud
counsellors
and doctors. Among our sequestered
valleys
,
away from corrupt cities, they are still in
some sort a pure and simple tribe  believers in
the spirit of our law as well as formal
observers
of the letter. Were a prophet indeed to
arise, it is from them I should look for a just
judgment concerning him, rather than from
their masters, the Pharisees and doctors.
The moon now sinking below the horizon,
and the inhabitants of the house having
withdrawn
from their amusement, the Centurion bid
us farewell and turned toward the gates of
Beth-Harem.
It is not difficult to see, my mother, with
what attractive power Judith acts upon
Saturninus
.
He can neither hear other persons nor
see other objects, while she is near; nor is it
wonderful, for it is the same with all who
approach
her. But it would, methinks, amuse
the dark Pilate, were it made known to him,
that he whom he sent into these regions to
observe
and control an enemy, is already, as it
were, become the friend and associate of his
household. He may indeed know this, and
suppose that his spy has but so much the
nearer access for his observations. And it
would be so, were Saturninus capable of playing
two parts. But of that no one who had ever
looked upon his countenance, in which are
written, in characters that cannot deceive,
honesty
and truth, could believe him guilty. He
comes to the dwelling of thy brother as a
friend, and will do none other than the offices
and acts of a friend. And truly in this
manner
does he gain most successfully the ends of
his sojourn in Beth-Harem. For no one could
so secure the adherence and quiet of
Beth-Harem
and its suburbs, as by showing himself
the friend and companion of Onias. But as
friendly as he is toward Onias, so is he to the
inhabitants of the city, and especially to the
more religious among them. He has already
conferred many acts of favor upon the
Synagogue
.
X.
The
beauty of this region, my mother, which
lies on the shores of the Jordan, would delight
your eye which so loves to dwell on the works of
nature. If Tivoli and the Alban hills, the base
of Soracte, the sea views of Bai and Naples,
draw you so often from the heated walls of
Rome, and send you back again so much
happier
and better, as you do ever affirm, not less
would this Jewish world minister to both mind
and body, to the eye loving beauty alone, and
to the soul, seeking God in beauty as in
all things. Indeed to thy spirit, which ever
seems half caught away from earth by its
familiar musings upon the future and
unseen
,
this land would supply a nourishment
others never can. Even I have come to
perceive
and feel the difference. It is like no
other spot of earth. The mind thinks of the
many times through so many centuries that the
spirit of the Universe, the infinite and
incomprehensible
energy on which all depend, while
from other nations he hath hidden himself in a
silence and darkness never violated, hath here
made himself visible, hath here conversed with
man, and taught and guided him as a child,
that through one people so instructed truth
might be then spread abroad in the world
and thinking thus, a dread falls upon it in the
midst of the scenes, where such things have
been, which, though it awes the soul, yet
strangely adds to the pleasure with which it
gazes and contemplates. The very leaves of
the trees as they tremble on their branches seem
shaken by the invisible God; the dark woods
and the silent grotto are here entered with a
hesitating step, as if there especially would be
felt his presence. On the banks of the sacred
Jordan the ear hears Him in the murmuring of
its waters. And over the face of the whole land,
and in the overhanging air there seems
brooding
the spirit of Him, who hath indeed made all,
and is the Father of all, but is in a nearer sense,
as the past hath proved, the Father and Protector
of this people, and may at any moment and in any
place again make himself suddenly to be seen,
and heard, and felt. Now especially are all
looking
and waiting for the place and the hour, when
He shall shine forth and put in some soul his
mind and his power, and establish his kingdom
as of old in the sight of all men. Every
rumor
of what is strange is caught up and
magnified
,
VOL. I. 23
and wherever it goes finds those full of
feverish expectations, who are prompt to
believe
.
Is this feeling that holds all alike, the
high and the low, the slave and the lord, the
Pharisee, the Sadducee, and the Herodian, the
mother and the child, the sound and diseased of
mind, the whole and the possessed, the
Samaritan
as well as the Jew,  is this a delusion? or
is it indeed stirred up within us by the visitings
of God himself, as a preparation for that which
is to be soon unfolded? Oh, my mother, who
can doubt, that hath dwelt upon the writings
of our Scriptures, as I have lately done,
whether it be of a divine origin, this general
moving and heaving of the common mind?
The time spoken of by the prophets hath come,
and as they are true, must the kingdom of God
quickly appear. And of a surety if ever this
people is to be saved, it must be now; if ever
they are to be snatched from the jaws of the
devourer, it must be now ere they are quite
swallowed up. A little while and they will be
dissolved and lost in the mighty mass of the
Leviathan, whose teeth are now gnashing upon
them ready to destroy.
Concerning this I have now at length
somewhat
of moment to say unto thee. But let it
come in its order.
It was on the first day of the week, the day
following that on which Saturninus supped with
Onias, that as I sat reading, not as in Rome,
Ennius or Virgil or Seneca, but the Prophets,
Judith with steps light as a falling leaf, drew
near, and wished to converse. For Judith I was
ready, alas! how ready, to close even the
Prophets
.
I saw at once that some trouble had
come into her clear spirit to stir and cloud its
depths. What is it? said I, as she placed
herself at my side; your eye is often sad, but
never troubled as now. Of what wouldst thou
speak?
Of my father, Julian  of Onias.
And what of Onias? said I with alarm;
is it not well with him?
Yes, it is well with him, she replied, and
yet is he sick. He is not as he used to be.
He is silent; he hears not what is spoken; by
night he wakes, and dreams by day. Then, as
thou knowest, he leaves the harvest, and the
care of his fields, where once was all his
delight
,
for the company of those in Beth-Harem,
whom formerly he knew not, for those long
visits to Machrus, and journeys to and fro
over Judea. I know not what it all portends.
Confides he not in thee, Judith?
Alas! not in all things. My mother, as I
have heard, shared not only his love but his
trust also. Me, though he loves as fondly as
father, methinks, ever did, yet doth he still deem
a child to be loved indeed, but not wholly
trusted.
But to me, Judith, will he entrust less of
himself than to thee. I am a stranger in
comparison
of thee. He has spoken to me only of
things common to all. On our journey hither,
indeed, he talked more largely, but since, he
has been closer to me than even to thee.
Yet, said Judith, do I guess from the
looks which from time to time he fixes on you,
that to you he will ere long impart that,
whatever
it may be, which causes his anxiety.
But I would that before that, nay at once,
you might tear his secret from him, and so
either deliver him from his yoke, or, if it be
worthy, share it with him, laying on me also an
equal weight.
Do you not, said I, even so much as
surmise
what it is that hath so possessed him?
I cannot, Julian, but think I do; yet may God
grant it to be an error. I know nothing; but,
as thou sayest, I surmise. I fear then, that
Onias plans a rising in Israel. Since my
memory
can tell of anything, it tells of nothing
with such clearness and strength as of Onias's
worship of the names and deeds of the
Maccabees
,
and of Judas of Galilee. In the
morning
and the evening prayer these are the names,
even with that of the Great God, first fixed in
my mind. The petition, that God would grant
salvation to his people in these times by some
arm like theirs, to which he would give his
own strength, has been with him the first and
the last, the alpha and omega, of his prayers.
And when the oppressions of Judea have been
named, he has been ever wont to pour forth,
with even a prophet's force, the wrath that has
burned within him, so that our quiet vales have
echoed far and near to the tones of his voice
when so roused the voice of a tempest.
I shall never forget it, said I. In the
streets of Csarea it towered over all the crash
of the falling temple, the noise of the battle,
and the braying of the trumpets.
What I would say, continued Judith, is,
that of late all this hath ceased. While his
heart seems to burn hot within him, and the
eye, starting and suspicious, shows that all is
awake there  he speaks not of his old themes,
and when of anything, of my veil perhaps,
my sandal, or some idle household care. Then
messengers arrive and depart in the silence
of the night, and Onias ofttimes himself joins
them  while upon me, though not indeed by
words but otherwise more strictly, is enjoined
silence and secrecy.
I cannot, my cousin, like you, compare
23*
Onias with himself at different times, nor note
the signs which to-day make him to be unlike
what he has been before. But neither can I
doubt the truth of your conjectures. But, Judith,
there is not within the compass of the hills and
valleys of Judea, from the mountains of Lebanon
to those of Idumea, a man for wisdom and
power like Onias. If he be indeed laying, as
he thinks, the foundation of a new Israel, he is
a workman of whom we need not be ashamed,
and who will put the top stone over where he
has laid the foundation for it. What he begins
he will end.
Judith drew back, with pain and distress in
her countenance, as I said these words.
Oh Julian, and do you then think that such
is to be the salvation of Israel? That the
Saviour of our country is to be one whose
garments
shall be rolled in blood, his footsteps
marked by the slaughter of embattled hosts, the
devastation of cities and villages, and whose
aim shall only be conquest and dominion? It
may be so. So our people will think it to
be. But for me, my heart, blindly perhaps,
cries out against it. Though Onias should grow
to be king of all Israel with Rome at his feet
't would bring no joy to me. At Csarea,
surely
,
if I have heard you aright, you withstood
the madness of Philip and Anna.
I did, indeed, I answered; but I might
not therefore, dear Judith, the enterprise of
Onias. Philip was one  Onias is another. A
rising in Israel, that was but the rising of an
Israelite, as in Csarea, I would now, as then,
oppose as useless waste of life and strength,
though not as of itself to be held guilty. The
slave may always turn on his enslaver, and
plead God and the right. But when Israel
Israel through all her tribes  is roused, and
rises in her ancient might, then, Judith, I shall
be of her side, and my life, little as it may be,
and with it all my wealth, shall be cast a
bubble on the tide of war to bide the issue.
And certain as we may find it to be, that Onias
is laying the plans which you surmise, so
certain
is it that that is on foot, to which it will
behove every son of Abraham to lend his heart
and hand  from which none but a traitor to his
country can turn away. It will be no affair of
Csarea or Beth-Harem, but of Israel in all her
borders.
Judith was silent. I saw that her
disappointment
was great at finding in me so prompt a
defender of the cause, which she believed her
father was engaged in originating or
promoting
.
She could not conceal her grief.
But if, she again resumed, the purposes
of Onias, and the enterprise he hath taken in
hand be, as in the case of Csarea, one narrow
and confined
Then, I rejoined, may you depend upon
Julian taking the same part now as before.
Let me hope, she said, that it will be so.
Saying these things, she returned with a step
less light and quick to her apartments.
Many things have served to convince me,
that Judith's conjectures are not without some
good foundation. I too have noted in the
manner
of Onias, when present, and the manner of
his absence, that which hath put me upon
considering
the probable causes of what appeared
to me a conduct too unusual and singular to
be the effect of mere accident, or a momentary
humor. But what I had reached only through
much reasoning, and bringing into one
connexion
things apparently diverse and remote, and
was then after all an obscure and doubtful
conclusion, was soon made certain and clear,
and placed beyond question by the
communication
of Onias himself. By no means was I
prepared for all that he unfolded, when, soon
after Judith had left me, as I was walking
slowly toward Beth-Harem by the early
twilight
,
he overtook me and began to converse.
When we had talked for a space of such things
as first offered themselves, and had advanced a
little on the road, we came to a well which
lies half way between the house of Onias and
the gate of the city, whither the inhabitants
often resort, that they may refresh themselves
on the spot with its cooler waters, and bear
them in pitchers and skins to their houses.
Trees on every side shield it from the rays of
the sun, save where the highway passes it in a
straight course to the city, whose gates, seen at
a distance, seem to be a wall to prevent the
further passage of the traveller. All around among
the trees, are seats rudely constructed of rocks,
nearly in the shape in which nature left them,
but which, covered with moss or leaves that
have grown up and spread over them, afford an
agreeable resting place to the weary pilgrim as
he arrives thus far on his journey, or to those
who seek them for the cool air, or water, and
as a relief from the noise and dust of
Beth-Harem
.
Here Onias led me; and here we sat by the
well side about the tenth hour. He seemed
like one who wishes yet fears to speak; and
while he fears and doubts, first discourses of
many things about which he cares not.
It was not far from here, he said, that
we first saw the Roman Saturninus, as he
advanced
towards Beth-Harem.
It was but a few paces distant, I said.
Saturninus, he resumed musingly, is a
good man. He is a Roman, a sinner of the
gentiles, but he is a good man. Moreover, he
loves our nation, and already hath conferred
many favors on our Synagogue.
He seems to me, I replied, to be one, to
whom it is natural to do well; and for whom
it matters little, whether he believes in the
gods of Rome, or the God of Abraham, Isaac,
and Jacob. He hath that ready for which alone
we need a knowledge of the truth, virtue; and
it is enough.
For this world, said Onias. But how
shall he have a part in the resurrection, except
he be a son of Abraham? The promises of
Jehovah are to no others. Nevertheless, he is
a good man; and it were a pity evil befell him
in this world, or the world to come.
As for the world to come, said I, I am
willing to leave him to the compassions of God,
which are more than man's. In Zadok's hands
he would fare ill  nor would I readily trust
him to Eleazer. It is well for man, that in
the judgment day, a being of larger mercy than
his holds the balance in which sin is
weighed
.
May I be delivered from the judgment of
man, said Onias, for his mercies are cruel;
nor would I that Saturninus suffer therefrom.
Why should he fear, or shouldst thou fear
for him? I asked.
Julian, said thy brother, he and his men
are as those who once stood upon the plain by
the Salt Sea. The earth is on fire beneath
them, and is ready to part asunder and swallow
them up. At a moment when they look not
for it, yea when they are in security, at the
feast it may be, or the dance, sudden
destruction
may overtake them.
Hardly doubting what the thought was in
thy brother's mind, I yet asked him of what he
spake, and whence the danger to Saturninus.
As he was about to reply, the form of one
walking
toward the city drew nigh, and pausing at
the well, then approached us where we sat, and
surveying us a moment, gave the salute of peace
to Onias. The obscurity of the air did not
allow
us to discern who it was, especially as he
was much wrapped about in his garment, for
the evening was cool; but no sooner had he
spoken, than we knew the voice of Zadok.
I was vexed that we were so interrupted, but
Onias seemed, on the other hand, glad that the
Ruler was come, and acceded readily to his
request that we would pass the gates and enter
his dwelling, which was just within them.
We accordingly rose from our seat, and
accompanied
him to the city. We were soon once more
at our ease beneath the roof of the Rabbi, who
gave us hospitable entertainment. Onias soon
returned to what we had been conversing of.
You ask, said he, of what danger I
spake?  Zadok, Julian, is of our side.
Aye, said the Rabbi, that am I. Say
on. Fear me not.
Of part at least of what I would say,
continued
Onias, I doubt not, Julian, thou more
than surmisest  that there is to be a rising in
Israel!
I said, that so much I could not but gather
from what he had said at different times, and
from what I had observed.
Yes, said Onias, the hour has come, when
once more Judea shall own her king! The
time for her redemption hath drawn nigh!
and but that in Csarea, the tumult that
happened
there threw a hindrance in our way, the
hour ere this had fully come. A secret league,
invisible to all eyes save those whom it
concerns
,
binds together all parts of our land to
our enterprise. In Galilee, in Samaria, in
Per
a,
in Judea, in Idumea, are there those who
stand ready and waiting, their hands upon their
swords and their loins girded  a multitude that
no man can number. Who is he, in whose
veins runs the blood of a true Israelite, that
will refuse to join himself to such a company
to those who, though they should themselves
perish, shall purchase redemption for Israel;
shall be the sacrifice with which the Lord shall
be well pleased; shall lay the first stones of
the foundations of that kingdom of our God
that shall be everlasting. It is not thou,
Julian
,
of the house of Alexander, who will draw
back! Since I saw thee in the fight in C
sarea
,
I knew thee to be an Israelite indeed, and
what I have heard since from thee hath
persuaded
me, that on thee one may rely as a staff
that shall not bend nor break.
I then was about to say what I had but just
before declared to Judith, concerning the extent
in which the whole people were engaged in the
present enterprise; but Onias interrupted me,
I know what thou wouldst say. Fear not.
This is not, Julian, a revolt on the part of
Onias, the vine-dresser, nor on the part of
Beth-Harem
and the country round about, nor on the
part of the inhabitants of Pera alone. It is not
one against a thousand, nor a thousand against
the innumerable hosts of Rome. But it is, or
it shall be Israel, from Dan to Beersheba, who
shall rise as one man against the oppressor! If
with their handful among the rocks and the
hills, Matathias and Judas overcame the great
Antiochus, and wrought out deliverance for
Israel, how shall it be but that when the same
VOL. I. 24
Israel comes up, with all her hosts mustered and
arrayed, and the Lord and his anointed to lead
them on, we shall again triumph, and more than
triumph, over the uncircumcised, and upon the
necks of those who have been our rulers, set our
feet as kings and conquerors? Julian, continued
thy brother, with a voice low and mysterious,
to the ears of one who is worthy to hear so
glad tidings I say it, We have found the
Messiah!
Aye, said Zadok, we have found the
Messiah!
And it is he, continued Onias, who shall
lead the hosts of Israel.
Yea, said Zadok, it is under our king
we shall fight.
What mean you? I asked; what, and
whom mean you?  this prophet on the banks
of the Jordan?
A man possessed of a Devil? cried
Zadok
.
What mark, said Onias, do we behold in
John, of him who is to redeem Israel? What
is he but a wandering beggar, if indeed he be
not, as Zadok saith, in the possession of a
Devil? So in truth affirm,  and who should
discern in such things clearer than they,  so
affirm Pharez the Diviner, and Uzzi the
Exorcist
.
Is he such an one as the people are
looking
for, and such an one as the Prophets have
foretold? In Herod! Julian, in the Tetrarch of
Galilee, do we behold our future king.
Neither was I wholly unprepared for this
disclosure. Onias had more than once hinted
his belief, and his frequent intercourse with
Herod at Machrus had confirmed my suspicions.
But though, for myself, I was ready to give due
honor to Herod as a king, I was not ready to
own him as the great and expected Prince.
And so, at once, I said to Onias.
He heard me, and replied, Be not in haste
to reject him ere you have known and seen him.
As there were not wanting those who in
former
days believed the Great Herod to be the
Sent of God, so there are not wanting a
greater
number who for better reasons put their faith
in his Son. If it be the office of the Anointed
of God to be the Saviour of his country, to
drive from her borders the Gentile, to raise
Jerusalem
from where she sits in sackloth and
ashes to her ancient pinnacle of renown, to
exalt the law in the eyes of all nations and
establish it, and bring under its dominion all
the nations of the Earth, and if now, as all our
wise men affirm, and the Scriptures declare,
the set time is come, and the times of the
prophecies are fulfilled, where shall we look but
to Herod? where are the signs for which we
seek but in him? He is already a prince
powerful
and wise; his brother of Iturea is also a
prince, of power hardly less, and in Jerusalem
dwells Philip, who holds no small sway over
the hearts of the people of that great capital.
Moreover, an inward voice persuadeth Herod
that he is the man, and they, who are wise in a
knowledge of things hidden to common eyes,
announce him such  diviners and soothsayers,
they are of one and the same mind.
Yea, said Zadok, it is so. Pharez and
Uzzi both hail him king.
If Herod be not He, where shall we find
him? continued Onias  it, is now, or it is
never. The Prophets say now  yet I say
again, where is he? Who will show him to us?
If Herod be not he, we may again lie down in
despair, for there is no other. Over the whole
face of Judea the eye beholds no other; and
the days are fulfilled.
And who, I asked, believe in him?
There are those scattered throughout all
the borders of the land, he replied, who are
believers, and who stand with their hands on
their swords, prompt to act when he shall
declare
himself. The Herodians, save a few, are
with him. No words are spoken; but the
seeds of revolt are sown in all parts, and are
taking root. And what think you when I say,
that a league is made with Sejanus, whereby at
the time that he in Rome strikes for the
Empire
,
Herod strikes for Judea, and while the
Tetrarch subdues the common enemy here and
Sejanus there, as Sejanus will be Emperor of
Rome  yet but for a season  Herod will
reign King of the Jews.
Is it indeed so? I asked; for this I own
amazed me.
It is so, replied Onias; and the proof
thereof thou shalt behold at Machrus with
thine own eyes. Herod has not been idle these
many years, though others have slept. We
have forgotten even ourselves; but he hath
remembered us. The secret chambers of
Machrus shine with the arms and the
harness
of thousands, which he hath caused to
be furnished and laid away in their dark
repository
.
So is it in Beth-Harem, at Herodium,
but chiefly at Tiberias and Sepphoris, in whose
vaults are piled spear, and sword, and shield,
javelin, and polished armor, for as many as for
the love of Judea shall be ready to use them.
Let my eyes have knowledge of this, I
cried  though I doubt not thy word Onias
and
Thine eyes shall see it all, cried Zadok,
and when they have seen, thou wilt say, the
half was not told thee.
24*
Onias paced impatiently the room where we
sat, as if he would break through its walls for
a larger space.
Yea, he exclaimed, lifting up his eyes to
Heaven and spreading forth his arms, yea, the
time, the set time is come, and He will
comfort
Zion. He will build up her waste places.
Put on thy beautiful garments, O Jerusalem, the
Holy City. Thou shalt no more be called
Desolate
,
but thou shalt be called Hepzi-bah and
thy land Beulah, for the Lord delighteth in thee.
Mine eyes, even mine, shall behold thine honor,
and shall see thine enemies, the uncircumcised
and the accursed, broken, and scattered, and
destroyed, as the chaff before the whirlwind,
as the stubble beneath the flail of the thresher,
as the fine dust beneath the hoofs of the horses
and the wheel of the chariot! Yea, let mine
eye see its desire upon mine enemies, and upon
thine, O Jerusalem, daughter of God, and then,
having seen thy salvation, shall I lie down and
sleep in peace.
Zadok then took up the word, and in strains
yet more triumphant, sang the redemption of
Israel and the glorious kingdom of Messiah.
If I shared their zeal in some degree, my
mother, thou wilt not marvel, seeing it is now
so long a time that I have laid aside the
Roman
and stood forth a veritable Hebrew. Yet
can I not agree with Onias in all that he holds
of Herod. It may be that by him as an
instrument
,
and a forerunner of our Messiah, a
way is to be cleared, obstructions to be removed,
the enemy driven out, the land restored to its
rightful possessors and governors, and that then
the reign of the mysterious Prince, whom all
look for, but none seemeth to comprehend, shall
commence, and its fruits bless the earth. So
much is certain, that of all who live of our
faith and name, Antipas is he who possesseth
more than any other the power to do Israel a
service, which needs first to be done,  raise
her out of the dust and deliver her from her
oppressors. Till there be victory over her
enemies
,
there can be no peaceful years when the
people, sitting under their own vine and fig tree,
shall be free to listen to the voice of the
prophets
whom God shall send, or of eye so single
as to acknowledge and rejoice in Messiah,
though God should send him forth. Herod,
with the people well disposed toward him, and
aided by Philip, may do for Israel what Judas
did and Matathias, and so doing, will do a work
for which the ages to come shall celebrate his
name even as of that Elias who is first to come.
I did not refuse ere we took our departure
from the dwelling of Zadok, nor did I wish to
refuse, to assure Onias that heartily would I
work with him in his enterprise for the
redemption
of our common country. But first I
required a more certain knowledge of what the
Tetrarch had truly purposed, and of what he
was truly capable to accomplish, and whether
to the extent supposed, the people of Israel
would lend themselves to his undertaking. It
was therefore agreed, that I should see Herod,
and from communication with himself
derive
the satisfaction, which one can only derive
by conversing with the principal of any affair
that is to be prosecuted.
To Zadok it seemed a thing already
established
,
that the new kingdom was begun, and
himself
already one among the chief officers of the
king's court. He could speak only of the riches
which should flow in from conquered nations
and tributary provinces; of the places of trust
that should be bestowed upon such as, like
himself
,
were early in their zeal, and were known
to him who should first fill the throne. His
ambition hardly knew any bounds in these
imaginary
honors. Jerusalem  nothing less
would thenceforward be the place of his abode.
Onias, though he seasonably rebuked such
excess
of expectation, yet in another manner
failed not to utter the hopes he could not but
entertain of the happy changes that should take
place in Judea, when Jerusalem and not Rome
should be the centre, whence should flow
honors
and trusts; and which should then be
bestowed
not as now upon the stranger, and the
gentile, but upon the true sons of the Patriarchs;
and when each tribe, in its ancient dominion and
limits, should enjoy its own prince on his own
seat of judgment judging over it.
XI.
It
has seemed a strange thing to me, my
mother, when I have thought since of my
conversation
with Onias, and Zadok, and of the
disclosures then made concerning Sejanus, and
the league which was about to be secretly
formed with him, that I, who am still in some
sort a Roman, should be privy to such a
contract
,
made or about to be made, whose end and
object is a revolution in Rome, not less than
Judea. A little while ago, and I should have
thought that he designed evil against me, who
had held me capable, and reported me so, of any
alliance with a spirit so base as that of Sejanus,
or of joining myself to an undertaking that
aimed at any alteration, or overthrow, of the
powers in Rome. But I now know one thing
which once I did not, that 't is not we who
shape our course in life, but Providence that
marks it for us; that 't is not good alone that
works out good in the plans of God, but evil
also, and that so evil is itself, in part, good.
Thus as in the earth foul things, and things
not so much as to be named, contribute toward
the production of other things the most
beautiful
and necessary, and even poisonous things
to the production of those that are nutritious
or medicinal, so wicked men are not wholly
hurtful or useless, but seeing that they must
exist because human nature is such as it is,
they are made to work out ends of
righteousness
through the providence of God, where
they had no good intention or purpose
themselves
,
but rather the contrary. Wherefore it
may happen, and so I think it will, that though
Sejanus be in himself unworthy, he may
through that which he shall confer upon Herod
in return for acts, or promises on his part,
greatly
help the people of God, and their deliverance
from a galling bondage. And, surely, little evil
would be inflicted upon any, though the
monarch
of Capre should be thrown from the
rocks whence he casts those whom he desires
to torment or destroy, and were buried in the
depths of the sea. Sejanus for Tiberius might
indeed be no gain to Rome; but it would be
no loss. As it is not possible to conceive a
worse being than he whom we place in the
sovereignty of Hell, so cannot the imagination
form an image of a human creature, more
wicked
or vile than Tiberius, and whether it is he
or his parasite who shall rule in Rome can
matter
little to its inhabitants.
Since the evening passed in the dwelling of
Zadok, and the conversation held there with
the Rabbi and Onias, thy brother has returned
to his usual manner and appears, as Judith
asserts, even as was his wont, ere he had
entered
into the schemes which have taken him
away from his home, and filled him with
anxieties
and cares. There is to be seen in him the
common effect of relieving one's self of a
secret
within his own household. To those
whom he chiefly esteems, Onias now feels free to
speak of the things which engage, or which
trouble him, and by dividing thus the burden,
it is more easily borne. Judith, to her
exceeding
joy, now shares his confidence,
although
she will not approve, as she doubts the
wisdom of the plans he is pursuing. Of Herod
she holds an opinion, which no persuasion or
reason whatever can force her to alter, and
which allows her not for one moment to look
upon him as he is seen by Onias. Upon what
foundation her judgment rests, I as yet know
not, nor whether it be such as to warrant the
strength with which she holds it; but this is
certain, that whatever judgment she forms is
worthy to be well weighed, for she is both
deliberate
in forming her opinions, and honest and
true as Astra herself.
The reports which reach us of John, now
called the Baptist, are of his gathering still
more and more about him, and in a land already
divided by sects of all kinds, of his forming
yet another. By what he is to distinguish
himself and his followers I know not, unless it
be by the severity of his doctrine and manner
of life. This, indeed, is constantly affirmed,
that he announces the approach of a prophet
greater than himself, whose servant even, he is
not meet to be; but who that prophet is he
declares not, whether Elijah, or he who shall
precede Messiah, or Messiah himself. He has
already drawn upon him the hatred of the
Pharisees
,
for he spares not their vices in his
harangues
to the people; but he secures the regard
of the populace, who ever love to hear their
rulers involved in at least the same
condemnation
in which they are themselves included.
Against Herod, however, as well as against the
Rulers, the Pharisees, and the Sadducees, has
he lifted up his voice, whose enmity as it will be
easily excited, so he will find it more difficult to
escape from or appease. Nay, as for that, there are
none in the land, Greek, Roman, or Jew, Pharisee
or Essene, Herodian or Sadducee, high or low,
from the Chief Priests and the council at
Jerusalem
,
to the Ruler of a Synagogue, whose enmity
he will not rouse against both himself and his
followers
,
VOL. I. 25
if the same kind of speech continues to
mark his preaching. On the coming Sabbath,
in the chief Synagogue of Beth-Harem I shall
trust to hear what his follower, the Tanner of
Enon, who still lingers here, will have to say.
The Sabbath has come and passed, my
mother, and I sit down to relate to you such of
its incidents as may give you any satisfaction.
The household of Onias frequent chiefly a
synagogue on the banks of the Jordan, not more
remote in one direction, than is Beth-Harem in
another. Often, however, they resort to that
within the walls, of which Shammai and Zadok
are rulers. Thither was I desirous to go for
many reasons, but chiefly that I might learn
somewhat more distinctly concerning John from
his follower, if, perchance, he should be
permitted
to declare himself. The cool and
balmy air of the morning invited me early
abroad, that I might enjoy for a time the
solitude
which on this day I crave, and of late
have been accustomed to, and might be among
the first who should reach the synagogue. As
I emerged from the shaded grounds of Onias
upon the highway leading to the city, I found
it already sprinkled with companies of those
who, like myself, were going up to worship.
The scene was beautiful to the eye, presented
by the forms of young and old in every variety
of gay clothing, moving along beneath the
dark shadows of the trees, which here border
and overhang the path. At the well, many
stopped to quench their thirst with its cool
waters, and others reposed a while on the rocks,
or lay along upon the cool herbage. But this
indulgence lasted not long, but was broken by
the shrill echoes of the trumpets of the
synagogue
sounding the hour of the service.
As we approached and passed the gates of the
city, and entered the streets, the thinly
scattered
groups of the highway thickened gradually
into a numerous throng, pressing forward in one
direction. The noise of those, who conversed
with animation and energy, was heard on every
side. Of some who were near me, I could not,
without an effort, which I was not disposed to
make, help but hear what were the topics of
their discourse. One was loud in his
complaints
of Shammai. He preaches not
himself
,
he said, and those who would preach
he hinders. Verily he chiefly loveth the wine
cup, and for companions, not those who go up
to the house of the Lord, but such as tarry long
at the feast.
Nay, rejoined his companion, but he
is a good man; he talks not so loud as others,
and prays not so loud nor so long, but
when he turns his back upon the synagogue,
he doth not turn it on his prayers also, as is the
custom with many.
Ah, neighbor, thou ever findest an apology
for Shammai. But he is just one of those who
trust to what their mothers made them. There
is not a precept of the law, nor a custom handed
down, but he violateth it, as it shall be
convenient
.
Lest he should be righteous overmuch
is his fear; surely one without ground. The
curse of the Lord will rest upon such. Zadok,
truly, savoreth of the former days. He is one
whom the Lord delighteth to honor.
Verily, said the other, if the heart is to
be judged by the breadth of one's phylacteries,
by washings, and fastings, and prayers, then is
Zadok a son of God, and there is none like him,
for he holdeth himself not washed, if he have
not removed his ring, though it be slight as a
girdle of hair, and on the Sabbath treadeth not
on the dried grain, lest he unwittingly do the
work of the thresher. Then, when the first
day of the week dawneth, let him who
standeth
in his debt beware the gripe of Zadok. It
is as that of death and the grave. No man can
deliver.
I never heard, replied the first, that he
claimed more than his own. Surely one hath a
right to his own. The law is the law.
I know not that, responded the other, if
it be that the law is without mercy. The
heart was made before the law. The beasts,
and even gentiles, feel pity.
Justice before mercy, cried his companion,
and they were lost to my hearing.
Others, as they walked slowly along,
conversed
of the hopes of Judea.
It were truly a joy, said an old man, yet
moving firm and upright by the help of his
staff, from the head of which glittered jewels
of no little value, if one's days might be
prolonged to behold it.
Who can doubt, said a younger
companion
upon whom he leaned, who can doubt,
that even your eyes shall see it. Many scoff,
I know, and say that we hope in vain, and that
we are better now than we could be under any
change. But they are worthy not so much as
of a word of rebuke. The people judge
otherwise
;
and who can help believe, that it is
God who moves in the heart of a whole people.
If it be so, his kingdom is not far off.
The Lord grant it be so, replied the
other. I may not live to behold that day of
glory, but, my son, what with thy virtue and
the wealth I leave thee, the fruit of long days
of toil, what seat of dignity can there be to
which thou mayst not hope to rise?
25 *
Say not so, my father; thy frame is firm
yet, if aged, and it is age and its gathered
stores of wisdom that in the new reign will
stand in the highest honor.
All my wisdom, said the other, is folly.
I have added gold to gold, and silver to silver,
and how that is to be done I know well. But
of the gentle studies that inform the mind with
truth, and make it wise and humble, alas, I am
ignorant. What do I love this day but dignity
and power, and what but these can my full
coffers purchase? But these, my son, they
can purchase, and they are something; aye,
they are somewhat real, things which the eye can
see, and the hands handle, and which will gain
the worship of the people. What is wisdom
after all? I have secured the best.
'T is said, father, that to-day we may
know somewhat more of John.
Why wilt thou speak of him again, my
son, cried the other with sudden passion, a
madman and a fool. May Shimei's curses
light upon him. And so, with louder voice
and uplifted staff, he was separated from me.
As they were borne away, a voice
addressed
me from another quarter; Can you
tell me, friend, what this news is from
Idumea
?
I have heard nothing, I said; you,
therefore, can inform me, at least of more than
I know now.
What is reported, is this, that a prophet has
appeared there also, about whom the people
gather in multitudes and follow after him.
I think it cannot be a rumor having any
foundation; Onias hath of late received letters
from that region which speak not of it.
Nevertheless, said he, it is boldly
affirmed
,
and by those who come from
Jerusalem
.
Jerusalem is full of reports and rumors, I
replied, and nothing is to be trusted coming
thence.
That may be, he answered, and yet it
may be true. Among so many lies as now
abound, a truth must chance presently, that is
my hope. Peace be with you,  and he
passed on.
As I now turned into the street, which led
directly to the front of the synagogue, up the
steps of which the people were hastening, a
beggar seated on the ground, both blind and a
cripple, saluted me, asking alms. For the
love of Abraham, Isaac, Jacob, and all the
prophets have pity upon me and give me an
alms. How can I labor, having neither sight
nor power of motion? The Lord grant thee
prosperity as thou rememberest the poor.
How do I know, said I, that thine eyes
are blind, being hidden by that bandage; and
how do I know that thy feet are lame, doubled
up beneath that pile of rags?
Ah! wretched man that thou art, cried the
cripple, to deride whom God hath visited with
his judgments! Blind Levi never spake false.
At the house over against the fish market, at
the sign of the Chief Priest, thou mayst inquire
concerning me. But stay, and behold now.
Saying which, ere I could prevent his
action
,
he tore the bandage from his head,
revealing
a hideous spectacle of the hollow spaces
whence the eyes had been eaten away by
disease
,
and threw aside from his limbs the rags
that covered them, showing both his feet to have
been destroyed by the same awful
distemper
.
Behold, he cried, what the leprosy
hath taken, and what, blessed be God! it hath
left.
Dost thou still bless God, I asked, when
he hath made thee thus?
Yea, truly, said he. Should I curse him,
because the warm air blows over me, and the
food of the charitable still nourisheth me, and
the music of their kind words falls upon my
ear? If I see not, I can speak; and if I
cannot
walk, I can sit, and creep. A penny, a
penny for blind Levi.
I have not even a halfpenny to give thee,
I answered; but when the Sabbath is over,
I will call and see thee. As I thus replied, a
loud and hoarse voice behind me cried out
The Lord bless thee, Levi, even though
thou breakest the Sabbath; and at the same
time he who spoke showered down a handful of
small coin upon the stones, and swept on his
way with flowing robes toward the synagogue.
The coin, which I could not give myself, I was
forced to aid the blind man to gather up,
thinking
as I did so, that there was virtue in the
manner of a favor, as in the favor itself.
Bidding
the cripple then farewell, I turned toward
the temple, and passing the outer court, where
were many who chose rather to spend their time
there in idle gossip, than penetrate farther, I
entered.
It was already filled with more than its
usual number of worshippers, nay all parts of
it were thronged with those who were drawn
by a desire to hear what the Tanner from
Enon might have to say, if, perchance, the
Rulers should allow him to declare himself.
The uppermost seats, being here as with us in
the near neighborhood of the ark of the Law,
were occupied by the rulers, the chief doctors
of Beth-Harem, both Pharisees and Sadducees,
and such others as chose to place themselves
there; among whom I perceived Onias, and
not far from him Saturninus. The services
going before the preaching, are as in Rome.
When, accordingly, the prayers were over, the
chanting, and the reading of the Law and the
Prophets, Shammai, who had discharged the
last office, sat down, and the congregation waited
for him who should speak to them. When
there had been silence for some time, and no one
had risen, Zadok stood up and said;
This day, men of Israel, is the Scripture
brought to pass, which saith, Behold I set
before you blessing and cursing, a blessing on
such as keep the commandments I have
delivered
unto them, and a curse on such as break them.
But you will surely say, Which Scripture is
fulfilled? Verily both. The blessing is upon
the keepers of the law, and a curse upon the
breakers of it. Truly is there a curse upon the
despisers of the Law. The Law is God, and
the despiser thereof despiseth God, and
blasphemeth
.
Let him be cursed. Let him die
the death of the unrighteous, and let his
carcase
,
as that of Jezebel, be given to the dogs
that they may devour it. Let his soul perish
from among the people of God. The law  it
is the Law that exalteth Israel upon the high
Mountain, and maketh her a spectacle of honor
to the whole earth. We are the people; yea
verily, we are the people of God, and there is
none other. The nations of the earth are
accursed
.
There is reserved for them nothing
other than the blackness of darkness forever.
Hell shall devour them, nor shall her gates
ever deliver them up. The law of the Lord
that came by Moses is perfect, despise it not
therefore, ye blasphemers! Yea, and moreover,
it is everlasting; it is built upon a rock whose
foundations are hidden in the fulness of God.
He is its sure support; and in these times,
verily
in our own day, will he exalt it to more
abundant honor. The anointed of the Lord
shall appear, Shiloh shall come! the Son of
David shall arise, and Jerusalem, the holy
city, and all Israel, from Dan to Beersheba, shall
go forth and meet him at his coming, and
crown him King! Redeemer of his people!
their Saviour out of the hands of their enemies,
the Repairer of breaches, whose kingdom shall
be from everlasting to everlasting! Make
yourselves
ready, men of Israel, to greet your King.
Let the great and the mighty rise up to meet
him, for their greatness shall be increased an
hundred fold. Let the rich man pour out of his
riches, for they shall be multiplied as the sand
of the sea shore. Let the warrior make bright
his armor, and gird on his sword, for the enemies
of the Lord, as of old, must be slain, ere the
true children of the kingdom can enter into
their inheritance. Let the lovers of ease, and
sloth, let those who tremble at their own
shadow
,
let the young maiden and the little
children
,
the poor and humble flee into safe places
and the hidden dens of the mountains,  it will
be then no time for them  while the great
and the mighty and the strong take possession,
and scatter the enemy and build up the walls
of the new kingdom of our God. It shall be
an eye for an eye  yea and a tooth for a tooth,
and more than that, ten thousand fold of evil for
evil, upon the foes of Judah. For a little
finger
they have laid upon us, there shall be laid
an arm upon them as thick as a man's loins.
And what will ye say, if it be told unto you,
that now, even now, he who shall come and
restore
all things is standing in the midst of you
and ye know him not? All things are not
revealed to all. But by dreams, and visions,
and the inspirations of the Most High, are there
those, wise men and as it were prophets, unto
whom the truth hath been delivered. In due
season all eyes shall behold it and all hearts
confess it. When the day, and the hour, and the
moment hath arrived, which Daniel the Prophet
hath foretold, then shall the light arise, then the
Kingdom of Heaven hath come nigh unto you,
and its everlasting reign commenced. But that
moment, who shall declare it? Ye men of
Israel, be not deceived. Run not hither and
thither after those, who, like some among us,
would lead you astray pursuing false hopes.
The Lord will bring them to confusion. When
the great Messiah cometh, all eyes will behold
his glory. He who runs may read the signs
which shall announce him the Son of God,
the King of Israel.
These are some of the things that Zadok
said. When he had ceased, the faces of the
congregation were turned to where the Tanner
of Enon sat on one of the chief seats of the
synagogue, as if desiring that he would say
somewhat. But inasmuch as the Ruler did not
invite him to teach, he held his peace.
Shammai
,
whose office it was to ask those who were
present to speak to the people, being desirous
that if it were possible, there should be no
disturbance
,
made a pretence, as if he saw not the
wishes of the hearers in their eyes; and
turning
toward Onias, asked him, If he had
anything
to declare in the audience of the people,
to say on. But thy brother refused, knowing
well what the present temper of the multitude
was, and that it was a vain thing to hope to
withstand it. When, therefore, the people saw
that Shammai understood them not, or made as
though he did not, then they, many of them,
with one accord cried out, saying,
VOL. I. 26
We would hear Simon, the Tanner of
Enon. He hath somewhat to say, it
concerneth
Israel to hear.
Upon that, Shammai, not unwillingly in his
own heart, for he careth too little for any one
opinion to hinder the uttering of any other,
turned toward Simon the Tanner, and giving
him the book of the Prophets, bid him read, and
then say on.
Upon that, Zadok strove with zeal to lay
silence
on the Tanner, Eleazer and others aiding
him, and saying many things of John, which,
whether they were true or not, only inflamed so
much the more the people to hear one of his
followers, so that they filled the house with their
cries that Simon should be permitted to speak;
which, when the Rulers saw that it could not
be prevented, they made no more resistance,
but submitted to what was inevitable. So when
Simon saw that no more opposition was made,
and when silence had once more been obtained,
he stood up and said;
Men and brethren of the house of Jacob,
despise not one who is but the servant of
servants
,
who would declare to you the things
that concern the salvation of Israel. Pride
goeth before destruction, and a haughty spirit
before a fall. Railing Rabshakahs have not
prevailed, nor cursing Shimeis, to stop the
mouth of him who bringeth good news, good
news of the coming of the kingdom of God.
Your ears are open to hear, and your hearts to
confess
the power of the Most High. Let the
wicked, as now, gnash their teeth, but they
shall come to nought.
The Lord God of Israel in the days of
our fathers, when they had gone down into
Egypt, having pity upon his own children,
when he had punished them, delivered them
by the hand of his servant Moses. And when
in process of time having transgressed again, as
being a stiff-necked and rebellious race they have
ever done, Judah was carried away captive into
Babylon. But when ye had suffered the just
punishment for your iniquities, the Lord again
had compassion, and your prosperity was
restored
,
and Jerusalem and Judah were clad in
their beautiful garments. In these latter days
God hath promised to redeem us by a prophet,
Like unto Moses. For our transgression and
idolatries, for our revoltings and our
blasphemies
,
have we these many years suffered his
just rebuke. But the Sceptre hath at length
departed from Judah, and the Lawgiver from
between
her feet, and the gentile hath possessed the
land in all her borders. And now, therefore, the
times being fulfilled, the eyes of all the world
look for the appearing of him who shall save us.
The time of our affliction being ended, as the
prophets have foreshown, we now wait for the
Redeemer. But, will he come before our
chastisements
have cleansed us? and our stripes
have purged us? and our captivity and our
bonds have humbled us? Ye men of Israel, it
is your sins that make a separation between
you and your God! Ye must prepare the way
before him by repentance. Repent ye of your
iniquities! if ye would behold the kingdom of
God. Forsake the evil of your ways, your
prayers that are an empty sound, your fastings
that are a mockery, your worshippings and
sacrifices that are but a vain show! Think no
longer to deceive man and God by the false
appearance. The Lord seeth the heart. The
Lord despiseth the hypocrite. The Lord
looketh
through you, as the eye through the clear
water. Wash you, make you clean, put away
the evil of your doings altogether, and make a
straight path, swept, and cleansed, and
thoroughly
purged, and the messenger of the
covenant
shall suddenly come, bringing salvation
and healing on his wings. This is the message
of John. He is the voice of one crying in the
wilderness, prepare ye the way of the Lord,
make straight in the Desert a high way for our
God! He is but as one that runneth before
the king. He is as the star of the morning,
whose coming proclaimeth the rising of the
greater light, that enlighteneth the whole world.
He is not that greater light. Ye, nevertheless,
muse in your hearts, whether he be the Christ
or not. Wise men, the Scribes and Pharisees,
Priests and Levites of Jerusalem have come
asking, Art thou the Christ?  tell us plainly.
He hath denied not, but confessed, saying I am
not the Christ. He saith only that he is one
who cometh preaching, and saying, The
kingdom
of Heaven is at hand, even at the door;
and exhorting men to repentance, that they
may be found worthy to enter therein. His
baptism is unto repentance. He who
cometh
to him, and is baptized with water and
confesses his sins, belongeth to him, and is as
a stone fitted and polished to be built into the
temple and palace of our King. Come then, ye
men of Judea, ye who look for the consolation
of Israel in the fall of the modern Babylon, ye
who would make ready for the Son of God, ye
who are of the true children of Abraham, come
to the Baptism of John, and be washed of your
iniquities. Come while the invitation is held
out, and the door is open, and the lamps are
burning, for if ye refuse, there are those, not of
the house of Abraham, whom God shall call,
and who shall come in and sit down at the feast
which shall be prepared, and dwell in the cities
26*
that shall be built of every precious stone,
shining
as the sun at noon-day. Come and make
ready for the Prince. He standeth in the midst
of you, and ye know him not; but he will
suddenly reveal himself, and his glory shall be
apparent to every eye; and then will you, who
harden your hearts and shut your cars, be
covered
with confusion, and your shame shall be
published from one end of Heaven to the
other.
When Simon had ended these words, and
had sat down, all eyes were fastened upon him,
as upon one who had spoken what at least he
truly believed, and who desired the welfare of
those whom he had reproved. The assembly
would willingly have heard him farther. But
he seemed not inclined to multiply words.
There being silence for a brief space, as
Simon
ceased, Zadok seemed like one who would
fain deliver himself of other matter, that
appeared
to be restrained with difficulty; nor
would he have been withheld from giving vent
to it, as I think, but that he feared lest the people,
who so evidently were impressed by the words
of the Tanner, would listen to what he might
say with either impatience, or open signs of
disapprobation. Those, however, who
apprehended
lest he might rise and utter himself
with new violence, were relieved when they
beheld Shammai stand up, who if sometimes
through his Jewish nature he is violent, is for
the most part calm and forbearing.
Ye Jews! said he; Servants of God,
lovers of the Law, and children of Abraham,
be not too much carried away by hopes which
may end in disappointment. To judge of the
truth of the claims of one who shall declare
himself a prophet, or the Christ himself, ye
must hold your minds clear from the false
leadings
of passion, and of any fixed opinion. Else
will ye judge, not after the truth of things, but
only after some image, or idol, in your own
thoughts. When we feed our desires high,
by much meditation upon them, then are the
eyes of our mind already blinded, and though
we should open them we should see nothing
with clearness, nor as it is in itself. By looking
outwards, we should only take another way of
looking inwards. Wherefore dwell not too much
on what is to be, or what may happen, or upon
the purposes of God not yet revealed. For,
so doing, ye will only raise up phantoms
perhaps
of error, from which ye will find it hard
to escape. But rather wait, doing with zeal the
duties which are uppermost, until that which is
to come, is come, and taketh the shape which
God shall give; then will your eyes and minds
be purged, and without mote or film, error or idol,
to judge a just judgment. We know, for so
the Prophets have declared it, that Messiah
shall in these days appear, and all Israel, as one
man, awaiteth his rising. But we know not
how he shall appear, in what form, nor with
what circumstances of greatness and glory.
Nor do we know in what part of our wide land
he shall first display his power. Let us allay
our heats, and believe that the God who gave
us our Lawgiver, and brought us out of Egypt,
and hath sustained us hitherto, will now so
manifest himself, that, as soon as he appeareth,
every heart and every tongue shall confess him
and shout Hosannah! Simon hath spoken well;
and concerning John hath said things that in
themselves are credible, and in agreement with
the Scriptures; and are not dishonorable to
John, not though he were a Prophet indeed.
But we will stay our judgment, men of
Beth-Harem
,
until we shall behold him with our own
eyes. We will not rest in the judgment of
another. The truth we now possess serves us
well; we will not throw it from us without good
reasons. Again, I say, let us each honor the Law,
observe the Sabbaths, keep the feasts, offer our
sacrifices, do the work which falls to us every
day, as those who are both men and Hebrews,
and wait for what God shall bring to pass.
Shammai, when he had finished, and the
poor had been remembered, dismissed the
assembly
,
who departed with more quietness than
they would have done but for the parting words
of the Ruler. The quietness, however, lasted
not long, as it cannot among this fierce and
contentious people, broken into so many
factions
,
each aiming at the injury or destruction
of the other. For no sooner had the multitude
within the synagogue joined itself to the
multitude
without, than conversation and dispute
arose on all sides concerning what had been
said by Zadok, Simon, and Shammai. Some
blamed one, and some another; some applauded
one, and some another. Among others, I saw
the old man, whom I had overheard on the way
to the synagogue, apparently with much
passion
,
accusing the Ruler as he descended the
steps of the building.
Is it, said he, from the Ruler of our
Synagogue
,
that we are to hear fools and madmen,
idle wanderers, and falsehearted deceivers held
up to honor? Who but Simon, and wretches
like him, believe in John.
Good Sir, replied Shammai, I have held
up no deceiver, or blasphemer to honor before
the people. Had I held up John to honor,
which I did not, it is not yet shown that he is
mad, or false, or impious.
Yet, said the other, every one of any
consideration knows it.
The people do not know it, replied the
Ruler. They are on John's side.
Who, said the rich man, are the people?
and what do they know, and how should they
judge? Have our rulers, the priests, the
council
,
our rich or learned men believed in him?
That is the only question worth asking. They
of Jerusalem condemn him.
To be condemned by them of Jerusalem,
is often to be commended of the truth;
answered
Shammai.
Thou art a disciple of John and the Devil,
and so shall I report thee, cried the other in a
rage. Shammai laughed, while the other turned
away trembling with anger, more even than with
years. The people, who had heard what the
Ruler had said, applauded him, and said
Shammai is the friend of truth; he is afraid
neither of the rich, nor the powerful.
Zadok approaching, some one cried out.
Who is Zadok's Christ, standing in the midst
of us? Is Zadok also a believer in John?
Another exclaimed, It is a greater than
John the Baptist, Zadok believes in.
Or his disciple, Simon the Tanner,
shouted
a third with a deriding tone.
Blessed the people, cried yet another
voice from the crowd, to whom the Lord
shall send a king, dressed in skins himself has
cured, and his sceptre an ox's goad.
Nevertheless, said another, an ox's goad
in the hands of him with whom is the spirit of
the Lord, were more than all the power of all
the Herods. Remember Samson's jaw bone of
an ass.
Let him who accuseth Herod look to it,
cried an angry voice, lest he fall into the jaws
not of an ass, but a lion.
That was the voice of Zadok, said one
aloud.
It was not the voice of Zadok, cried the
Rabbi, as he stalked gloomily away, and left
the crowd behind. At this moment those with
whom we had been standing about the steps of
the synagogue and between the building and
the walls of the outer court, were drawn to the
street, by the loud tones of some one declaiming
to the people, where, raised above the crowds
upon a stone at the corner of the market, he
stood reporting news which he had heard of a
prophet having risen up among the hills of
Idumea
,
and to whom all in that region were
giving
ear. The throng thickened around him,
eagerly listening to what he had to say, and
making inquiries concerning the time and
manner
of his appearing. They were interrupted by
the voice of another from the crowd, who
exclaimed
,
Trust not these lying rumors, people of
Beth-Harem; give no heed to them. I am but
just arrived from the hills of Idumea on the
way to Tiberias, where the people knew
nothing
of this prophet. Listen to the
instructions
of your ruler Shammai, and run not after
every shadow.
While this person spoke, the other, who had
delivered the news with so much boldness,
mingled with the crowd and disappeared,
pursued
by the cries of the people.
I now turned away, and leaving the city
behind
,
bent my steps toward the Jordan. The
soft breath of the fresh air burdened with
spicy odors, together with the calm aspect of
nature, was like a medicine, healing the
distempered
body, and restoring the mind also, after
the feverish heats of the assembly I had left. I
sought at once the banks of the river, that I
might move quietly along in the solitude of its
deep shadows, rather than mingle with those
who, on the highway, would be passing in the
same direction with myself. The
atmosphere
was temperate, and so still, it hardly so
much as made the leaves to tremble on the
lightest boughs, or the tenderest flowers to
bend their heads. Birds and insects enjoying
the sacredness of the day which gave them
security against their common enemy, saluted
the ear with their sweetest notes. The serpent,
who glided across my path, startling me by his
fearful shape and glistening hues, seemed to
dread me less than on other days, and went
slowly by. Reaching the stream, I seated
myself
upon a rock lying within the fields of
Onias not far from the grotto of which I
have already told you, and leaning against the
trunk of an aged willow, gave myself to the
thoughts which the scenes before me, and those
which I had just witnessed, in Beth-Harem,
equally suggested. How peaceful is nature!
I thought  how calmly her various courses
move on. There is here no confusion, jarring,
and discord. The sun, the moon, and the stars
all wheel around us, and the ear cannot hear
the sound of their going, neither do they ever
cross each other's path. All is peace, order, and
silence. The trees and herbs all grow to their
full stature, yet we see not, we hear not, as
they go up from strength to strength. But with
man all is rage, disorder, and strife. Nothing
is quiet; no motion is without noise, interference,
or conflict. In the mind of each individual
there is warfare, peace never; and for nations,
it seems their chosen work to injure or destroy.
Within their own borders they chafe even
among themselves; being uneasy in every
present state, and while they look about for
VOL. I. 27
beneficial changes  at least, for changes
know not what to choose, nor where the good
they seek after is to be found, and often in the
pursuit of a fancied advantage plunge into deeper
ill.
Why, and to what good end is this
restlessness
of our people? this discontent with
the present, these expectations, this longing
for a greater future, a wider kingdom? Is it of
good? Is it of God? They are tossed, and
sway to and fro, beating against each other,
foaming with, as it seems, useless passion, even
like the waves of the sea, driven by the winds
like this river, now indeed calm and sending
forth the gentle music of its murmur as it rolls
over its bed, or winds among these rocks and
aged roots on its margin; but anon rushing
onward
with full and overflowing banks,
uprooting
the giants of the forest, and carrying
destruction
to the fields of the husbandman. But
what then, is not all alike? Is nature, always,
calm and peaceful? Is she not, even like
man, subject to passionate outbreaks, to violent
and sudden change, to uproar and wide-spread
desolation? The sun and the stars are indeed
quiet and still in their courses, and shed down
wholesome influences; but, then the comet
comes and glares upon the world, bringing with
it pestilence, mildew, floods, and war. The
solid earth quakes, and whole cities are
engulphed
.
The winds, which now cannot be heard,
to-morrow rise in tempests, and forests are
torn in fragments, ships dashed in pieces, and
the proudest works of man levelled with the
ground. Animals prey upon one another; and
even the tender dove pursues her diseased
off-spring
with cruelty. Is man worse than
nature
nature better than man? Are they
different? Should they be? Doubtless the
same being hath made the whole. We are all
alike. There is evil everywhere  evil in
nature
and evil in man. Whence is this and why?
Alas! who can tell?
But whither have I run?
I rose from my rock on the river's side,
and turned toward the house. I must needs
pass the grotto. As I drew nigh, I
perceived
some one within. It was Judith,
who had there passed in seclusion the time
which I had spent by the river. She
bounded
towards me as I passed the entrance, and
joining me we went through the vineyards,
prolonging our walk, and as we went plucked
here and there a half-dried bunch of grapes,
which had been left hanging on its vine.
You went not, I said, to the synagogue
within the walls.
No, she replied, yet I joined our people
in their worship. I accompanied those of our
household, who frequent the synagogue hard
by the Ox Ford. I knew that within the walls
there would be confusion, at least that the
peace of the hour would be destroyed; and I
am unwilling to lose that peace, or to witness
aught in the house of God that becomes not
his service. How went it? Was Simon there?
I then related what had occurred.
Judith seemed much struck by what had
fallen from Simon, and finding that the
disturbance
had been so little, was sorry she had not
been there. Concerning John, she was desirous
to learn all that had been said. This man,
said she, seems in truth like one of the old
Prophets. He not merely feeds the hopes of
the people, but rebukes their hypocrisies and
iniquities, and ere their hope can be fulfilled
of the coming Kingdom, requires the heart to
be made pure by repentance. In this, one
beholds
signs of truth. Impostors are not of this
sort. Thinking more of some success of their
own, than of the good of the people, they do but
flatter them. Those in power especially do they
seek to please. But this John  not only, if we
hear aright, hath he published the faults and
errors of the chief men of the nation, but even
of Herod. Would that I might hear and see
him! Would that I had heard his follower
Simon
!
At the hour of supper, the table of Onias was
again surrounded by many of the chief citizens
of Beth-Harem, with the Rulers, Shammai,
Zadok, and Eleazer, and others whom the open
hospitality of thy brother draws around him.
They did not fail to attack Shammai as one
who regarded with too much forbearance such
as were proposing novelties, and impairing the
common reverence both for the literal
requirements
of the Law, and the traditions of the
Elders. In truth, said Zadok, our Ruler
is little better than a Sadducee, and what can
be worse than a Sadducee? A pious Jew can
think of nothing so bad.
Were it true, that I am indeed a Sadducee,
replied Shammai, laughing, I should find
myself
among no worse companions for forsaking
my present friends,  even the rulers of the
synagogue. I then might be able to boast of
the alliance of Caiaphas and Annas, among many
others equally honorable; and since thou
knowest
,
Zadok, I am of a boastful nature, and yet
have never made such boast, thou couldst not
ask a better proof that I am sounder in my
faith than thy words imply.
In appearance, replied Zadok, thou art
on the right side, but who can doubt thy
little esteem for it, who hears thee defend, as
to-day, perverters and deniers of the truth,
railers
,
27 *
accusers, rebels, and blasphemers, like this
wild preacher of the desert?
All in Beth-Harem who know me,
rejoined
Shammai, know that I place not the same
value in outward observances that many do,
that I prefer the law to the traditions of the
elders, and the reality of virtue to its
semblance
,
and rate much higher goodness in the
life, with fewer prayers at the corners of the
streets, than a life less strict or secretly vile,
with a great show of worship. I am not a
Sadducee, inasmuch as I doubt not the
resurrection
of the just and the unjust, and hold to
the existence of a spirit in man, and of spirits
in the air and the Heavens; and yet again I am,
because I think of our actions, that we may
make them as we please, being free and not
bound by fate in the use we make both of the
body and mind. As for those who go about
to teach the people either by the wayside, at
the markets, or in the synagogue, I would
not stop their mouths. Faith is many-sided,
Zadok, and still faith, which side soever we
choose. We trouble ourselves over-much as to
what a man thinks. What have we to do with
that which passeth within a man, so long as
what he does, and what we see, is according to
the rules of religion and the customs of men?
Why should we go prying into the secrets of
the spirit, and make it so much as the concern
of a moment, as to their agreement with this
great Rabbi, or another; with Hillel, or Simon
the just, or Saddoc, or Judas? For myself, I
choose out of many things, what I judge best,
and pray that others may do the same; so shall
peace be attained, and virtue be no less.
Hear him! Hear him! cried Zadok;
not less than John himself ought we to
esteem
him a traitor to the truth and a misleader
of the people! It is well Shammai, that the
people of Beth-Harem know more of thee than
thy no-faith in Moses, or it would go hard
with thee.
The people of Beth-Harem, rejoined the
Ruler, see wider and farther than many of
their countrymen, and it may be that some of
their teachers are to be thanked for that.
They have come to consider that he is the
best disciple of Moses and the Prophets, who
observes their precepts in their spirit, and
while they see their spirit honored, allow some
liberty in other things. If they are satisfied
that the Ruler Shammai is just and faithful in
his office, they will not rebuke him because he
mingles together the good things to be found
scattered among many teachers, and many
sects. I doubt not, Zadok, much that would
be valuable might be learned, even from this
Satan, John, as I have already learned
somewhat
of value from his disciple. The fair
Judith will agree with me.
The daughter of Onias, said Zadok, is
a daughter of a Pharisee of the straitest sect.
I fear, said Judith, I shall give little
pleasure to either side, to Shammai or Zadok,
when I say, that I rest not wholly satisfied with
the teachings of either the Pharisee or the
Sadducee. But in this can I go with the
good Shammai, that I would willingly hear
what any holy man, who would instruct us,
may have to say, whether a prophet of God, or
but a common man. Surely the fruits of
religion
are not so rich, or abundant, but that we
might greet with joy any new proposed
doctrine
,
that should promise to act with better
effect on the heart and life, and raise the
general
condition of man.
Verily, Onias, cried Zadok, it seemeth
to me as if I were sitting in the company of
the uncircumcised. My ears are pierced as with
a sharp sword. It becomes thee surely to take
away the child from the false teaching of a
Sadducee.
Shammai laughed heartily.
Said Onias, No, Zadok, Judith is of age;
she hath her mind in her own keeping now,
and must open or shut it, to darkness or light,
as shall seem best to her. But even as her
father is a Pharisee, and the son of a Pharisee,
so do I deem her in spite of what thou hast
now heard, to be a true daughter of Abraham.
But when it shall be seen that Shammai leadeth
her astray, then shall I call for thee to use thy
power to convert her from the evil of her
way.
Ah, happy would that day be for thy
daughter
,
and for Israel, cried Zadok. Shammai
may have many virtues, but he hath not all.
But Zadok has, said the Ruler.
Daughter
,
how shalt thou possibly learn humility, the
chief of virtues, of this man?
If that virtue is chief on thy catalogue, it
stands not so high on mine, said Zadok, nor
on any other as I think.
Well, said Shammai, smiling, as Zadok
took him so literally, we will not dispute
about that. I give thee joy, Judith, of thy
teacher.
So it is with these Rulers, they are ever at
odds, but their difference leads not to strife or
anger, notwithstanding Zadok seems like one,
who, if his passions were once roused, would
rage with a fury that would overleap all bounds.
Much as he in his heart dislikes what he deems
the looseness of Shammai, and the light
esteem
in which he holds the minute observances
which he himself, so highly values, as frequent
washings, many fastings and prayers, together
with a sacred reverence of all traditions, he yet
cannot but revere in him a general innocence of
life, and a goodness of heart, far exceeding his
own, and most of those who would accuse him
of unbelief.
When the company was departed, the music
had ceased, and the lamps which had been hung
in the trees, for the reason that there was no
moon, were extinguished, and those who had
been disporting themselves were withdrawn,
Onias took me with him apart as if to
communicate
somewhat of moment.
Julian, said he, the time draws on that
there must be deeds as well as words, with
those who would serve Israel. Much has
already
been achieved by messengers who have
passed through the land, having communication
with those who are of our part, and bringing
over such, as it was found inclined the same
way, and could be trusted. But more remains,
and thy knowledge is now needed; but that it
may yield the most and the best fruit, I would
that thou shouldst see Herod. He alone can
lay open before thee the true condition of the
affair we have taken in hand, and which, borne
onward with one spirit, shall crown the land
and us with honor. The Tetrarch has heard
of thy doings at Csarea, and it is no
displeasure
to him, that thou hast fallen into
discredit
with Pilate. He desires to see thee, and
I have said that I would urge thy presence at
Machrus, where Herod yet abides.
I replied, that I would seek him there
without
delay, as I should with pleasure visit so
celebrated a spot as the fortress and city of
Machrus, and with hardly less, the country
that was to be traversed in the way thither.
And indeed, more than all, was I curious to see
Herod himself. Onias said, that he could not
accompany me, as at first he had purposed to
do, since it was necessary for him to depart in
another direction, and he left me to take my
own time and way, offering the use of both his
stables and slaves.
Thus, my mother, am I binding myself to
the fate of Judea  an issue so little to have
been conceived as possible but so little while
ago. I have passed in so short a time, and by
the power of such extraordinary events, from
the life and the feelings of a Roman, to the
character, and the habits, and faith of a Jew,
that I can hardly believe myself to be the same
person who dwelt with you in Rome, nor can
I think that all this has happened without the
interposing of a hand, of whose guidance we
all are the subjects, though ignorant when and
in what manner, and in the arrangement of
what events, it is put forth. Happy for us
that we stand not at the helm of our little
vessel
,
but instead, some good angel who seeth
farther and better, and hath a stronger arm, and
who, though he guideth us sometimes on
shallows
,
sometimes on quicksands, and sometimes
among rocks and eddies, doth it that our
experience
may be more various, and so good be
shown to make a part of all evil. Who, if he
might, would dare to choose for himself among
the possible events of life? Who so bold as, if
it were permitted him, to be the pilot of his
own bark, seeing so often as we do in the issue
of events, that what at a distance we had
dreaded
,
and if we could, would have shunned,
hath proved benignant in our experience of it,
and that what we had greatly desired, had it
happened, could have been no other than
disastrous
or fatal. And how greatly will our
judgments
of this kind be confirmed and extended
when, as in the resurrection of the just, we shall
look back upon the whole of life, and behold
each event as it stands bound to every other,
both with those which preceded it and those
that come after. In the light of that vast
survey
,
the names which we now give to many
events will be changed, or quite reversed,  evil
will be seen to be good, and good, evil.
Great delight and large profitings have come
to me, when thinking thus, from the pages of
David, Solomon, and the Prophets. There
seems to be no mood of the mind, which
finds not in them its proper nourishment
or medicine. Rightly was the son of David
named the Wise. The heart with all its
weaknesses
and errors, and life with all its lights and
shadows, and in all its changes, are by him
painted with so much truth, that the reader
sees not whence such stores of knowledge
could have come, save from the inspiration
of God. Else, methinks, he must have lived
life over many times, and in his own fortunes
experienced the various lots of different persons,
which we cannot believe, unless we agree
with the philosophers of India, or receive the
fancies of Pythagoras. In David, moreover,
who can fail to find the thoughts and the words
in which, whether he be joyous and grateful, or
afflicted and penitent, cheerful or desponding, he
can best offer up his sacrifice to God. No power,
no words, of his own could avail so well. David,
the sinner, and David, the saint, as he was now
a sufferer, and now an enjoyer, has alike set
forth his sorrows and his joys before God, in
prayer and praise; and there, as in a mirror, doth
every one who, like him, has sinned and
suffered
,
or obeyed and rejoiced, behold his own
VOL. I. 28
soul truly reflected. In none, either of the
philosophers
of Greece, or the moralists of Rome,
do I find so much of human life justly depicted,
of the human heart so clearly revealed. Nor,
which is much more, do they ever speak in that
tone of sincerity, which marks the prophets of
Judea; and it is this virtue in a writer of morals
above all others, that deserves our affection and
reverence. The Jew writes of life and man, as
if it were a matter not of art, but of life and
death; the Greek and the Roman, as if to treat
a subject as becomes a rhetorician. The Jew
writes to help and save him who may read;
the Roman or the Greek, to display his genius
in a perfect treatise. The Jew therefore we
love and obey as a divinity; the Roman or the
Greek we honor as an artist who has completed
a beautiful work. For the last we have
admiration
;
for the first sighings, and tears, and an
altered life.
Farewell, my mother, and the blessings of all
the Prophets be upon thee.
XII.
As
Onias had desired, that I should without
delay set forth on my journey to Mach
rus, I should have departed on the morning of
the first day of the week, but that some other
cares detained me, and, especially, the necessity
I felt to be upon me to keep my promise to the
poor Leper, whom I was to visit at his own
home. Wherefore, instead of immediately
making
for Machrus, I turned first towards
Beth-Harem
to seek out the dwelling of the beggar.
From his account of its place, it was easily
found near to the inn bearing the sign of the
High Priest painted upon its front. Just
beyond
it, stood a shapeless mass of extensive
ruins, whose broken roofs and crumbling walls
kept out neither the heats of summer nor the
rains and cold of winter  this was pointed out
to me as the abode of the wretched outcast.
The rooms immediately upon the street I
found unoccupied, but as I penetrated farther
into the gloomy recesses, and then paused to
consider which way I should turn,  it was the
sixth hour,  I was arrested by the voice of one
as if in prayer. I stood still, and heard with
distinctness the voice of a girl, as it seemed to
me, rehearsing, as if from memory, a Psalm
of David, where he deplores and confesses his
sins, and cries out from the great deeps of his
distress, for pity and pardon. The voice
having ceased, the tones of another, which I
at once remembered as those of the leper, fell
on my ear; Now, my child, that thou hast
repeated
those words of the good king and prophet,
let me hear thy voice in prayer also; with
which request the daughter complying, I heard
the same low and sorrowful voice lifted up in
prayer to God. Yet, though the voice was as
of one who was burdened, the themes on
which it dwelt, were such as to inspire
cheerfulness
and gratitude, rather than sorrow or
repining. Many blessings were enumerated
that had been bestowed upon them who were
ready to perish, by the good providence of God,
and by the hands of those who had been
moved to take pity on them. When the
worship
was over, I moved from where I had stood,
and advancing toward the door of the inner
room, passed it, and stood before them.
It was a pitiful, yet pleasing spectacle that
presented itself. The beggar was seated in a
corner of the room, upon a pile of clean straw
or rushes, leaning against the wall, with face
upturned as if to catch the light that streamed
in from a single window, or crevice in the wall,
while at his side, also crouched upon the straw,
sat her whose voice I had heard, and who had
already taken in her hands withes, which, with
nimble fingers, she was weaving into baskets.
Some jars and coarse pottery, with a few rude
seats, were the only objects in the room. The
daughter looked up at my approach, but
without
surprise, as if accustomed to the intrusion
of visitors through the open doors and fissures.
The voice of the old man, as his ear caught
my footstep, was first heard, Who comes here,
my child?
A stranger, she replied.
Not wholly a stranger, I answered. It
was I, who yesterday, doubting the truth of
your word, promised to see where you dwelt.
It is not much, replied the old man, to
say you are welcome to such a place as this;
but I am glad to hear your voice again. It
was far better to hear your voice yesterday,
than the clatter of the brass which the Pharisee
showered upon me, which but for you I could
never have found. My child had left me for a
space, and I alone could not have gathered it
up; besides, that others would have snatched
it from me. It was the same man who a little
28*
after caused me to be driven away by the
servants
of the synagogue, with reproaches and
blows, as a Sabbath breaker. But if I broke
the Sabbath by begging, he broke it as well
by giving.
He could not resist the fine occasion, I
answered, of making a show of his
benevolence
.
That was it, I am sure, answered the
daughter, though I would not say so of any
whom we did not well know. But that
Pharisee
is known to be very rich, and yet exacting
towards all who are dependent on him, casting
into prison such as owe him but a few
pence. Surely the heart of such a one is not
right.
And then, said the father, afterwards
showing his zeal for the Sabbath day by setting
the servants of the synagogue to drive me
away. I knew well that it was held unlawful
by many to give on the Sabbath; but I thought
within myself, there would be out of the great
crowds I heard would be gathered together,
some who would think, that, to give an alms
would be as acceptable an offering, as to stand
within and pray.
Surely it must be so, said the daughter,
the Sabbath is kept, and God is worshipped by
doing good, as well as by saying prayers, and
reading the law. Is it not, Sir?
I think so indeed. The law but requires
us to rest on the Sabbath, and not profane it.
It is men who add the observances of which
you complain. But why, I asked, do you
beg? addressing the daughter, is not your
labor sufficient for your honest support?
Oh no, Sir; it brings us but very little,
hardly enough to supply our food, besides
which we must pay for our portion of this crazy
tenement. But the people of Beth-Harem are
kind to us, lepers though we be. Yet would
they avoid us, doubtless, had they not known
us in our better days. You need not fear
anything
,
Sir, because I tell you my father is a
leper. The physicians say that he will suffer
no more, and that no one now will receive it
from him.
I said that I feared it not; and asked how it
was, that while her father had suffered so much
she had herself escaped?
Verily, cried the father, through the
good providence of God,  by a miracle of his
loving kindness. But beside her, all are lost,
all.
I then inquired how so great a calamity had
overtaken them.
I will tell you, replied the cripple. My
birth place is this very Beth-Harem. But
when I became of age, and had chosen what
employment I would follow, my father gave to
me and a younger brother so much of his
fortune
as he could part with, and we departed for
Tyre, that we might traffic there as merchants;
for we both preferred that way of life to any
other. There we prospered for many years.
We each took a wife, and our children grew up
around us. But my brother, not content with
the measure of our good fortune, which was
already more than that of any merchant in
Tyre, being given also to excess in his manner
of living, resolved to travel into India, and even
China, for the sake of the great riches which
many had found there, and which he was sure
he should find also. But, alas! he had been
gone but a brief space of time, when I
discovered
that in ways, which I had not suspected,
he had wasted a great part of our substance by
debts he had contracted, and soon in addition
to these, instead of wealth flowing in from the
East, I was also obliged to use what was left,
in payment for losses he had incurred there,
partly through error, and partly through riotous
living. Thus was the prosperity of the
morning
of our life already over. But this we
might have borne, and from it recovered, had
not a greater and unlooked for calamity ensued.
When for a long time we had had no tidings of
my brother, we were roused at midnight by the
cry of the servants, that he had returned. It
was he in truth; and we received him, as one
whom, though he had greatly erred, we still
loved. We embraced him with affection, and
tried to surpass each other in offices of
friendship
,
in which we were the more ready, as he
said that by reason of the fatigue of the way
he had fallen ill. But when the morning came,
what was our horror, to behold him white with
the leprosy! The plague could not be stayed.
It was in the state which is most dangerous to
those who approach it, and seized both our
households, the old and the young. We were
before beggars; now we were lepers also. All
fled from us. My wife and my children died,
their limbs dropping off one after another.
This one alone being spared, upon whom,
through the good providence of God, the
disease
never laid its loathsome touch. My
brother
,
the author of all our miseries yet lives; and
his wretched family with him, as if to add to
his unhappiness by the continual reproaches
their sufferings utter. And truly doth he
deserve
all he endures. My lot is happy,
compared
with his, in that those whom I loved
died, and so escaped what the rest endure; and
this blessed child, who alone lives, was too
pure for the foul curse to come near her. My
hope, by night and by day, is, that I may soon
perish, and release her from this cruel bondage.
It were a sin to pray for death, but I may hope
it.
The girl wept bitterly, as her father said
these things.
It seemed to be indeed as he had said, that
there was somewhat too pure in her for disease
to harm her; for notwithstanding the extremity
of their poverty, there was none of its
loathsomeness
about her; but though poor, her
garments were clean, as was the straw on
which she sat, and her countenance was bright
with the hues of health.
I asked concerning his brother, and whether
he too was in Beth-Harem.
No, he answered, he separated himself
from all whom he had known, and departed
for the desert. He inhabits a solitary dwelling
on the burning sands, where the Jordan leads
toward the salt sea, dependent upon the mercies
of the passing traveller, the shepherd and the
hunter,  who, as they pass, will throw them a
little food,  and upon what fish they can
sometimes
catch in the river. But of this they must
be deprived as, one after another, their
members
become diseased and perish.
I said, that I thought it strange, that having
been born in Beth-Harem, and being well
known, there were not more who were prompt
to aid him, and diminish farther the evils of his
lot.
He said that he had not long been returned
to Beth-Harem, and but few of the inhabitants
knew he was there. But, he added, so
great is their horror of this plague, that they
would not approach me; and it must be added
also, that they accuse me of the faults of my
brother, and visit the punishment upon my
head, as well as his, who alone was guilty.
Then bestowing upon them such relief as
would amply supply their present wants, I
departed
,
assuring them I should see them again,
when I should have returned from my journey.
Hastening back again to the dwelling of
Onias
,
I passed the remainder of the day in making
such preparations as were needful for the road,
and for an absence of many days. To Ziba I
could entrust the chief part of these cares. I
did not fail to relate to Judith all I had learned
of the Leper and his daughter, and to raise such
an interest for them in her heart, as to engage
her active exertions in their behalf. Though
professing, and really feeling, all the horror
which any do of the disease of leprosy, and
like all of this people believing it infectious in
all stages of its progress, she yet promised that
by some means which she would trust her
ingenuity
to devise, she would contribute of her
abundance to their comfort.
When the morning of the second day had
come, I set forth, with Ziba as my companion,
for the region of the Dead Sea. The cooler
weather that announces the approach of winter
beginning to prevail, our preparations were
different
from those which were to be made when
we took our departure from Csarea. But
though the winter is near at hand, occasionally
there happen days of little less burning heat
than in the summer months; in the night, the
cold, with heavy dews, always returning. The
forests still retain their leaves, though their
verdure
is partly gone. Our way lay in a plain
course in the direction of the river, by
following
which, without turning either to the right
or left, we could not fail to arrive at our
destined
haven, inasmuch as the city and fortress
of Machrus are visible at the point where the
Jordan empties into the sea. We might have
made our path shorter, by striking across the
plain where the Jordan bends, as it doth below
where the Heshbon joins it, far to the West;
but for the sake of the greater pleasantness of
the road, we kept on the lower banks of the
river. We wound along, therefore, among
many villages, and cultivated grounds, without
interruption, until, in the neighborhood of
Jericho
the land loses its fertility, and stretches out
on every side, a wide and barren desert of rock
and sand.
But after leaving Beth-Harem, we
entered
upon this fertile tract I have spoken of,
lying first immediately upon the borders of the
stream, and then stretching toward the east,
till, after not many leagues, it meets the
mountains
,
which, running from north to south,
form a wall, as it were, between Judea and the
farther east. Of those mountains, the nearer
were the hills of Gilead, partly bare, rocky, and
torn by the descending torrents of the early
spring; partly covered with the same forests
and verdure, that clothed the plains at their
roots. The walls and towers of frequent
villages
,
breaking through the dark foliage, with
their white lines, gave a new beauty to the
scene. I cannot but be of the opinion, that
neither in the neighborhood of Rome or
Naples
,
nor on the plains of the Po, is there
anything
more rare or beautiful to be seen, than
that which here lay before me; which must be
taken as high commendation, seeing that my
prejudices are still (in spite of my present
choice) in favor of the earlier scenes of my
youth. Ziba was clear that these plains were
VOL. I. 29
no way inferior to those of Esdraelon. Crossing
the Heshbon on a bridge of Roman structure,
from which we could just discern the pinnacles
of Heshbon itself, we soon came to Bethabara, a
village not large but agreeably situated, not far
from Jordan, and shaded by surrounding groves
of palms, poplars, and sycamore. Passing
through it, we discovered that very soon we
must enter upon the sands of the desert; for,
from a rising ground, which we were obliged to
ascend, we beheld the cultivated lands
gradually
yielding to rock and barren fields; all signs
of verdure being confined to the thickets of
willow and olive, that, until within a few miles
of the Dead Sea, continue to line the banks of
the river. Rising high on the eastern side of
the prospect, we beheld the tops of Mount Pisgah,
and the Mountains of Nebo, and farther in the
same direction, and towards the south, the bleak
and glistening summits of the hills of Arabia.
It was when the sun had reached his highest
point, and his rays were falling upon us, almost
with the power of the summer solstice, that we
entered upon the wild and savage region, blasted
by the hand of God himself because of the
sins of its inhabitants, which extends from the
neighborhood of Jericho on either side of the
river, even unto the further extremity of the
sea. The plains of this desert, which lie
elevated far above the Jordan, present to the
eye only one unvaried scene of desolation;
being composed of whitish rocks just breaking
through the parched earth, or of moving sands,
or else of soil seamed with cracks and fissures,
occasioned by long droughts, and also by
sudden and violent torrents from the
mountains
in the season of the rains, which wear
their way by a thousand channels to the
river. When entered upon this dismal region,
the river, though but at a small distance from
us, was no longer visible, nor even the
thickets
which clothe its banks, nor would one
believe
that they so much as had any existence, so
far were they sunk below the level of this arid
tract. All we could see, therefore, was but a wide
prospect of shining sand, painful for the eye to
look upon, bounded in the dim and hazy
distance
by lofty precipices of rock. But, new to
me, it possessed its own charms, as doth
everything
that the hand of God has made  the
wild and the terrible, as well as the calm and
the beautiful. Nay, the awe of his presence is
a more sensible influence among such scenes as
these; since as there is no other being whom
he permits to dwell there, no other to divert our
thoughts, we imagine him to make it his
peculiar
abode, and think of him alone. Where
men dwell together, in thick and prosperous
communities
,
and we behold on every side the forms
of human art, or else nature wholly altered by
that art, and thrown into shapes which his mind
has conceived, then we are ever prone to rest in
the nearest and feeblest cause of what we see,
to think more of the changes which man has
wrought in what was brought ready prepared
to his hand, than of the awful power that
effected
the first creation, and called into being the
first substance. The scenes of nature wild and
untenanted, even as they came from the hand
of their Maker, are of most power on the mind.
Thus too the ocean moves the soul more than
the land.
We had approached toward the midway point
of this desert region, having seen of living
things, only here and there in the distance
the form of an Arab horseman, or the long neck
of a camel moving among the rocks, when we
beheld what appeared to be a cluster of
ruinous
dwellings, whose walls of white stone shone
in the hot glances of the sun with a dazzling
radiance
.
No tree or shrub was near to break the
rays of the sun; they stood undefended and,
as we supposed, uninhabited in their fearful
solitude. Ziba, thinking they might with
reason be the resort of plunderers and robbers,
who greatly infest the roads lying between
Jerusalem, Jericho, and the borders of the Dead
Sea, counselled that we should avoid them, by
taking a course nearer the Jordan. But
curiosity
prevailing over apprehension, we kept on
our way, and with the less concern, that
they stood on what must be the common road
which travellers would take, on their journeys
to Machrus, or Herodium. When we had drawn
so near as to see the buildings more distinctly,
with their white walls, and dark shadows cast
on the burning sand, and had paused a moment,
there suddenly rushed from out the ruins lean
and half-starved dogs, who filled the air with
their prolonged and doleful howling. Fit
guardians
they seemed of the foul spirits that could
alone inhabit dwellings more fearful and dismal
than the tombs themselves. The dogs
continuing
their savage yells, yet, as they struck us,
rather melancholy and mournful in their sound
than fierce, we kept on our way, and drew still
nearer, though it was with difficulty we urged on
our horses, who seemed to dread an approach,
even more than ourselves. The walls showed here
and there small loop-holes, or windows, but the
eye could see nothing but the deep blackness of
space within. As I looked steadily at one of
these openings, a human face suddenly
appeared
,
and was as quickly withdrawn; but, seen
only for a moment, it made known by its scaly,
death-like whiteness, who and what the
inhabitants
29 *
were. Here, I could not doubt, dwelt
the leprous household of the brother of the
Beth-Harem beggar. I called upon Ziba, who
was hastening forward, to stop. At the same
moment passing a projecting wall, I there beheld
the members of this miserable family, lying
basking in the rays of the sun, rather like swine
than creatures in the human form. The dogs
ceased their baying, and came round fawning as
if for food. Soon as the lepers  lying as it
were half asleep  were conscious of our
presence
they cried out as with one accord, in
hoarse and unnatural tones,
Food  food  give us food,  at the
same time stretching out their hands, from
which some or all the fingers had fallen.
Food  give us food, else may the curse of
leprosy cleave to you  may the air that blows
over us taint you with the plague a thousand
leagues over the desert.
Cease to curse, said I and we will throw
you food. But do you not fear to blaspheme,
seeing what the punishment of your sins is?
This they received with hoarse laughter.
What should we fear? What is worse
than this? Out upon you, hypocrite! Throw
us food, or begone.
I would ask you, I began
Insult us not; ask nothing;  throw us
food, I say, and begone.
He who had said these things  his face, at
first, white with its leprous crusts, but now
bloated, and red with impotent rage  while he
spoke, had half raised himself from the sand.
He now seized a broken fragment of the wall
to hurl at us; the others at the same time,
crying out to the dogs to attack us. Struck
with horror at such a spectacle, we threw down
the food we could spare, and fled upon our way
their curses, and the baying of the famished
dogs dying gradually away as we rode.
It was a long while ere I could so banish
from my mind the scene I had witnessed, as
to take note of the way. We rode along in
silence. I could think only of the miserable
fate that had overtaken a household reared once
in prosperity and luxury. How low they must
have fallen, I thought, in their sense of God
and right, while yet the day of their
prosperity
shone bright, for adversity to plunge
them so deep in beastliness and impiety. Their
leprosy seemed but the least portion of the evil
that had overtaken them. Their bodies were
in health and beauty, compared with their souls.
Doubtless they had forsaken God long before
he suffered the punishment of their errors finally
to fall upon them. So judged Ziba.
Those wretches, continued he, must
have sinned with industry even from their birth,
to bring down so fearful a judgment.
I told him what I had heard from the leper
in Beth-Harem, and who I supposed them to
be.
At this Ziba recollected himself, and said,
that doubtless it was as I supposed. He had
heard at Tyre of what I had related; and as
he had been told, it was rare that
wickedness
and impiety proceed to such excesses as
in the younger of the two brothers. There
were few in Tyre whom he had not injured.
The wealth of the poor, of the widow, and the
orphan he had obtained as a trust, and then
devoted
to his pleasures, and the luxurious
indulgence
of his household. His children grew
up in sin. When he returned from India, he
was well aware that when he entered his own
doors, it was as a leper; but his heart was so
hardened, that he said, They shall perish also.
They did perish, indeed, by this living death.
And the curse that had fallen from the hand
of God, clave unto him also, and cleaveth
yet and will cleave forever; for his soul is
leprous more than the body, and that shall be
in the resurrection even as it is now. Shall
it not?
I said that I could not but think so.
Yet, said Ziba, the Priests will tell
us, that the children of Abraham shall be saved,
and their sins shall not hinder  while no
others shall, be they never so pure.
But others, I replied, do not so judge.
And these perhaps may know the truth as well
as they.
I believe it, answered Ziba. The best
that I have heard of the Prophet on the Jordan
the Baptizer  is, that to the boasting
Pharisees
and Doctors from Jerusalem, who think
whether they fulfil all rightenousness or not,
they shall be saved, he said, `It is of no worth,
your claim on Abraham as your father, for God
can raise up at any moment from the very
stones of the street children to Abraham, who
shall come in and claim all that belonged to
his true descendants.'
If he has said so, I answered, he has
said a good thing, and doubtless true as the
righteousness of God.
So conversing we continued on our way
until
,
as we ascended a little knoll of sand, Ziba
cried out, saying,
Behold! the Dead Sea!
I looked where he pointed, and it was
plainly
to be seen stretching away to the south till
lost in the extreme distance.
And there, on the left at the head of the
lake, continued Ziba, can the eye just
discern
the high rocks on which stand the city and
fortress we are in search of.
They were indeed just visible. But as we
moved on at a quicker pace, they rapidly
emerged from the dimness in which they first
appeared, and began to assume their proper
forms. The same scene continued to surround
us, save that the whole plain of the desert began
to slope toward the huge basin of the sea, and
the sand to become more light and soft, and the
low rocks to disappear. We now, too, had
brought into sight the great highways from
Idumea, winding round the head of the lake,
and those from the northern parts of the Pera,
all leading to Machrus, which, since its
restoration
by Herod the Great, has been not only
a post of defence and repository for munitions
of war, but likewise a place of resort for the
merchants who trade between Arabia, Jerusalem,
and Tyre, and the general coast of the
Mediterranean
.
Along these main channels of
communication
we could now see horsemen,
travellers
on foot, and long lines of loaded camels,
either bent towards Machrus or Herodium,
or else, going from these cities towards the
west and north.
The Dead Sea now opened before me in all
its grandeur and boundless extent. While the
shore at the northern extremity, where the
Jordan
sends in its there dull and muddy stream,
is but a vast waste of sand, all flat and low,
even to the water's edge, the eastern and
western
shores are on the other hand, bold and
sublime
,
with mountains of every wild and jagged
form running down to the shore itself in lofty
and abrupt precipices of bare and shattered
rock, then retreating into the interior and rising
into loftier summits still. Between these ranges
of hills lay the mysterious sea, heavy and
motionless
,
as if indeed dead. No ripple broke its
surface
,
no wave murmured along the shore
weltering
only among the loose rocks piled along its
margin. The silence as of death rested over it.
The waters of this inland ocean, heavy with
salt, their surface covered with an oily film
which impedes the action of the winds, and
being moreover without tides strike the eye
at once as different from all others  from
those of the Great Sea always in motion by
reason of its tides, and from those of other
lakes which fresh and light are curled by the
gentlest breath of air that passes over them. Had
this sea, instead of water, presented to the eye
a surface of white polished silver, where every
object on its sides was reflected with the
perfection
of reality, it would not have differed
from what I saw, nor filled the mind with more
astonishment. When we drew near, and
impatient
of delay, attempted in the most direct
manner to reach the shore, we were instantly
defeated by the soft and treacherous sands into
which our horses sank. This compelled us to
wind round the bay, which forms the upper
extremity
,
that we might gain a rocky shore lying
under a low cape, or promontory, that divided us
from the city and fortress of Machrus.
Having accomplished our object, we stood
upon the rocks against which the water lay,
reached down and tasted for ourselves its
exceeding
bitterness, and looked into those clear
depths which the eye penetrates as they were
composed of crystal. It demanded but slight
effort of the fancy to make me believe, that far
down in those dismal solitudes, I beheld the
pinnacles and towers, the temples and the walls
of the devoted cities; and that I could still hear,
as the peasants affirm they ever do, the moaning
or the imprecations of the wicked spirits there
overwhelmed, and whom the justice of God
still binds in their watery prisons. I lay along
upon the rocks and gazed, and listened, till I
was weary, and I was roused by Ziba's voice,
saying, that it was time we set on for Machrus,
would we reach that place before night.
END OF VOL. I.